This is a reproduction of a library book that was digitized
by Google as part of an ongoing effort to preserve the
information in books and make it universally accessible.
http://books.google.com

GREAT EXPECTATIONS
CHARLES DICKENS


 
 
 




 
CHARLES DICKENS' COMPLETE WORKS.
THE CAMBRIDGE EDITION.
With 650 Illustrations on Steel and Wood by Cruikshank, Phiz, Barnard, De Neuville, and others.
GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
BY
CHARLES DICKENS.
BOSTON:
PUBLISHED BY ESTES AND LAURIAT,
301-305 Washington Street.
1 881.
 
CONTENTS.
GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
CHAPTER PACE 1 21 II 26 "1 35 IV. 41 V 50 VI 61 VII 63 VIII 74 IX 87 X 95 XI 102 XII 116 XIII 122 XIV 130 XV. 132 XVI 144 XVII 149 XVIII 158 XIX 172 XX 187 XXI 196 XXII 201 XXIII 214 XXIV 223 XXV 230 XXVI 238 XXVII 2,6 XXVIII 254 XXIX 261 XXX 274 XXXI 283 XXXII 289
iv
* CONTENTS.
CHAPTRR PAGtt XXXIII 295 XXXIV 303 XXXV 309 XXXVI 317 XXXVII 324 XXXVIII 332 XXXIX 345 XL. 357 XLI 371 XLII 377 XLI1 1 385 XLIV 391 XLV 399 XLVI 407 XLVII 415 XLVIII 422 XLIX 429 L. 439 LI 444 LI 1 452 LIU 458 LIV 471 LV 485 LVI 493 LVII 499 LVIII 512 LIX 520
ILLUSTRATIONS.
Then she softly patted my Shoulder in a soothing
way Frontispiece.
TO FACE PAGE
"Tell us your Name 1" said the Man, "quick1" . . 22
Then Joe began to Hammer and Clink, Hammer and
Clink 52
"Who is it?" said the bady at the Table. "Pip,
Ma'am " 78
"Which I meantersay, Pip" 123
" Hulloa," he growled ; " Where are you Two
GOING?" 15;
"And may I — may I — ?" 179
" This Chap murdered his Master " 226
" Hold me 1 I 'm so Frightened 1 " 275
"Oh, you must take the Purse!" 294
"If I say Yes, may I kiss the Cheek again?" . . . 298
I rose out of my Chair, and stood with my Hand
upon the Back of it, looking wildly at him . .351
"Look here," said Herbert 409
I entreated her to rise 432
" Do you know This ? " said he 461
vi ILLUSTRATIONS.
TO FACE PACK
He was taken on Board, and instantly manacled
at the Wrists and Ankles 482
The placid look at the white Ceiling came back,
and passed away, and his head dropped quietly
on his Breast 498
I saw the Shadow of no parting from her .... 523
GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
CHAPTER L
My father's family name being Pirrip, and my Christian name
Philip, my infant tongue could make of both names nothing
longer or more explicit than Pip. So I called myself Pip, and
came to be called Pip.
I give Pirrip as my father's family name, on the authority
of his tombstone and my sister—Mrs. Joe Gargery, who mar
ried the blacksmith. As I never saw my father or my mother,
and never saw any likeness of either of them (for their days
were long before the days of photographs), my first fancies re
garding what they were like were unreasonably derived from
their tombstones. The shape of the letters on my father's gave
me an odd idea that he was a square, stout, dark man with
curly black hair. From the character and turn of the inscrip
tion, "also Georgiana wife of the above," I drew a childish
conclusion that my mother was freckled and sickly. To five
little stone lozenges, each about a foot and a half long, which
were arranged in a neat row beside their grave, and were sacred
to the memory of five little brothers of mine—who gave up
trying to get a living exceedingly early in that universal strug
gle—I am indebted for a belief I religiously entertained that
they had all been born on their backs with their hands in their
trowsers-pockets, and had never taken them out in this state
of existence.
Ours was the marsh country, down by the river, within, as
the river wound, twenty miles of the sea. My first distinct
impression of the identity of things seems to me to have been
gained on a memorable raw, damp afternoon toward evening,
(21)
82 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
At such a time I found out for certain that this bleak place
overgrown with nettles was the church-yard ; and that Tobias
Pirrip, late of this Parish, and also Georgiana, wife of the
above, were dead and buried; and that Alexander, Barthol
omew, Abraham, George, and Robert, infant children of the
aforesaid, were also dead and buried ; and that the dark, flat
wilderness beyond the church-yard, intersected with dikes and
mounds and gates, with scattered cattle feeding on it, was the
marshes ; and that the low leaden line beyond was the river ;
and that the distant-savage lair from which the wind was rush
ing, was the sea ; and that the small bundle of shivers growing
afraid of it all and beginning to cry, was Pip.
" Hold your noise 1" cried a terrible voice, as a man started
up from among the graves at the side of the church-porch.
" Hold your noise, you little devil, or I'll cut your throat 1"
A fearful man, all in gray, with a great iron on his leg. A
man with no hat, and broken shoes, and with an old rag tied
round his head. A man who had been soaked in water and
smothered in mud, and lamed by stones, and cut by flints, and
stung by nettles, and torn by briers ; who limped, and shivered,
and glared, and growled ; and whose teeth chattered in his
head as he seized me by the chin.
"Don't cut my throat, Sir 1" I pleaded in terror. "Pray
don't do it, Sir 1"
" Tell us your name 1" said the man. " Quick 1"
"Pip, Sir."
" Once more," said the man. " Give it mouth 1"
"Pip. Pip, Sir."
"Show us where you live," said the man. "Pint out the
place 1"
I pointed to where our village lay on the flat in-shore among
the alder-trees and pollards, a mile or more from the church.
The man, after looking at me for a moment, turned me up
side-down, and emptied my pockets. There was nothing in
them but a piece of bread. When the church came to itself'—
for he was so sudden and strong that he made it go head over
heels before me, and I saw the steeple under my legs—when
the church came to itself, I say, I was seated on a high tomb
stone trembling, while he ate the bread ravenously.
 

GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 23
"You young dog!" said the man, licking his lips at me,
" what fat cheeks you ha' got !"
I believe they were fat, though I was at that time undersized
for my years, and not strong.
" Damned if I couldn't eat 'em," said the man, with a threat
ening shake of his head, " and if I han't half a mind to 't !"
I earnestly expressed my hope th- he wouldn't, and held
tighter to the tombstone on which ht- ad put me ; partly to
keep myself upon it, partly to keep myself from crying.
" Now then, lookie here 1" said the man. " Where's your
mother ?"
"There, Sir!" said I.
He started, made a short run, and stopped and looked over
his shoulder.
" There, Sir 1" I timidly explained. " Also Gegiorana.
That's my mother."
" Oho 1" said he, coming back. " And is that your father
alonger your mother ?"
" Yes, Sir," said I ; " him too ; late of this parish."
" Ha 1" he muttered then, considering. " Who d'ye live with
—supposin' you're kindly let to live, which I han't made up my
mind about ?"
"My sister, Sir—Mrs. Joe Gargery—wife of Joe Gargery,
the blacksmith, Sir."
"Blacksmith, eh ?" said he. And looked down at his leg.
After darkly looking at his leg and at me several times, he
came closer to my tombstone, took me by both arms, and tilted
me back as far as he could hold me ; so that his eyes looked
most powerfully down into mine, and mine looked most help
lessly up into his.
" Now lookie here," he said, " the ipjestion being whether
you're to be let to live. You know what a file is ?"
"Yes, Sir."
"And you know what wittles is ?"
"Yes, Sir."
After each question he tilted me over a little more, so as to
give me a greater sense of helplessness and danger.
"You get me a file." He tilted me again. "And you get
me wittles." He tilted me again. " You bring 'em both to me."
24 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
He tilted me again. " Or I'll have your heart and liver out."
He tilted me again.
I was dreadfully frightened, and so giddy that I clung to
him with both hands, and said, "If you would kindly please
to let me keep upright, Sir, perhaps I shouldn't be sick, and
perhaps I could attend more."
He gave me a most tremendous dip and roll, so that the
church jumped over its own weathercock. Then he held me
by the arms, in an upright position on the top of the stone, and
went on in these fearful terms :
"You bring me, to-morrow morning early, that file, and them
wittles. You bring the lot to me at that old Battery over
yonder. You do this, and you never dare to say a word, or
dare to make a sign concerning your haven't seen such a person
as me, or any person, and you shall be let to live. You fail,
or you go from my words in any partickler, no matter how small
the partickler, and your heart and your liver shall be tore out,
roasted, and ate. Now I ain't alone, as you may think I am.
There's a young man hid with me, in comparison with which
young man I am a Angel o' light. That young man hears the
words I speak. That young man has a secret way pecooliar to
himself, of getting at a boy, and at his heart, and at his liver.
It is in wain for a boy to attempt to hide himself from that
young man. A boy may lock his door, may be warm in bed,
may tuck himself up, may draw the clothes over his head, may
think himself comfortable and safe ; but that young man will
softly creep and creep his way to him and tear him open. I am
a keepin' that young man from harmin' of you at the present
moment, with great difficulty. I find it very hard to hold that
young man off of your inside. Now, what do you say?"
I said that I would get him the file, and I would get him
what broken bits of food I could, and I would come to him
at the Battery, early in the morning.
" Say Lord strike you dead if you don't ?" said the man.
I said so, and he took me down.
"Now," he pursued, "you remember what you've under
took, and you remember that young man, and you get
home !" " Goo-good-night, Sir," I faltered.
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 2.0
" Much of that !" said he, glancing about him over the cold
wet flat. " I wish I was a frog. Or a eel 1"
At the same time he hugged his shuddering body in both
his arms—clasping himself, as if to hold himself together—
and limped toward the low church wall. As I saw him go,
picking his way among the nettles, and among the brambles
that bound the evergreen mounds, he looked in my young eyes,
as if he were eluding the hands of the dead people, stretching
up cautiously out of their graves, to get a twist upon his ankle
and pull him in.
When he came to the low church wall, he got over it, like a
man whose legs were numbed and stiff, and then turned round
to look for me. When I saw him turning, I set my face toward
home, and made the best use of my legs. But presently I
looked over my shoulder, and saw him going on again toward
the river, still hugging himself in both arms, and picking his
way with his sore feet among the great stones dropped into the
marshes here and there, for stepping-places when the rains were
heavy, or the tide was in.
The marshes were just a long black horizontal line then, as
I stopped to look after him ; and the river was just another
horizontal line not nearly so broad nor yet so black ; and the
sky was just a row of long angry red lines, and dense black lines
intermixed. On the edge of the river I could faintly make out
the only two black things in all the prospect that seemed to
be standing upright ; one of these was the beacon by which the
sailors steered—-like an unhooped cask upon a pole—an ugly
slimy thing when you were near it; the other, a gibbet with
some chains hanging to it which had once held a pirate. The
man was limping on toward this latter, as if he were the pirate
coming to life and come down, and goin>; back to hook himself
up again. It gave me a terrible turn when I thought so ; and
as I saw the black cattle lifting their heads to gaze after him,
I wondered whether they thought so too. I looked all around
for the horrible young man, and could see no signs of him.
But now I was frightened again, and ran home without stop
ping.
CHAPTER II.
My sister, Mrs. Joe Gargery, was more than twenty years
older than I, and had established a great reputation with her
self and the neighbors because she had brought me up "by
hand." Having at that time to find out for myself what the
expression meant, and knowing her to have a hard and heavy
hand, and to be much in the habit of laying it upon her hus
band, as well as upon me, I supposed that Joe Gargery and
I were both brought up by hand. She was not a good-looking woman, my sister ; and I had a
general impression that she must have made Joe Gargery
marry her by hand. Joe was a fair man, with curls of flaxen
hair on each side of his smooth face, and eyes of such a very
undecided blue that they seemed to have somehow got mixed
with their own whites. He was a mild, good-natured, sweettempered,
easy-going, foolish, dear fellow—a sort of Hercules
in strength, and also in weakness.
My sister, Mrs. Joe, with black hair and eyes, had such a
prevailing redness of skin that I sometimes used to wonder
whether it was possible she washed herself with a nutmeggrater
instead of soap. She was tall and bony, and almost
always wore a coarse apron, fastened over her figure behind
with two loops, and having a square, impregnable bit in front
that was stuck full of pins and needles. She made it a powerful
merit in herself, and a strong reproach against Joe, that she
wore this apron so much. Though I really see no reason now
why she should have worn it at all ; or why, if she did wear it
at all, she should not have taken it off every day of her life.
Joe's forge adjoined our house, which was a wooden house,
as many of the dwellings in our country were—most of them,
at that time. When I ran home from the church-yard, the
forge was shot up, and Joe was fitting alone in the kitchen.
(26)
GREAT EXPECTATIONS -27
Joe and I being fellow-sufferers, and having confidence as such,
Joe imparted a confidence to me the moment I raised the latch
of the door and peeped in at him opposite to it, sitting in the
chimney-corner.
" Mrs. Joe has been out a dozen times, looking for you, Pip;
and she's out now, making it a baker's dozen."
" Is she ?"
" Yes, Pip," said Joe ; " and what's worse, she's got Tickler
with her."
At this dismal intelligence I twisted the only button on my
waistcoat round and round, and looked in great depression at
the fire. Tickler was a wax-ended piece of cane, worn
smooth by collision with my tickled frame.
"She sat down," said Joe, "and she got up, and she made
a grab at Tickler, and she ram-paged out. That's what she
did," said Joe, slowly clearing the fire between the bars with
the poker; "she ram-paged out, Pip."
" Has she been gone long, Joe ?" I always treated him as
a larger species of child, and as no more than my equal.
" Well," said Joe, looking up at the Dutch clock, " she's been
on the Ram-page, this last spell, about five minutes, Pip. She's
a coming 1 Get behind the door, old chap, and have the jacktowel
betwixt you."
I took the advice. My sister, Mrs. Joe, throwing the door
wide open, and finding an obstruction behind it, immediately
divined the cause, and applied Tickler to further investiga
tion. She concluded by showing me. I often served her as
a connubial missile at Joe, who, glad to get hold of me on
any terms, passed me on into the chimney and quietly fenced
me there with his great legs.
"Where have you been, you young monkey?" said Mrs.
Joe, stamping her foot. " Tell me directly what you've been
doing to wear me away with fret and fright and worrit, or I'd
have you out of that corner if you was fifty Pips and he was
five hundred Gargerys."
" I have only been to the church-yard," said I, from my stool,
crying and rubbing myself.
" Church-yard 1" repeated my sister. " If it warn't for me
-28 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
you'd have been to the church-yard long ago, and staid there.
Who brought you up by hand ?"
"You did," said I.
"And why did I do it, I should like to know 1" exclaimed
my sister.
I whimpered, "I don't know."
" I don't 1" said my sister. " I'd never do it again 1 I know
that. I may truly say I've never had this apron of mine off
since born you were. It's bad enough to be a blacksmith's
wife (and him a Gargery), without being your mother."
My thoughts strayed from that question as I looked discon
solately at the fire. For the fugitive out on the marshes with
the ironed leg, the mysterious young man, the file, the victuals,
and the dreadful pledge I was under to commit a larceny on
those sheltering premises, rose before me in the avenging coals.
" Hah 1" said Mrs. Joe, restoring Tickler to his station.
" Church-yard, indeed 1 You may well say church-yard, you
two." One of us, by-the-by, had not said it at all. "You'll
drive me to the church-yard betwixt you one of these days, and
oh, a- pr-r-recious pair you'd be without me!"
As she applied herself to set the tea-things, Joe peeped
down at me over his leg, as if he were mentally casting me and
himself up, and calculating what kind of pair we practically
should make, under the grievous circumstances foreshadowed.
After that, he sat feeling his right-side flaxen curls and
whisker, and following Mrs. Joe about with his blue eyes, as his
manner always was at squally times.
My sister had a trenchant way of cutting our bread-andbutter
for us, that never varied. First, with her left hand she
held the loaf, hard and fast, against her bib—where it some
times got a pin into it, and sometimes a needle, which we after
ward got into our mouths. Then she took some butter (not
too much) on a knife and spread it on the loaf in an apothecary
kind of way, as if she were making a plaster—using both sides
of the knife with a slapping dexterity, and trimming and
moulding the butter off round the crust. Then she gave the
knife a final smart wipe on the edge of the plaster, and then
sawed a very thick round off the loaf, which she finally, before
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 29
separating from the loaf, hewed into two halves : of which Joe
got one, and I the other.
On the present occasion, though I was hungry, I dared
not eat my slice. I felt that I must have something in reserve
for my dreadful acquaintance and his ally, the still more
dreadful young man. I knew Mrs. Joe's housekeeping to be
of the strictest kind, and that my larcenous researches in the
dead of night might find nothing available in the safe, there
fore I resolved to put my hunk of bread-and-butter down
the leg of my trowsers.
The effort of resolution necessary to the achievement of this
purpose I found to be quite awful. It was as if I had to
make up my mind to leap from the top of a high house, or
plunge into a great depth of water. And it was made the
more difficult by the unconscious Joe. In our above-mentioned
freemasonry as fellow-sufferers, and in his good-natured com
panionship with me, it was our evening habit to compare
the way we bit through our slices by silently holding them
up to each other's admiration now and then—which in general
led us to new exertions. To-night Joe several times invited
me, by the display of his fast-diminishing slice, to enter
upon our usual friendly competition ; but he found me each
time with my yellow mug of tea on one knee, and my untouched
bread-and-butter on the other. At last, I desperately con
sidered that the thing I contemplated must be done, and that
it had best be done in the least improbable manner consistent
with the circumstances. I took advantage of a moment
when Joe had just looked aside, and got my bread-andbutter
down my leg.
Joe was evidently made uncomfortable by what he supposed
to be my loss of appetite, and took a thoughtful semicircular
bite out of his slice, which he didn't seem to enjoy. He rolled
it about in his mouth much longer than usual, pondering over
it a good deal, and after all gulped it down like a pill. He
was about to take another bite, and had just got his head on
one side for a good purchase on it, when his eye fell on me,
and he saw that my bread-and-butter was gone.
The wonder and consternation with which Joe stopped on
30 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
the threshold of his bite and stared at me were too evident
to escape my sister's observation.
" What's the matter now ?" said she smartly, as she put
down her cup.
"I say, you know 1" muttered Joe, shaking his head at me
in very serious remonstrances, "Pip, old chap 1 You'll do
yourself a mischief. It'll stick somewhere. You can't have
chawed it, Pip."
" What's the matter now ?" repeated my sister, more sharply
than before.
" If you can cough any trifle on it up, Pip, I'd recommend
you to do it," said Joe, all aghast. " Manners is manners,
but still yourelth's your elth."
By this time my sister was quite desperate, so she pounced
on Joe, and taking him by the two whiskers, knocked his head
for a little while against the wall behind him : while I sat
in the corner looking guiltily on.
"Now, perhaps you'll mention what's the matter," said my
sister, out of breath, " you staring great stuck pig."
Joe looked at her in a helpless way ; then took a helpless
bite and looked at mfe again.
" You know, Pip," said Joe, solemnly, with his last bite in
his cheek, and speaking in a confidential tone, as if we were
quite alone, "you and me is always friends, and I'd be the
last to tell upon you any time. But such a"—he moved his
chair and looked about the floor between us, and then again
at me—"such a honcommon Bolt as that !"
" Been bolting his food, has he ?" cried my sister.
"You know, old chap," said Joe, looking at me, and not
Mrs. Joe, with his bite still in his cheek, " I Bolted, myself,
when I was your age—frequent—and as a boy I've been
among a many Bolters ; but I never see your equal yet,
Pip, and it's a mercy you ain't choked dead."
My sister made a dive at me, and fished me up by the hair :
saying nothing more than the awful words, "you come along
and be dosed."
Some medical beast had revived Tar-water in those days as
a fine medicine, and Mrs. Joe always kept a supply of it in
the cupboard ; having a belief in its virtues correspondent to
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 31
its horrible nastiness. At the best of times so much of this
elixir was administered to me as a choice restorative, that I
was conscious of going about, smelling like a new fence. On
this particular evening the urgency of my case demanded a
pint of this mixture, which was poured down my throat, for
my greater comfort, while Mrs. Joe held my head under her
arm as a boot would be held in a boot-jack. Joe got off with
half-a-pint ; but was made to take that (much to his disturbance,
as he sat slowly biting and meditating before the fire),
"because he had had a turn." Judging for myself, I should
say he certainly had one afterward, if he had had none before.
Conscience is a dreadful thing when it accuses man or boy ;
but when, in the case of a boy, that secret burden co-operates
with another secret burden down the leg of his trowsers, it is
(as I can testify) a great punishment. The guilty knowledge
that I was going to rob Mrs. Joe—I .never thought I was
going to rob Joe, for I never thought of any of the house
keeping property as his—united to the necessity of always
keeping one hand on the bread-and-butter as I sat, or when
I was ordered about the kitchen on any small errand, almost
drove me out of my mind. Then, as the March winds
made the fire glow and flare, I thought I heard the fierce
voice outside of the man with the iron on his leg who had
sworn me to secrecy, declaring that he couldn't and wouldn't
starve until to-morrow, but must be fed now. At other times,
I thought, what if the young man who was with so much
difficulty restrained from imbruing his hands in me, should
either yield to his constitutional impatience, or should mistake
the time, and should think himself accredited to my heart and
liver to-night, instead of to-morrow 1 If ever any body's
hair stood on end with terror, mine must have done so then.
But, perhaps, nobody's ever did ?
It was Christmas eve, and I had to stir the pudding for next
day, with the copper-stick, from seven to eight by the Dutch
clock. I tried it with the load upon my leg (and that made
me think afresh of the man with the iron on his leg), and
found the tendency of exercise to bring the bread-and-butter
out at my ancle, quite unmanageable and unconquerable.
32 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
Happily I slipped away, and deposited that part of my con
science in my garret bedroom.
" Hark 1" said I, when I had done my stirring, and was
taking a final warm in the chimney corner before being sent
up to bed ; " was that guns, Joe ?"
" Ah 1" said Joe. " There's another conwict off."
" What does that mean, Joe ?" said I.
Mrs. Joe, who always took explanations upon herself, said,
snappishly, " Escaped. Escaped." Administering the defini
tion like Tar-water.
While Mrs. Joe sat with her head bending over her needle
work, I put my mouth into the forms of saying to Joe,
" What's a convict ?" Joe put his mouth into the forms of
returning such a highly elaborate answer, that I could make
out nothing of it but the single word "Pip."
" There was one off last night," said Joe, aloud, " after
sunset-gun. And they fired warning of him. And now, it
appears, they're firing warning of another."
" Who's firing ?" said I.
" Drat that child," interposed my sister, frowning at me
over her work, " what a questioner he is. Ask no questions,
and you'll be told no lies."
It was not very polite to herself, I thought, to imply that
I should be told lies by her, even if I did ask questions. But
she never was polite, unless there was company.
At this point Joe greatly augmented my curiosity by taking
the utmost pains to open his mouth very wide, and put it into
the form of a word that looked to me like " sulks." There
fore I naturally pointed to Mrs. Joe, and put my mouth into
the form of saying "her?" But Joe wouldn't hear of that at
all and again opened his mouth very wide, and shook the form
of a most emphatic word out of it. But I could make nothing
of the word.
"Mrs. Joe," said I, as a last resource, "I should like to
know—if you wouldn't much mind—where the firing comes
from ?"
" Lord bless the boy 1" exclaimed my sister, as if she didn't
quite mean that, but rather the contrary. " From the Hulks."
" Oh-ho 1" said I, looking at Joe. " Hulks 1"
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 33
Joe gave a reproachful cough, as much as to say, " Well, I
told you so."
'- And please what's Hulks ?" said I.
"That's the way with this boy 1" exclaimed my sister, point
ing me out with her needle and thread, and shaking her head.
" Answer him one question, and he'll ask you a dozen directly.
Hulks are prison-ships, right 'cross th' meshes." We always
used that name for marshes, in our country.
" I wonder who's put into prison-ships, and why they're
put there ?" said I, in a general way, and with desperation.
It was too much for Mrs. Joe, who immediately rose. "I
tell you what, young man," said she, " I didn't bring you up
by hand to badger people's lives out. It would be blame to
me, and not praise, if I had. People are put in the Hulks
because they murder, and because they rob, and do all sorts
of bad; and they almost always begin by asking questions.
Now you get along to bed I"
I was never allowed a candle to light me to bed, and, as I
went up stairs in the dark, with my head tingling from Mrs.
Joe's thimble, having played the tambourine upon it to ac
company her last words, I felt fearfully sensible of the great
convenience that the Hulks were handy for me. I was clearly
on my way there. I had begun by asking questions, and I was
going to rob Mrs. Joe.
Since that time, which is far enough away now, I have
often thought that few people know what secrecy there is in
the young, under terror. No matter how unreasonable the
terror, so that it be terror. I was in mortal terror of the
young man who wanted my heart and liver ; I was in mortal
terror of my interlocutor with the ironed leg ; I was in mortal
terror of myself, from whom an awful promise had been ex
tracted ; I had no hope of deliverance through my all-powerful
sister, who repulsed me at every turn ; I am afraid to think,
even now, of what I might have done, upon requirement, in
the secrecy of my terror.
If I slept at all that night, it was only to imagine myself
drifting down the river on a strong spring tide to the Hulks ;
a ghostly pirate calling out to me through a speaking trumpet,
as I passed the gibbet-station, that I had better come ashore,
2
84 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
and be hanged there at once, and not put it off. I was afraid
to sleep, even if I had been inclined, for I knew that at the
first faint dawn of morning I must rob the pantry. There was
no getting a light by easy friction then ; to have got one I
must have struck it out of flint and steel, and have made a
noise like the very pirate himself rattling his chains.
As soon as the great black velvet pall outside my little
window was shot with gray, I got up and went down stairs :
every board upon the way, and every crack in every board,
calling after me "Stop thief 1" and "Get up, Mrs. Joe!" In
the pantry, which was far more abundantly supplied than
usual, owing to the season, I was very much alarmed by a
hare hanging up by the heels, whom I rather thought I caught,
when my back was half turned, waking. I had no time for
verification, no time for selection, no time for any thing, for I
had no time to spare. I stole some bread, some rind of cheese,
about half ajar of mince-meat (which I tied up in my pockethandkerchief
with my last night's slice), some brandy from a
stone bottle (which I decanted into a glass bottle I had secretly
used for making that intoxicating fluid, Spanish-liquoricewater,
up in my room : diluting the stone bo.ttle from a jug
in the kitchen cupboard), a meat bone with very little on it,
and a beautiful round, compact pork-pie. I was nearly going
away without the pie, but I was tempted to mount upon a
shelf to look what it was that was put away so carefully in a
covered earthenware dish in a corner, and I found it was the
pie, and I took it in the hope that it was not intended for
early use, and would not be missed for some time.
There was a door in the kitchen communicating with the
forge ; I unlocked and unbolted that door, and got a file from
among Joe's tools. Then I put the fastenings as I had found
them, opened the door at which I had entered when I ran
home last night, shut it, and ran for the misty marshes.
CHAPTER III.
It was a rimy morning, and very damp. I had seen the
damp lying on the outside of my little window, as if some
goblin had been crying there all night, and using the window
for a pocket-handkerchief. Now I saw the damp lying on the
bare hedges and spare grass, like a coarser sort of spiders'
webs ; hanging itself from twig to twig and blade to blade.
On every rail and gate wet lay clammy ; and the marsh mist
was so thick that the wooden finger on the post, directing
people to our village —a direction which they never accepted,
for they never came there—was invisible to me until I was quite
close under it. Then, as I looked up at it, while it dripped,
it seemed, to my oppressed conscience like a phantom devot
ing me to the Hulks.
The mist was heavier yet when I got out upon the marshes,
so that, instead of my running at every thing, every thing
seemed to run at me. This was very disagreeable to a quiet
mind. The gates and dikes and banks came bursting at me
through the mist, as if they cried as plainly as could be, "A
boy with a pork-pie 1 Stop him 1" The black cattle came
upon me with like suddenness, staring out of their eyes, and
smoking out of their nostrils, "Halloa, young thief 1" One
black ox, with a white cravat on—who had to my awakened
conscience something of a clerical air—fixed me so steadily
with his eyes, and moved his blunt head round in such an ac
cusatory manner as I moved round, that I called out to him,
" I couldn't help it ! It wasn't for myself I took it I" Upon
which he put down his head, blew a cloud of smoke out of his
nose, and vanished with a kick-up of his hind leg and flourish
of his tail.
All this time I was getting on toward the river ; but how
ever fast I went; I couldn't warm my feet, to which the damp
<35)
M GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
cold seemed riveted, as the iron was riveted to the leg of the
man I was running to meet. I knew my way to the Battery
pretty straight, for I had been down there on a Sunday with
Joe, and Joe had, sitting on an old gun, told me that when I
was 'prentice to him regularly bound, we would have such
I,arks there as should recompense us for our constraint at
home. However, in the confusion of the mist, I found myself
at last too far to the right, and consequently had to try back
along the river-side, on the bank of loose stones above the
mud and the stakes that staked the tide out, to come at the
Battery. Making my way along here with all dispatch, I had
just crossed a ditch which I knew to be very near the Battery,
and had just scrambled up the mound beyond the ditch, when
I saw the man sitting before me. His back was toward me,
and he had got his arms folded, and was nodding forward
heavy with sleep. I thought he would be more glad if I came upon him with
his breakfast in that unexpected manner, so I went forward
softly and touched him on the shoulder. He instantly jumped
up, and it was not the man, but another man 1
And yet he was dressed in coarse gray, too, and had a
great iron on his leg, and was lame, and hoarse, and cold, and
was every thing that the other man was ; except that he had
not the same face, and had a flat, broad-brimmed, low-crowned
felt hat on. All this I saw in a moment, for I had only a
moment to see it in ; he swore an oath at me, made a hit
at me—it was a round weak blow that missed me and almost
knocked himself down, for it made him stumble—and then
he ran into the mist, tumbling twice as he went, and I lost
him." It's the young man 1" I thought. I felt my heart shoot as
I identified him ; and I dare say I should have felt a pain in my
liver, too, if I had known where it was.
I was soon at the Battery after that, and there was the man
—hugging himself and limping to and fro, as if he had never
all night left off hugging and limping—waiting for me. He
was awfully cold, to be sure. I half expected to see him drop
down before my face and die of cold. His eyes looked so
awfully hungry, too, that when I handed him the file it occurred
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 37
to me he would have tried to eat it, if he had not seen my
bundle. He did not turn me upside down, this time, to get
at what I had, but left me right side upward while I opened
the bundle and emptied my pockets.
" What's in the bottle, boy ?" said he.
" Brandy," said I.
He was already handing mince-meat down his throat in
the most curious manner, more like a man who was putting
it away somewhere in a violent hurry than a man who was
eating it—but he left off to take some of the liquor, shivering
all the while so violently that it was quite as much as he could
do to keep the neck of the bottle between his teeth.
" I think you have got the ague," said I.
" I'm much of your opinion, boy," said he.
"It's bad about here. You've been lying out on the ->
meshes, and they're dreadful aguish. Rheumatic, too."
" I'll eat my breakfast afore they're the death of me,"
said he. " I'd do that, if I was going to be strung up to that
there gallows as there is over there directly arterward. I'll
beat the shivers so far, I'll bet you a guinea."
He was gobbling mince-meat, meat, bone, bread, cheese,
and pork-pie all at once : staring distrustfully while he did so
at the mist all round us, and often stopping—even stopping
his jaws—to listen. Some real or fancied sound, some clink
upon the river or breathing of beasts upon the marsh, now
gave him a start, and he said, suddenly :
"You're not a false imp? You brought no one with
you ?"
"No, sir! No!"
" Nor give no one the office to follow you ?"
"No!" " Well," said he, " I believe you. You'd be but a fierce
young hound indeed, if at your time of life you could
help to hunt a wretched warmint, hunted as near death and
dunghill as this poor wretched warmint is 1"
Something clicked in his throat, as if he had works in him
like a clock, and was going to strike. And he smeared his
ragged, rough sleeve over his eyes.
Pitying his desolation, and watching him as he gradually
38 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
settled down upon the pie, I made bold to say, " I am glad you
enjoy it."
" Did you speak ? "
" I said I was glad you enjoyed it."
"Thankee, my boy. I do."
I had often watched a large dog of ours eating his food ; and
I now noticed a decided similarity between the dog's way of
eating and the man's. The man took strong, sharp, sudden
bites, just like the dog. He swallowed, or rather snapped
up, every mouthful too soon and too fast ; and he looked side
ways here and there while he ate, as if he thought there was
danger of somebody's coming to take the pie away. He was
altogether too unsettled in his mind over it to appreciate it
comfortably, I thought, or to have any body to dine with him,
without making a chop with his jaws at the visitor. In all
of which particulars he was very like the dog.
"You won't leave any of it for him," said I, timidly, after
a silence during which I had hesitated as to the politeness of
making the remark. " There's no more to be got where that
came from." It was the certainty of this fact that impelled me
to offer the hint.
" Leave for him ? Who's him?" said my friend, stopping in
his crunching of pie-crust.
" The young man. That you spoke of. That was hid with
you."
" Oh, ah 1" he returned, with something like a gruff laugh.
"Him? Yes, yes 1 He don't want no wittles."
" I thought he looked as if he did," said I.
The man stopped eating, and regarded me with the closest
scrutiny and the greatest surprise.
" Looked ? When ?"
" Just now 1"
" Where ?"
" Yonder," said I, pointing ; " over there, where I found
him nodding asleep, and thought it was you."
He held me by the collar and stared at me so, that I began
to think his first idea about cutting my throat had revived.
" Dressed like you, you know, only with a hat," I explained,
trembling; "and—and"—I was very anxious to put it delicately
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 39
—"and with—the same reason for wanting to borrow a file
Didn't you hear the gun last night?"
" Then there was firing 1" he said to himself.
" I wonder you shouldn't have been sure of that," I returned,
"for we heard it up at home, and that's further away, and we
were shut in besides."
"Why, see now 1" said he. "When a man's alone on these
flats, with a light head and a light stomach, perishin' of cold
and want, he hears nothin' all night but guns firin', and voices
callin'. Hears ? He sees the soldiers with their red coats,
lij-hted up by the torches carried afore, closin' in round
him. Hears his number called, hears himself challenged, hears
the rattle of the muskets, hears the orders, ' Make ready 1
Present ! —Cover him steady, men 1' and is laid hands on, and
there's nothing 1 Why, if I see one pursuing party last night
—coming up in order, Damn 'em, with their tramp, tramp—
I see a hundred. And as to firin' 1 Why, I see the mist
shake with the cannon, when it was broad day. —But this man"
—he had said all the rest as if he had forgotten my being
there—''did you notice any thing in him ?"
" He had a bruised face," said I, recalling what I hardly
knew I knew.
" Not here ?" exclaimed the man, striking his left cheek
with the flat of his hand.
"Yes! There 1"
" Where is he ?" He crammed what little food was left into
the breast of his gray jacket. " Show me the way he went.
I'll pull him down like a blood-hound. Curse this iron on my
sore leg 1 Give us hold of the file, boy."
I indicated in what direction. The mist had shrouded the
other man, and he looked up at it for an instant. But he was
down on the rank wet grass, filing at his iron like a madman,
and not minding me or minding his own leg, which had an old
chafe upon it and was bloody, but which he handled as roughly
as if it had no more feeling in it than the file. I was very
much afraid of him again, now that he had worked himself into
this fierce hurry, and I was likewise very much afraid of keeping
away from home any longer. I told him I must go, but he
took no notice, so I thought the best thing I could do was to
40 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
slip off. The last I saw of him, his head was bent over his
knee, and he was working hard at his fetter, muttering impa
tient imprecations at it and at his leg. The last I heard of
him, I stopped in the mist to listen, and the file was still
going.
CHAPTER IV.
I fully expected to find a constable in the kitchen, waiting
to take me up. But not only was there no constable there,
but no discovery had yet been made of the robbery. Mrs
Joe was prodigiously busy in getting the house ready for the
festivities of the day, and Joe had been put upon the kitchen
door-step to keep him out of the dust-pan—an article into
which his destiny always led him sooner or later when my sister
was vigorously reaping the floors of her establishment.
" And where the deuce ha' you been ?" was Mrs. Joe's Christ
mas salutation, when I and my conscience showed ourselves.
I said I had been down to hear the Carols. "Ah 1 well !"
observed Mrs. Joe. "You might ha' done worse." "Not a
doubt of it," I thought.
"Perhaps if I warn't a blacksmith's wife, and (what's the
same thing) a slave with her apron never off, I should have
been to hear the Carols," said Mrs. Joe. "I'm rather partial
to Carols myself, and that's the best of reasons for my never
hearing any."
Joe, who had ventured into the kitchen after me as the dust
pan retired before us, drew the back of his hand across his
nose with a conciliatory air when Mrs. Joe darted a look at
him, and, when her eyes were withdrawn, secretly crossed
his two forefingers, and exhibited them to iue, as our token that
Mrs. Joe was in a cross temper. This was so much her normal
state, that Joe and I would often, for weeks together, be, as
to our fingers, like monumental Crusaders as to their legs.
We were to have a superb dinner, consisting of a leg of
pickled pork, and greens, and a pair of roast stuffed fowls. A
handsome mince-pie had been made yesterday morning (which
accounted for the mince-meat not being missed), and the pud
ding was already on the boil. These extensive arrangements
occasioned us to be cut off unceremoniously in respect of break
(41)
42 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
fast, "fori an't," said Mrs. Joe, "I an't a going to have no
cramming and gorging and washing up now, with what I've got
before me, I promise you 1"
So we had our slices served out, as if we were two thousand
troops on a forced march, instead of a man and boy at home;
and we took gulps of milk and water, with apologetic counte
nances, from a jug on the dresser. In the meantime Mrs. Joe
put clean white curtains up, and tacked a new flowered
flounce across the wide chimney to replace the old one, and
uncovered the little state parlor across the passage, which was
never uncovered at any other time, but passed the rest of the
year in a cool haze of silver paper, which even extended to the
four little white crockery poodles on the mantle shelf, each with
a black nose, and a basket of flowers in his mouth, and each the
counterpart of the other. Mrs. Joe was a very clean house
keeper, but had an exquisite art of making her cleanliness more
uncomfortable and unacceptable than dirt itself. Cleanliness
is next to Godliness, and some people do the same by their
religion.
My sister having so much to do, was going to church vica
riously ; that is to say, Joe and I were going. In his working
clothes Joe was a well-knit, characteristic-looking blacksmith ;
in his holiday clothes, he was more like a scarecrow in good
circumstances than any thing else. Nothing that he wore then
fitted him or seemed to belong to him, and every thing that he
wore then grazed him. On the present festive occasion he
emerged from his room, when the blithe bells were going, the
picture of misery in a full suit of Sunday penitentials. As to
me, I think my sister must have had some general idea that I
was a young offender whom an Accoucheur Policeman had taken
up (on my birthday), and delivered over to her to be dealt with
according to the outraged majesty of the law. I was always
treated as if I had insisted on being born in opposition to the
dictates of reason, religion, and morality, and against the dis
suading arguments of my best friends ; even when I was taken
to have a new suit of clothes, the tailor had orders to make
them like a kind of Reformatory, and on no account to let me
have the use of my limbs.
Joe and I going to church, therefore, must have been a mov
GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
lug spectacle for compassionate minds. Yet what I suffered
outside was nothing to what I underwent within. The terrors
that had assailed me whenever Mrs. Joe had gone near the
pantry or out of the room, were only to be equaled by the
remorse with which my mind dwelt on what my hands had done.
Under the weight of my wicked secret I pondered whether the
Church would be powerful enough to shield me from the ven
geance of the terrible young man, if I divulged it to that
establishment. I conceived the idea that the time when the bans
were read and when the clergyman said, " Ye are now to de
clare it 1" would be the time for me to rise and propose a
private audience in the vestry. I am far from being quite sure
that I might not have astonished our small congregation by
resorting to this extreme measure, but for its being Christmas
Day and no Sunday.
Mr. Wopsle, the clerk at church, was to dine with us; and
Mr. Hubble the wheel-wright and Mrs. Hubble; and Uncle
Pumblechook (Joe's uncle, but Mrs. Joe appropriated him),
who was a well-to-do corn-chandler in the nearest town, and
drove his own chaise-cart. The dinner hour was half-past one.
When Joe at.d I got home we found the table laid, and Mrs.
Joe dressed, and the dinner dressing, and the front door un
locked (it never was at any other time) for the company to enter
by, and every thing most splendid. And still, not a word of
the robbery.
The time came without bringing with it any relief to my feel
ings, and the company came. Mr. Wopsle, united to a Roman
nose and a large bald forehead, had a deep sonorous voice which
he was proud of ; indeed it was understood among his acquaint
ance that if you could only give him his head he would read
the clergyman into fits ; he himself confessed that if the Church
was "thrown open," meaning to competition, he would not
despair of making his mark in it. The Church not being
" thrown open," he was, as I have said, our clerk. But he fin
ished the Amens tremendously ; and when he gave out the
psalm—always giving us the whole verse—he looked all round
the congregation first, as much as to say, " You have heard my
friend overhead; oblige me with your opinion of this!"
I opened the door to the company—making believe that it
44 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
was a habit of ours to open that door—and I opened it first
to Mr. Wopsle, next to Mr. and Mrs. Hubble, and last of all
to Uncle Pumblechook. N. B. I was not allowed to call him
uncle under the severest penalties.
" Mrs. Joe," said Uncle Pumblechook, who was a large,
hard-breathing, middle-aged, slow man, with a mouth like a fish,
dull staring eyes, and sandy hair standing upright on his head,
so that he looked as if he had just been choked, and had
that very moment come to, " I have brought you, as the com
pliments of the season—I have brought you, Mum, a bottle
of sherry wine, and I have brought you, Mum, a bottle of port
wine."
Every Christmas Day he presented himself, as a profound
novelty, with exactly the same words, and carrying the two
bottles like dumb-bells. Every Christmas Day, Mrs. Joe re
plied, as she now replied, " Oh, Un—cle Pum —ble—chook 1
This is kind 1" Every Christmas Day, he retorted, as he now
retorted, " It's no more than your merits. And how are you
all —bobbish ? And how's Sixpennorth of half pence 1" mean
ing me.
We dined on these occasions in the kitchen, and adjourned,
for the nuts and oranges and apples, to the parlor; which was
a change very like Joe's change from his working clothes to his
Sunday's dress. My sister was uncommonly lively on the pre
sent occasion, and indeed was generally more gracious in the
society of Mrs. Hubble than in any other company. I remem
ber Mrs. Hubble as a little, sharp-eared person in curly skyblue,
who held a conventionally juvenile position, because she
had married Mr. Hubble—I don't know at what remote period
—when she was much younger than he. I remember Mr.
Hubble as a tough, high-shouldered, stooping old man, of a
saw-dusty fragrance, with his legs extraordinarily wide apart,
so that in my short and early days I always saw some miles of
open country between them when I met him coming up the lane.
Among this good company I should have felt myself, even if
I hadn't rubbed the pantry, in a false position. Not because I
was squeezed in at an acute angle of the table-cloth with the
table in my chest, and the Pumblechookian elbow in my eye ;
not because I was not allowed to speak (I didn't want to speak),
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 45
nor because I was regaled with the scaly tips of the drumstick!
of the fowls, and with those corners of obscure pork of which
the pig, when living, had had the least reason to be vain. No ;
I should not have minded that, if they would only have left me
alone. But they wouldn't leave me alone. They seemed to
think the opportunity lost, if they failed to point the conversa
tion at me every now and then, and stick the point into me. I
might have been an unfortunate little bull in a Spanish arena:
I got so smartingly touched up by these moral goads.
It began the moment we sat down to dinner. Mr. Wopsle
said grace with theatrical declamation, as it now appears to me,
something like a religious cross of the Ghost in Hamlet with
Richard the Third—and ended with the very proper aspiration
that we might be truly grateful. Upon which my sister instantly
fixed me with her eye, and said, in a low, reproachful voice, " Do
you hear that? Be grateful."
" Especially," said Mr. Pumblechook, " be grateful, boy, to
them which brought you up by hand."
Mrs. Hubble shook her head, and contemplating me with
a mournful presentiment that I should come to no good, asked,
" Why is it that the young are never grateful ?" This mystery
seemed too much for the company until Mr. Hubble tersely
solved it by saying, "Naturally wicious." Everybody then
murmured " Ah 1" and " True 1" and looked at me in a particu
larly unpleasant and personal manner.
Joe's station and influence were something feebler (if possible)
when there was company than when there was none. But he
always aided and abetted when he could, in some way of his own,
and he always did so at dinner-time by giving me gravy, if there
were any. There being plenty of gravy to-day, Joe spooned
into my plate, at this point, about half-a-pint.
A little later on in the dinner, Mr. Wopsle reviewed the
sermon with some severity, and intimated in the usual hypo
thetical case of the Church being " thrown open," what kind
of sermon he would have given them. After favoring them with
some heads of that discourse, he remarked that he considered
the subject of the day's homily ill chosen ; which was the less
excusable, he added, when there were so many subjects "going
about."
46 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
" True again," said Uncle Pumblechook. " You've hit it—
plenty of subjects going about, for them that know how to put
salt upon their tails. That's what's wanted. A man needn't go
far to find a subject if he's ready with his salt box. Why,"
added Mr. Pumblechook, after a short interval of deep reflec
tion, " look at Pork alone. There's a subject 1 If you want
subject, look at Pork 1"
" True, Sir. Many a moral for the young," returned Mr.
Wopsle ; and I knew he was going to bring me in before ho
said it, "might be deducted from that text."
(" You listen to this," said my sister to me, in a severe paren
thesis.)
Joe gave me some more gravy.
" Swine," pursued Mr. Wopsle, in his deepest voice, and
pointing his fork at my blushes as if he were mentioning my
Christian name—" Swine were the companions of the prodigal.
The gluttony of Swine is set before us as an example to the
young." (I thought this pretty well in him who had been
praising up the pork for being so plump and juicy.) "What
is detestable in a pig is more detestable in a boy."
" Or girl," suggested Mr. Hubble.
"Of course, or girl," assented Mr. Wopsle, rather irritably;
"but there is no girl present."
"Besides," said Mr. Pumblechook, turning sharp on me,
"think what you've got to be grateful for. If you'd been born
a squeaker—"
" He was, if ever a child was," said my sister, most emphat
ically. Joe gave me some more gravy.
" Well, but I mean a four-footed squeaker," said Mr. Pumble
chook. " If you had been born such, would you have been here
now ? Not you —"
"Unless in that form," said Mr. Wopsle, nodding toward the
dish." But I don't mean in that form, Sir," returned Mr. Pumble
chook, who had an objection to being interrupted ; " I mean
enjoying himself with his elders and betters, and improving
himself with their conversation, and rolling in the lap of luxury.
Would he have been doing that ? No, he wouldn't. And
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 47
what would have been your destination ?" turning on me again.
" You would have been disposed of for so many shillings, ac
cording to the market price of the article, and Dunstable, the
butcher, would have come up to you as you lay in your straw,
and he would have whipped you under his left arm, and with
his right he would have tucked up his frock to get a penknife
from out of his waistcoat-pocket, and he would have shed your
blood and had your life. No bringing up by hand then. Not
a bit of it!"
Joe offered me more gravy, which I was afraid to take.
" He was a world of trouble to you, Ma'am,'' said Mrs.
Hubble, commiserating my sister.
Trouble ?" echoed my sister ; " trouble " And then entered
on a fearful catalogue of all the illnesses I had been guilty of,
and all the acts of sleeplessness I had committed, and all the
high places I had tumbled from, and all the low places I had
tumbled into, and all the injuries I had done myself, and all
the times she had wished me in my grave, and I had contuma
ciously refused to go there.
I think the Romans must have aggravated one another very
much with their noses. Perhaps they became the restless
people they were in consequence. Anyhow, Mr. Wopsle's
Roman nose so aggravated me, during the recital of my misde
meanors, that I should have liked to pull it until he howled.
But all I had endured up to this time was nothing in compar
ison with the awful feeling that took possession of me when the
pause was broken which ensued upon my sister's recital, and in
which pause everybody had looked at me (as I felt deeply conscious)
with indignation and abhorrence.
"Yet," said Mr. Pumblechook, leading the company gently
back to the theme from which they had strayed, " Pork—
regarded as biled—is rich, too ; ain't it ?"
" Have a little brandy, uncle ?" said my sister.
O Heavens, it had come at last 1 He would fiiid it was weak,
he would say it was weak, and I was lost 1 I held tight to the
leg of the table with both hands, and awaited my fate.
My sister went for the stone bottle, came back with the stone
bottle, and poured his brandy out, no one else taking any. The
wretched man trifled with his glass—took it up, looked at it
48 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
through the light, put it down—prolonged my misery. All
this time Mrs. Joe and Joe were busily clearing the table for
the pie and pudding.
I couldn't keep my eyes off him. Always holding tight by
the leg of the table with my hands and feet, I saw the miserable
creature finger his glass playfully, take it up, smile, throw his
head back, and drink the brandy off. Instantly afterward the
company were seized with unspeakable consternation, owing to
his springing to his feet, turning round several times in an appalling
spasmodic, hooping-cough dance, and rushing out at the
door ; he then became visible through the window, violently
stamping and expectorating, making the most hideous faces,
and apparently out of his mind.
I held on tight, while Mrs. Joe and Joe ran to him. I
didn't know how I had done it, but I had no doubt I had
murdered him somehow. In my dreadful situation it was a re
lief when he was brought back, and surveying the company all
round, as if they had disagreed with him, sank down into his
chair with the one significant gasp, " Tar 1"
I had filled up the bottle from the tar-water jug. I knew
he would be worse by-and-by. I moved the table, like a
Medium of the present day, by the vigor of my unseen grasp
upon it.
"Tar!" cried my sister, in amazement. "Why, however
could it come there ?"
But Uncle Pumblechook, who was omnipotent in that
kitchen, wouldn't bear the word, wouldn't hear the subject men
tioned, imperiously waved it all away with his hand, and asked
for hot gin and water. My sister, who had begun to be alarm
ingly meditative, had to employ herself actively in getting the
gin, the hot water, the sugar, and the lemon-peel, and mixing
them. For the time, at least, I was saved. I still held on the
leg of the table, but clutched it now with the fervor of gratitude.
By degrees I became calm enough to release my grasp and
partake of pudding. Mr. Pumblechook partook of pudding.
All partook of pudding. The course terminated, and Mr.
Pumblechook had begun to beam under the genial influence
of the gin and water. I began to think I should get over the
day when my sister said to Joe, " Clear plates—cold."
GREAT EXPECTATIONS 40
I clutched the leg of the table again immediately, and pressed
it to my bosom as if it had been the companion of my youth
and friend of my soul. I foresaw what was coming, and I felt
that this time I really was gone.
" You must taste," said my sister, addressing the guests
with her best grace, " you must really taste, to finish with, such
a delightful and delicious present of Uncle Pumblechook's 1"
Must they 1 Let them not hope it !
"You must know," said my sister, rising, "it's a pie—a
savory pork-pie."
The company murmured their compliments; and Uncle
Pumblechook, sensible of having deserved well of bis fellowcreatures,
and having distinguished himself by his gift, said
vivaciously, all things considered, "Well, Mrs. Joe, we'll do
our best endeavors ; let us have a cut at this same pie."
My sister went out to get it I heard her steps proceed to
the pantry. I saw Mr. Pumblechook balance his knife. I
saw reawakening appetite in the Roman nostrils of Mr.
Wopsle. I heard Mr. Hubble remark that "a bit of savory
pork-pie would lay a-top of any thing and do no harm,"
and I heard Joe say, " You shall have some, Pip." I have
never been absolutely certain whether I uttered a shrill cry of
terror merely in spirit, or in the bodily hearing of the company.
I felt that I could hear no more, and that I must run away.
I released the leg of the table, and ran for my life.
But I ran no further than the house door, for there I ran
head foremost into a party of soldiers with their muskets, one
of whom held out a pair of hand-cuffs to me, saying: " Here
you are, look sharp, come on 1"
3
CHAPTER V.
The apparition of a file of soldiers ringing down the butt
end of their loaded muskets on our doorstep caused the dinner
party to rise from table confused, and caused Mrs. Joe re
entering the kitchen empty-handed, to stop short and stare,
after her first wondering lament of "Lord gracious, what's gone
with the pie 1"
The sergeant and I were in the kitchen when Mrs. Joe stood
staring ; at which crisis I partly recovered the use of my senses.
It was the sergeant who had spoken to me, and he was now
looking round at the company, with his hand-cuffs invitingly
extended toward them in his right hand, and his left on my
shoulder.
"Excuse me, ladies and gentlemen," said the sergeant, "but
as I have mentioned at the door to this young shaver (which
he hadn't), I am on a chase for the King, and I want the
blacksmith."
"And pray what might you want with him?" retorted my
sister, quick to resent his being wanted at all.
" Missus," returned the gallant sergeant, "speaking for my
self, I should reply, the honor and pleasure of his wife's ac
quaintance ; speaking for the King, I answer a little job done."
This was received as rather neat in the sergeant ; insomuch
that Mr. Pumblechook cried audibly, "Good agam1"
" You see, blacksmith," said the sergeant, who had by this
time picked out Joe with his eye, " we have had an accident
with these, and find the lock of one of 'em goes wrong, and
the coupling don't act pretty. As they are wanted for im
mediate service, will you throw your eye over them ?"
Joe threw his eye over them, and pronounced that the job
would necessitate the lighting of his forge fire, and would take
nearer two houm than one. " Then will you set about it at
(60)
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 51
once, blacksmith, " said the sergeant, " as it's on his Majesty's
service ; and if my men can bear a hand any where, they'll make
themselves useful." With that he called to his men, who came
trooping into the kitchen one after another, and piled their
arms in a corner. And there they stood about as soldiers do;
now, with their hands loosely clasped before them ; now, rest
ing a knee or a shoulder ; now, easing a belt or a pouch ; now,
opening the door to spit stiffly over their high stocks out into
the yard.
All these things I saw without knowing that I saw them, for
I was in mortal terror. But, beginning to perceive that the
handcuffs were not for me, and that the military had so far got
the better of the pie as to put it in the back ground for the
moment, I collected a little more of my scattered wits.
"Would you give me the time ?" said the sergeant, address
ing himself to Mr. Pumblechook, as a man whose appreciative
powers justified the inference that he was equal to the time.
" It's just gone half past two."
"That's not so bad," said the sergeant, reflecting; "even if
I were forced to halt here nigh two hours, that'll do. How far
might you call yourselves from the marshes here ? Not above
a mile, I reckon ?"
"Just a mile," said Mrs. Joe.
" That'll do. We begin to close in upon 'em about dusk.
A little before dusk, my orders are. That'll do."
" Convicts, sergeant ?" said Mr. Wopsle, in a matter-ofcourse
way.
" Ay 1" returned the sergeant, "two. They're pretty well
known to be out on the marshes still, and they won't try to get
clear of 'em before dusk. Any body here seen any thing of
any such game ?"
Every body, myself excepted, said no, with confidence. No
body thought of me.
" Well 1" said the sergeant, they'll find themselves trapped
in a circle, I expect, sooner than they count on. Now, black
smith 1 If you're ready, the King is."
Joe had got his coat and waistcoat and cravat off, and his
leather apron on, and passed into the forge. One of the
soldiers opened its wooden windows, another lighted the fire,
52 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
another turned to at the bellows the rest stood round the
blaze, which was soon roaring. Then Joe began to hammer
and clink, hammer and clink, and all looked on.
The interest of the impending pursuit not only absorbed
the general attention, but even made my sister generous. She
drew a pitcher of beer from the cask for the soldiers, and
invited the sergeant to take a glass of brandy. But Mr. Pumblechook
said, sharply, " Give him wine, mum. I'll engage
there's no Tar in that ;" so the sergeant thanked him and said
that, as he preferred his drink without tar, he would take wine,
if it was equally convenient. When it was given him he drank
his Majesty's health and Compliments of the Season, and took
It all at a mouthful and smacked his lips.
" Good stuff, eh, sergeant ?" said Mr. Pumblechook.
"I'll tell you something," returned the sergeant; " I suspect
that stuff's of your providing."
Mr. Pumblechook, with a fat sort of laugh, said, "Ay, ay?
Why?"
"Because," returned the sergeant, clapping him on the
shoulder, "you're a man that knows what's what."
"D'ye think so ?" said Mr. Pumblechook, with his former
laugh. " Have another glass."
"With you. Hob and nob," returned the sergeant. "The
top of mine to the foot of yours, the foot of yours to the top
of mine. Ring once, ring twice, the best tune on the Musical
Glasses 1 Your health. May you live a thousand years, and
never be a worse judge of the right sort than at the present
moment of your life 1"
The sergeant tossed off his glass again and seemed quite
ready for more. I noticed that Mr. Pumblechook in his hos
pitality appeared to forget that he had made a present of the
wine, but took the bottle from Mrs. Joe and had all the credit
of handing it about in a gush of joviality. Even I got some.
And he was so very free of the wine that he even called for
the other bottle, and handed that about with the same liberality
when the first was gone.
As I watched them while they all stood clustered about the
forge enjoying themselves so much, I thought what terrible
good sauce for a dinner my fugitive friend in the marshes waa

THEN JOE BEGAN TO HAMMER AND CLINK, HAMMER AND CLINK.

GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 53
They had not enjoyed themselves a quarter so much before
the entertainment was brightened with the excitement he fur
nished. And now, when they were all in lively expectation
of those two villains being taken, and when the bellows seemed
to roar for them, the fire to flare for them, the smoke to hurry
out in pursuit of them, Joe to hammer and clink for them, and
all the murky shadows on the wall to stare at them in menace
as the blaze rose and sank, and the red-hot sparks dropped and
died, the pale afternoon outside almost seemed, in my pitying
young fancy, to have turned pale on their account, poor
wretches 1
At last, Joe's job was done, and the ringing and roaring
stopped. As Joe got on his coat, he mustered courage to pro
pose that some of us should go down with the soldiers and see
what came of the hunt. Mr. Pumblechook and Mr. Hubble
declined, on the plea of a pipe and ladies' society ; but Mr.
Wopsle said he would go if Joe would. Joe said he was
agreeable, and he would take me, if Mrs. Joe approved. We
never should have got leave to go, I am sure, but for Mrs
Joe's curiosity to know all about it and how it ended. As it
was, she merely stipulated, " If you bring the boy back with
his head blown off by a musket, don't say it was my doing."
The sergeant took a polite leave of the ladies, and parted
from Mr. Pumblechook as from a comrade : though I doubted
if he were quite as fully sensible of that gentleman's merits
under arid conditions as when something to drink was going.
His men resumed their muskets and fell in. Mr. Wopsle, Joe,
and I, received strict charge to keep in the rear, and to speak
no word after we reached the marshes. When we were all out
in the raw air and steadily moving toward our business, I
treasonably whispered to Joe, " I hope, Joe, we sha'n't find
them ;" and Joe whispered to me, " I'd give a shilling if they
had cut and run, Pip."
We were joined by no stragglers from our village, for
the weather was cold and threatening, the way dreary, the
footing bad, dusk coming on, and the people had good fires
in-doors and were keeping the day. A few faces hurried to
glowing windows and looked after us, but none came out.
We passed the finger-post, and held straight on to the church
51 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
yard. There we were stopped a few minutes by a signal from
the sergeant's hand, while two or three of his men dispersed
themselves among the graves, and examined the porch. They
came in again without finding any thing, and then we struck
out on the open marshes, through the gate at the side of the
church-yard. A bitter sleet came rattling against us on the
east wind, and Joe took me on his back.
Now that we were out upon the dismal wilderness, where
they little thought I had been within eight or nine hours and
had seen both men hiding, I considered, for the first time, with
great dread, if we should come upon them, would my particular
convict suppose that it was I who had brought the soldiers
there ? He had asked me if I was a deceiving imp, and he
had said I should be a fierce young hound if I joined the
hunt against him. Wou'id he believe that I was both imp
>. and hound in treacherous earnest, and had betrayed him ?
It was of no use asking myself this question now. There
I was, on Joe's back, and there was Joe beneath me, charging
out the ditches in the nimblest manner, and stimulating Mr.
Wopsle not to tumble on his Roman nose, and to keep up
with us. The soldiers were in front of us, extended into a
> pretty wide line with an interval between man and man. We
were taking the exact course I had begun with, and from which
I had diverged in the mist. Either the mist was not out again
yet, or the wind had moved it. Under the low red glare of
sunset the beacon, and the gibbet, and the mound of the
Battery, and the opposite shore of the river, were plain enough,
though all of a watery lead color.
With my heart thumping like a small blacksmith at Joe's
broad shoulder, I looked all about for any sign of the convicts.
I could see none, I could hear none. Mr. Wopsle had
greatly alarmed me more than once by his blowing and hard
breathing ; but I knew the sounds by this time, and could
dissociate them from the object of pursuit. I got a dreadful
start, and thought I heard the file still going; but it was only
a sheep-bell. The sheep stopped in their eating and looked
timidly at us ; and the cattle, their heads turned from the wind
and sleet, stared angrily, as if they held us responsible for
both these annoyances : but, except these things, and the shud«
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 55
der of the whole dying day, there was no break in the uniform ^
stillness of the marshes.
The soldiers were moving on in the direction of the old
Battery, and we were moving on a little way behind them,
when, all of a sudden, we all stopped. For there had reached
us, on the wings of the wind and rain, a long shout. It was
repeated. It was at a distance toward the east, but it was
long and loud. Nay, there seemed to be two shouts raised
together—if one might judge from a confusion in the sound.
To this effect the sergeant and the nearest men were speaking
under their breath when Joe and I came up. After another
moment's listening, Joe (who was a good judge) agreed, and
Mr. Wopsle (who was a bad judge) also agreed. The sergeant,
a quick, decisive man, ordered that the sound should not be
answered, but that the course should be changed, and that his
men should make toward it " at the double." So we slanted
to the right (where the East was), and Joe pounded away so
wonderfully that I had to hold on tight to keep my seat.
It was a run indeed now, and what Joe called, in the only
two words he spoke all the time, "a buster." Down banks
and up banks, and over gates, and splashing into dikes: no
man cared where he went. As we came nearer to the shouting,
it became more and more apparent that it was made by more
than one voice. Sometimes it seemed to stop altogether,
and then the soldiers stopped. When it broke out again the
soldiers made for it at a greater rate than ever, and we after
them. After a while we had so run it down that we could
hear one voice calling "Murder!" and another voice, "Con
victs 1 Runaways 1 Guard 1 guard 1 This way for the runa
way convicts !" Then both voices would seem to be stifled in
a struggle, and then would break out again. And when it had
come to this the soldiers ran like deer, and Joe too.
The sergeant run in first, when we had run the noise quite
down, and two of his men ran in close upon him. Their pieces
were cocked and leveled when we all ran in.
" Here are lots more 1" panted the sergeant, struggling with
something at the bottom of a ditch. "Surrender, you two 1
and confound you for two wild beasts 1 Come asunder 1"
Water was splashing, and mud was splashing, and oaths
66 GEEAT EXPECTATIONS.
were being sworn, and blows were being struck, when half a
dozen more men went down into the ditch to help the sergeant,
and dragged out, separately, my convict and the other one.
Both were bleeding and panting and execrating and strug
gling ; but of course I knew them both directly.
" Mind 1" said my convict, wiping blood from his face, with
his ragged sleeves, and shaking torn hair from his fingers ; " I
took him I /giv' him up to you! Mind that!"
"It's not much to be particular about!" said the sergeant,
coolly ; " It'll do you small good, my man, being in the same
plight yourself. Handcuffs there!"
" I don't expect it to do me any good. I don't want it to
do me more good than it does now," said my convict, with a
terrible laugh. " I took him. He knows it. That's enough
for me."
The other convict was livid to look at, and, in addition to
the old bruise on the left side of his face, seemed to be bruised
and torn all over. He could not so much as get his breath to
speak, until they were both separately handcuffed, but leaned
upon a soldier to keep himself from falling.
" Take notice, guard, that he tried to murder me," were his
first words.
" Tried to murder him ?" said my convict, disdainfully. " Try,
and not do it 1 I took him, and giv' him up ; that's what I
done. I not only prevented him getting off the marshes, but
I dragged him here—dragged him this far on his way back.
He's a gentleman, if you please, that villain. Now the Hulks
has got its gentleman again, through me. Murder him ? Worth
my while, too, to murder him, when I could do worse and drag
him back 1"
The other one still gasped, "He tried—he tried—to—murder
me. Bear—bear witness."
" Lookee here!" said my convict to the sergeant. "I got
clear of the prison-ship ; I made a dash, and I done it. I could
ha' got clear of these death-cold flats likewise—look at my leg ;
you won't find much iron on it—if I hadn't made discovery
that he was there. Let him go free ? Let him profit by the
means as I found out? Let him make use of me afresh and
again 1 Once more ? No, no, no. If I had died at the bottom
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 67
there"—and he made an emphatic motion at the ditch with his
manacled hands—" I'd have held to him with that grip that you
should have been safe to find him in my hold."
The other fugitive, who was evidently in extreme fear of his
companion., repeated, " He tried to murder me. I should have
been a dead man if you had not come up."
" He lies!" said my convict, with fierce energy. " He always
lies. He's a liar born, and he'll die a liar. Look at his face ;
ain't it written there? Let him turn them eyes of his on me.
I defy him to do it."
The other, with an effort at a scornful smile—which could not,
however, collect the nervous working of his mouth into any set
expression —looked at the soldiers, and looked about at the
marshes and at the sky, but certainly did not look at the speaker.
" Do you see him ?" pursued my convict. " Do you see what
a villain he is? Do you see them groveling and wandering
eyes? That's how he looked when we were tried together.
He never looked at me."
The other, always working and working bis dry lips and
turning his eyes restlessly about him far and near, did at last
turn them for a moment on the speaker, with the words, "You
are not much to look at," and with a half-taunting glance at
the bound hands. At that point my convict became so frantic
ally exasperated that he would have rushed upon him but for
the interposition of the soldiers. " Didn't I tell you," said the
other convict then, "that he would murder me if he could?"
And any one could see that he shook, and that there broke
out upon his lips curious white flukes, like thin snow.
"Enough of this parley," said the sergeant. " Light those
torches."
As one of the soldiers, who carried a basket in lieu of a gun,
went down on his knee to open it my convict looked round
him for the first time and saw me. I had alighted from Joe's
buck on the brink of the ditch when he came up, and had not
moved since. I looked at him eagerly when he looked at me,
and moved my hands and shook my head. I had been waiting
for him to see me, that I might try to assure him of my
innocence. It was not at all expressed to me that he even
comprehended my intention, for he gave me a look that I did
D8 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
not understand, and it all passed in a moment. But if he had
looked at me for an hour or a day, I could not have remem
bered his face ever afterward as having been more attentive.
The soldier with the basket soon got a light, and lighted
three or four torches, and took one himself and distributed
the others. It had been almost dark before, but now it seemed
quite dark, and soon afterward very dark. Before we de
parted from that spot four of the soldiers, standing in a ring,
fired twice into the air. Presently we saw other torches
lighted at some distance behind us, and others on the marshes
on the opposite bank of the river. " All right," said the ser
geant. "March!"
We had not gone far when three cannon were fired ahead of
us with a sound that seemed to burst something inside my ear.
" You are expected on board," said the sergeant to my convict ;
"they know you are coming. Don't straggle, my men. Close
up here."
The two were kept apart, and each walked surrounded by a
separate guard. I had hold of Joe's hand now, and Joe
carried one of the torches. Mr. Wopsle had been for going
back, but Joe was resolved to see it out, so we went on with
the party. There was a reasonably good path now, mostly on
the edge of the river, with a divergence here and there where
a dike came, with a miniature wind-mill on it, and a slimy
sluice-gate. When I looked round I could see the other lights
coming on after us. The torches we carried dropped great
blotches of fire upon the track, and I could see these, too,
smoking and flaring. I could see nothing else but black dark
ness. Our lights warmed the air about us with their pitchy
blaze, and the two wretched men seemed to like that rather as
they limped along in the midst of the muskets. We could
not go fast because of their lameness, and they were so spent
that two or three times we had to halt while they rested.
After an hour or so of this traveling we came to a rough
wooden hut and a landing-place. There was a guard in the
hut, and they challenged us, and the sergeant answered. Then
we went into the hut, where there was a smell of tobacco
and whitewash, and a bright fire, and a lamp, and a stand of
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. B9
muskets, and a drum, and a low wooden bedstead, like an im
mense mangle without the machinery, capable of holding about
a dozen soldiers all at once. Three or four soldiers who lay
upon it were not much interested in us, but just lifted their
heads and took a stare, and then lay down again. The ser
geant made some kind' of report, and some entry in a book,
and then the convict, whom I call the other convict, was
drafted off with his guard to go on board first.
My convict never looked at me, except that once that I have
mentioned. While we stood in the hut he stood before the
fire looking at it, or putting up his miserable feet by turns
upon the hob and looking at them as if he pitied them. Sud
denly he turned to the sergeant, and remarked :
"I wish to say something respecting this escape. It may
prevent some persons lying under suspicion alonger roe."
" You can say what you like," returned the sergeant, stand
ing looking at him with his arms folded ; " but you have no
call to say it here, you know. You'll have opportunity enough
to say about it, and hear about it, before it's done with."
" I know that, but this is another pint, a separate pint. A
man can't starve ; at least I can't. I took some wittles up
at the willage over yonder—where the church stands a'most
out on the marshes."
" You mean stole ?" said the sergeant.
" Ah 1 I'll tell you where from. From the blacksmith's."
" Halloa 1" said the sergeant, staring at Joe.
" Halloa, Pip 1" said Joe, staring at me.
" It was some broken wittles—that's what it was—and a
dram of liquor, and a pie."
" Have you happened to miss such an article as a pie, black
smith ?" asked the sergeant, confidentially.
" Mrs. Joe did, at the very moment when you came in.
Don't you know, Pip ?"
"Oh!" said my convict to Joe, in a moody manner, and
without the least glance at me. " So you're the blacksmith
are you ? Then I'm sorry to say I've eat your pie."
"God knows you're welcome to it—so far as it was ever
mine," returned Joe, with a saving remembrance of Mrs. Joe.
" We don't know what you have done ; but we wouldn't
60 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
have you starved to death for it, miserable fellow-creature
whatever it was.—Would us, Pip ?"
The something that I had noticed before clicked in the man's
throat again, and he turned his back. The boat had returned,
and his guard were ready, so we followed him to the landingplace,
made of rough stakes and stones, and saw him put into
the boat, which was rowed by a crew of convicts like himself.
No one appeared glad to see him, or sorry to see him, or
spoke a word, except that somebody called as if to dogs,
" Give way, you 1" which was the signal for the dip of the oars.
By the light of the torches we saw the black Hulk lying out
a little way from the mud of the shore, like a wicked Noah's
ark ; cribbed, and barred, and anchored by massive rusty chains,
the prison-ship was ironed like the prisoners. We saw the
boat go alongside, and we saw him taken up the side and dis
appear. Then the ends of the torches were flung hissing into
the water, and went out, as if it were all over with him.
CHAPTER VI.
My state of mind regarding the pilfering from which I had
been so unexpectedly exonerated, did not impel me to frank
disclosure; but I hope it had some dregs of good at the bottom >
of it.
I do not recall that I felt any tenderness of conscience in
reference to Mrs Joe when the fear of being found out was
lifted off me. But I loved Joe—perhaps for no better reason
in those early days than because the dear fellow let me love
him—and, as to him, my inner self was not so easily composed.
It was much upon my mind (particularly when I first saw him
looking about for his file) that I ought to tell Joe the whole
truth. Yet I did not, and for the reason that I mistrusted
that if I did he would think me worse than I was. The fear
of losing Joe's confidence, and of thenceforth sitting in the
chimney corner at night staring drearily at my forever lost
companion and friend, tied up my tongue. I morbidly repre
sented to myself that if Joe knew it, I never afterward could
see him at the fireside feeling his fair whisker, without think
ing that he was meditating on it. That if Joe knew it, I never
afterward could see him glance, however casually, at yesterday's
meat or pudding when it came on to-day's table, without
thinking that he was debating whether I had been in the
pantry. That if Joe knew it, and at any subsequent period of
our joint domestic life remarked that his beer was flat or thick,
the conviction that he suspected Tar in it would bring a rush of
blood to my face. In a word, I was too cowardly to do what
I knew to be right, as I had been too cowardly to avoid doing
what I knew to be wrong. I had had no intercourse with peo
ple at that time, and I imitated none of the host of people who
act in this manner ; quite an untaught genius, I made the discov
ery of the line of action for myself.
(61)
82 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
As I was sleepy before we were far away from the prison-ship,
Joe took me on his back again and carried me home. He must
have had a tiresome journey of it, for Mr. Wopsle, being
knocked up, was in such a very bad temper that if the Church
had been thrown open he probably would have excommunicated
the whole expedition, beginning with Joe and myself. In his
simple lay capacity he simply persisted in sitting down in the
damp to such an insane extent, that, when his coat was taken
off to be dried at the kitchen fire, the circumstantial evidence
on his trowsers would have hanged him if it had been a capital
offence. By that time I was staggering on the kitchen floor like a
little drunkard, through having been newly set upon my feet,
and through having been fast asleep, and through waking in the
heat and lights and noise of tongues. As I came to myself
(with the aid of a heavy thump between the shoulders, and the
restorative exclamation " Yah 1 Was there ever such a boy as
this 1" from my sister) I found Joe telling them about the con
vict's confession, and all the visitors suggesting different ways
by which he had got into the pantry. Mr. Pumblechook made
out, after carefully surveying the premises, that he had first got
upon the roof of the forge, and had then got upon the roof of
the house, and had then let himself down the kitchen chimney
by a rope made of his bedding cut into, strips; and as Mr.
Pumblechook was very positive and drove his own chaise-cart
—over everybody—it was agreed that it must be so. Mr.
Wopsle, indeed, wildly cried out " No 1" with the feeble malice
of a tired man ; but as he had no theory, and no coat on, he
was unanimously set at naught—not to mention his smoking
hard behind, as he stood with his back to the kitchen fire to draw
the damp out, which was not calculated to inspire confidence. This was all I heard that night before my sister clutched me,
as a slumberous offence to the company's eyesight, and assisted
me up to bed with such a strong hand that I seemed to have
twenty boots on, and to he dangling them all against the edges
of the stairs. My state of mind, as I have described it. began
before I was up in the morning, and lasted long after the sub
ject had died out, and had ceased to be mentioned saving on ex
ceptional occasions.
CHAPTER VII.
At the time when I stood in the church-yard, reading the
family tombstones, I had just enough learning to be able to spell
them out. My construction even of their simple meaning was
not very correct, for I read " wife of the Above" as a compli
mentary reference to my father's exaltation to a better world ;
and if any one of my deceased relations had been referred to as
" Below," I have no doubt I should have formed the worst
opinions of that member of the family. Neither were my no
tions of the theological positions to which my Catechism bound
me at all accurate, for I have a lively remembrance that I sup- »
posed my declaration that I was to " walk in the same all the
days of my life" laid me under an obligation always to go
through the village from our house in one particular direction,
and never to vary it by turning down by the wheelright's or up
by the mill.
When I was old enough I was to be apprenticed to Joe,
and until I could assume that dignity I was not to be what Mrs.
Joe called " Pompeyed," or pampered. Therefore I was not
only odd-boy about the forge, but if any neighbor happened to
want an extra boy to frighten birds, or pick up stones, or do
any such job, I was favored with the employment ; but in order
that our superior position might not be compromised thereby
a money-box was kept on the kitchen mantle-shelf, into which it
was publicly made known that all my earnings were dropped.
I have an impression that they were to be contributed even
tually toward the liquidation of the National Debt, but I know
I had no hope of any personal participation in the treasure.
Mr. Wopsle's great aunt kept an evening school in the vil
lage ; that is to say, she was an ancient woman of limited mean!)
and unlimited infirmity, who used to go to sleep from six to
seven every evening, in the society of youth who paid three
(63)
64 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
pence per week each for the improving opportunity of seeing
her do it. She rented a three-roomed cottage, and Mr.
Wopsle had the room up stairs, where we students used to
overhear him reading aloud in a most dignified and terrific
manner, and occasionally bumping on the ceiling. There was a
fiction that Mr. Wopsle "examined" the scholars once a quarter.
What he did on those occasions was to turn up his cuffs, stick
up his hair, and give us Mark Antony's oration over the body
of Caesar. This was always followed by Collins's Ode on the
Passions, wherein I particularly venerated Mr. Wopsle as Fear,
whistling to keep his courage up. It was not with me then,
as it was in later life, when I fell into the society of the Pas
sions, and compared them with Collins and Wopsle, rather to
the disadvantage of both gentlemen.
Mr. Wopsle's great aunt, besides keeping this Educational
Institution, kept—in the same room—a little general shop.
She had no idea what stock she had, or what the price of any
thing in it was; but there was a little greasy memorandum book
kept in a drawer, which served as a Catalogue of Prices, and
by this oracle Biddy arranged all the shop transactions. Biddy
was Mr. Wopsle's great aunt's grand-daughter; I confess my
self quite unequal to the working out of the poblem what rela
tion she was to Mr. Wopsle. She was an orphan like myself ;
like, me, too, had been brought up by hand. She was most
noticeable, I thought, in respect of her extremities; for her
hair always wanted brushing, her hands always wanted washing,
and her shots always wanted mending and pulling up at the
heel. This description must be received, however, with a weekday
limitation. On Sundays she went to church elaborated.
Much of my unassisted self, and more by the help of Biddy
than of Mr. Wopsle's great-aunt, I struggled through the alpha
bet as if it had been a bramble-bush ; getting considerably wor
ried and scratched by every letter. After that I fell among those
thieves, the nine figures, who seemed every evening to do some
thing new to disguise themselves and baffle recognition. But
at last I began, in a purblind groping way, to read, write, and
cipher, on the very smallest scale.
One night I was sitting in the chimney corner with my
slate, expending great efforts on the production of a letter to
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 65
Joe. I think it must have been a full year after our hunt upon
the marshes, for it was a long time after, and it was winter and
a hard frost. With an alphabet on the hearth at my feet for
reference, I contrived in an hour or two to print and smear this
epistle :
" mI deEer JO i opE U r krWitE wEll i opE i shAl
soN B haBelL 4 2 teeDge U JO aN theN wE shOrl b sO
glOdd aN wEn i M preNgtD 2 u JO woT larX aN blEvE
ME inF xn PiP."
There was no indispensable necessity for my communicating
with Joe by letter, inasmuch as he sat beside me and we were
alone. But I delivered this written communication (slate and
all) with my own hand, and Joe received it as a miracle of eru
dition.
" I say, Pip, old chap 1" cried Joe, opening his blue eyes wide.
" what a scholar you are 1 An't you ?"
" I should like to be," said I, glancing at the slate as he
held it, with a misgiving that the writing was rather hilly.
" Why, here's a J," said Joe, " and a O equal to anythink !
Here's a J and a O, Pip, and a J-O, Joe."
I had never heard Joe read aloud to any greater extent than
this monosyllable, and I had observed at church last Sunday
when I accidentally held our Prayer-book up side down, that
it seemed to suit his convenience quite as well as if it had been
all right. Wishing to embrace the present occasion of finding
out whether in teaching Joe I should have to begin quite at
the beginning, I said, " Ah 1 But read the rest, Joe."
"The rest, eh, Pip?" said Joe, looking at it with a slowly
searching eye, " One, two, three. Why, here's three Js and
three Os, and three J-O, Joes in it, Pip 1"
I leaned over Joe, and, with the aid of my forefinger, read
him the whole letter. " Astonishing 1" said Joe, when I had finished. "You are
a scholar."
" How do you spell Gargery, Joe ? I asked him, with a mo
dest patronage.
"I don't spell it at all," said Joe
" But supposing you did ?"
4
GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
"It canH be supposed," said Joe. "But I'm oncommon
fond of reading, too."
" Are you, Joe J"
" On-common. Give me," said Joe, " a good book, or a
good newspaper, and sit me down afore a good fire, and I ask
no better. Lord !" he continued, after rubbing his knees a little,
" when you do come to a J and a O, and says you, ' Here, at
last, is a J-O, Joe,' how interesting reading is 1"
I derived from this that Joe's education, like steam, was yet
in its infancy. Pursuing the subject, I inquired :
" Didn't you ever go to school, Joe, when you were as little
as inc ?"
" No, Pip."
" Why didn't you ever go to school, Joe, when you were as
little as me ?"
" Well, Pip," said Joe, taking up the poker and settling him
self to his usual occupation when he was thoughtful, of slowly
raking the fire between the lower bars, " I'll tell you. My fa
ther, Pip, he were given to drink, and when he were overtook
with drink he hammered away at my mother most onmerciful.
It were a'most the only hammering he did, indeed, 'xcepting at
myself. And he hammered at me with a wigor only to be
equaled by the wigor with which he didn't hammer at his anwil.
You're a listening and understanding, Pip ?"
" Yes, Joe."
" Consequence—my mother and me we ran away from my
father several times ; and then my mother she'd go out to work,
and she'd say, ' Joe,' she'd say, ' now, please God, you shall
have some schooling, child,' and she'd put me to school. But
my father were that good in his hart that he couldn't abear to
be without us. So he'd come with a most tremenjous crowd,
and make such a row at the doors of the houses where we was,
that they used to be obligated to have no more to do with us
and to give us up to him. And then he took us home and
hammered us. Which you see, Pip," said Joe, pausing in his
meditative raking of the fire, and looking at me, " were a draw
back on my learning."
" Certainly, poor Joe I"
" Though mind you, Pip," said Joe, with a judicial touch or
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 67
two of the poker on the top bar, " rendering unto all their doo,
and maintaining equal justice betwixt man and man, my father
were that good in his hart, don't you
I didn't see ; but I didn't say so.
"Well!" Joe pursued, "somebody must keep the pot a
biling, Pip, or the pot won't bile, don't you know ?"
I saw that, and said so.
" 'Consequence—my father didn't make objections to my
going to work ; so I went to work at my present calling, which
were his too, if he would have followed it, and I worked tolera
ble hard, I assure you, Pip. In time I were able to keep him,
and I kep him till he went off in a purple leptic fit. And it
were my intentions to have had put upon his tombstone that
Whatsume'er the failings on his part, Remember reader he were
that good in his hart."
Joe recited this couplet with such manifest pride and careful
perspicuity that I asked him if he had made it himself?
"I made it," said Joe, "my own self. I made it in a mo
ment. It was like striking out a horse-shoe complete in a single
blow. I never was so much surprised in all my life—couldn't
credit my own ed—to tell you the truth, hardly believed it was
my own ed. As I was saying, Pip, it were my intentions to have
had it cut over him ; but poetry costs money, cut it how you
will, small or large, and it were not done. Not to mention
bearers, all the money that could be spared were wanted for my
mother. She were in poor elth, and quite broke. She weren't
long of following, poor soul, and her share of peace come round
at last."
Joe's blue eyes turned a little watery ; he rubbed, first one of
them, and then the other, in a most uncongenial and uncomfort
able manner, with the round knob on the top of the poker.
" It were but lonesome then," said Joe, "living here alone,
and I got acquainted with your sister. Now, Pip," Joe looked
firmly at me, as if he knew I was not going to agree with him,
"your sister is a fine figure of a woman."
I could not help looking at the fire in an obvious state of
doubt.
" Whatever family opinions, or what ever the world's opin
ions, on that subject may be, Pip, your sister is"—Joe tapped
68 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
the top bar with the poker after every word following—" a—
line—figure—of—a—woman 1"
I could think of nothing better to say than "I am glad you
think so, Joe."
"So am I," returned Joe, catching me up. "Jam glad I
think so, Pip. A little redness, or a little matter of Bone, here
or there, what does it signify to Me ?"
/ I sagaciously observed, if it didn't signify to him, to whom
did it signify ?
"Certainly 1" assented Joe. "That's it. You're right, old
chap 1 When I got acquainted with your sister, it were the
talk how she was bringing you up by hand. Very kind of her
too, all the folks said, and I said, along with all the folks. As
to you," Joe pursued, with a countenance expressive of seeing
something very nasty indeed : "if you could have been aware
how small and flabby and mean you was, dear me, you'd have
formed the most contemptible opinions of yourself!"
Not exactly relishing this, I said, " Never mind me, Joe."
"But I did mind you, Pip," he returned, with tender simpli
city. " When I offered to your sister to keep company, and to
be asked in church at such times as she was willing and ready
to come to the forge, I said to her, 'And bring the poor little
child. God bless the poor little child,' I said to your sister,
' there's room for him at the forge 1' "
I broke out crying and begging pardon, and hugged Joe
round the neck; who dropped the poker to hug me, and to say,
"Ever the best of friends; an't us, Pip? Don't cry, old
chap 1"
When this little interruption was over, Joe resumed :
" Well, you see, Pip, and here we are ! That's about where
it lights ; here we are 1 Now, when you take me in hand in my
learning, Pip (and I tell you beforehand I am awful dull, most
awful dull), Airs. Joe mustn't see too much of what we're up
to. It must be done, as I may say, on the sly. And why on
the sly ? I'll tell you why, Pip."
He had taken up the poker again, without which, I doubt if
he could have proceeded in his demonstration.
"Your sister is given to government."
" Given to government, Joe ?" I was startled, for I had some
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. S9
shadowy idea (and I am afraid I must add, hope) that Joe had
divorced her in favor of the Lords of the Admiralty, or Trea
sury.
" Given to government," said Joe. " Which I meantersay
the government of you and myself."
" Oh 1"
"And she an't over partial to having scholars on the pre
mises," Joe continued, "and in partikler would not be over
partial to my being a scholar, for fear as I might rise. Like a
sort of rebel, don't you see ?"
I was going to retort with an inquiry, and had got so far as
" Why—" when Joe stopped me.
" Stay a bit. I know what you're going to say, Pip ; stay
a bit ! I don't deny that your sister comes the Mogul over us,
now and again. I don't deny that she do throw us falls, and
that she do drop down upon us heavy. At such times as your
sister is on the Ram-page, Pip," Joe sank his voice to a whisper
and glanced at the door, " candor compels fur to admit that
she is a Buster."
Joe pronounced this word as if it began with at least twelve
capital Bs.
" Why don't I rise ? That were your observation when I
broke it off, Pip ?"
" Yes, Joe."
" Well," said Joe, passing the poker into his left hand, that
he might feel his whisker ; and I had no hope of him when he
took to that placid occupation ; " your sister's a master-mind.
A master-mind."
" What's that?" I asked, in some hope of bringing him to a
stand. But Joe was readier with his definition than I had ex
pected, and completely stopped me by arguing circularly and
answering with a fixed look, " Her."
"And I an't a master-mind," Joe resumed, when he had un
fixed his look, and got back to his whisker. "And last of all,
Pip—and this I want to say very serous to you, old chap—I
see so much in my poor mother of a woman drudging, and slav
ing, and breaking her honest heart, and never (retting no peace
in her mortal days, that I'm dead afeerd of going wrong in the
way of not doing what's right by a woman, and I'd far rathe:
70 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
of the two go wrong the t'other way, and be a little ill-conwenienced
myself. I wish it was only me that got put out, Pip ;
I wish there warn't no Tickler for you, old chap ; I wish I could
cake it all on myself ; but this is the up-and-down-and-straight
on it, Pip, and I hope you'll overlook short-comings."
Young as I was, I believe that I dated a new admiration of
Joe from that night. We were equals afterward, as we had been
before ; but afterward at quiet times, when I sat looking at Joe
and thinking about him, I had a new sensation of feeling con
scious that I was looking up to Joe in my heart.
" However," said Joe, rising to replenish the fire, "here's the
Dutch-clock a working himself up to being equal to striking
Eight of 'em, and she's not come home yet I I hope Uncle Pumblechook's
mare mayn't have set a forefoot on a piece o' ice,
and gone down."
Mrs. Joe made occasional trips with Uncle Pumblechook on
market days, to assist him in buying such household stuffs and
goods as required a woman's judgment ; Uncle Pumblechook
being a bachelor and reposing no confidences in his domestic
servant. This was market-day, and Mrs. Joe was out on one
of these expeditions.
Joe made the fire and swept the hearth, and then we went
out to listen for the chaise-cart. It was a dry, cold night, and
the wind blew keenly, and the frost was white and hard. A
man would die to-night of lying out on the marshes, I thought ;
and then I looked at the stars, and considered how awful it
would be for a man to turn his face up to them as he froze to
death, and see no help or pity in the whole glittering multitude.
" Here comes the mare," said Joe, "ringing like bells 1"
The sound of her iron shoes upon the hard road was quite mu
sical, as she came along at a much brisker trot than usual. We
got a chair out ready for Mrs. Joe's alighting, and stirred up
the fire that they might see a bright window, and took a final
survey of the kitchen that nothing might be out of its place.
When we had completed these preparations they drove up,
wrapped to the eyes. Mrs. Joe was soon landed, and Uncle
Pumblechook was soon down covering the mare with a cloth,
and we were soon all in the kitchen, carrying so much cold air
in with us that it seemed to drive all the heat out of the fire.
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 71
"Now," said Mrs. Joe, unwrapping herself with haste and
excitement, and throwing her bonnet back on her shoulders where it hung by the strings, "if this boy an't grateful this
night, he never will be 1"
I looked as grateful as any boy possibly could who was
wholly uninformed why he ought to assume that expression.
" It's only to be hoped," said my sister, " that he won't be
Pompeyed. But I have my fears."
" She an't in that line, mum," said Mr. Pumblechook. " She
knows better."
She ? I looked at Joe, making the motion with my lips and
eyebrows, " She " Joe looked at me, making the motion with
his lips and eyebrows, " She 1" My sister catching him in the
act, he drew the back of his hand across his nose with his usual
conciliatory air on such occasions, and looked at her.
" Well ?" said my sister in her snappish way. " Is the house
a-fire ?"
—" Which some individual," Joe politely hinted, "mentioned
—she."
"And she is a she, I suppose?" said my sister. "Unless
you call Miss Havisham a he. And I doubt if even you'll go
so far as that."
" Miss Havisham, up town ?" said Joe.
" Is there any Miss Havisham down town ?" returned my
sister. " She wants this boy to go and play there. And of
course he's going. And he had better play there," said my sis
ter, shaking her head at me as an encouragement to be extremely
light and sportive, "or I'll work him."
I had heard of Miss Havisham up town—every body for miles
round had heard of Miss Havisham up town—as an immensely
rich and grim old lady, who lived in a large and dismal house
barricaded against robbers, and who led a life of seclusion.
"Well to be sure 1" said Joe, astounded. "I wonder how
she come to know Pip 1"
"Noodle 1" cried my sister. "Who said she knew him ?"
—"Which some individual," Joe again politely hinted, "men
tioned that she wanted him to go and play there."
"And couldn't she ask Uncle Pumblechook if he knew of a
boy to go and play there ? Isn't it just barely possible that
72 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
Uncle Pumblechook may be a tenant of hers, and that he may
sometimes—we won't say quarterly or half-yearly, for that
would be requiring too much of you—but sometimes—go there
to pay his rent ? And couldn't she then ask Uncle Pumblechook
if he knew of a boy to go and play there ? And couldn't
Uncle Pumblechook, being always considerate and thoughtful
for us—though you may not think it, Joseph," in a tone of the
deepest reproach, as if he were the most callous of nephews,
" then mention this boy, standing Prancing here"—which I
solemnly declare I was not doing—" that I have for ever been
a willing slave to ?"
" Good again 1" cried Uncle Pumblechook. " Well put 1
Prettily pointed 1 Good indeed 1 Now Joseph, you know the
case."
" No, Joseph," said my sister, still in a reproachful manner,
while Joe apologetically drew the back of his hand across and
across his nose, "you do not yet—though you may not think it
.—know the case. You may consider that you do, but you do
not, Joseph. For you do not know that Uncle Pumblechook,
being sensible that for any thing we can tell this boy's fortune
may be made by his going to Miss Havisham's, has offered to
take him into town to-night in his own chaise-cart, and to keep
him to-night, and to take him with his own hands to Miss
Havisham's to-morrow morning. And Lor-a-mussy me!" cried
my sister, casting off her bonnet in sudden desperation, " here
I stand talking to mere Mooncalfs, with Uncle Pumblechook
waiting, and the mare catching cold at the door, and the boy
grimed with crock and dirt from the hair of his head to the sole
of his fool 1"
With that she pounced upon me, like an eagle on a lamb,
and my face was forced into wooden bowls in sinks, and my
head was put under taps of water-butts, and I was soaped, and
kneaded, and toweled, and thumped, and harrowed, and rasped,
until I really was quite beside myself. (I may here remark
that I conceive myself to be better acquainted than any living
authority with the ridgy effect of a wedding-ring, passing unsympathetically
over the human countenance).
When my ablutions were completed, I was put into clean
linen of the stiffest character, like a young penitent in sock
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 73
cloth, and was trussed up in my tightest and fearfulest suit. I
was then delivered over to Mr. Pumblechook, who formally re
ceived me as if he were the Sheriff, and who let off upon me the
speech which I knew he had been dying to make all along ;
" Boy, be forever grateful to all friends, but especially to them
which brought you up by hand 1"
" Good-by, Joe 1"
" God bless you, Pip, old chap 1"
I had never parted from him before, and what with my feel
ings and what with soap-suds I could at first see no stars from
the chaise-cart. But they twinkled out one by one, without
throwing any light on the questions why on earth I was going
to play at Miss Havisham's, and what on earth I was expected
to play at.
CHAPTER VIII.
Mr. Pumblechook's premises in the High street of the mar
ket town were of a pepper-corny and farinaceous character, as
the premises of a corn chandler and seedsman should be. It
appeared to me that he must be a very happy man indeed to
have so many little drawers in his shop ; and I wondered when
I peeped into one or two on the lower tiers, and saw the tiedup
brown paper packages inside, whether the flower-seeds and
bulbs ever wanted of a fine day to break out of those jails and
bloom.
It was in the early morning after my arrival that I entertained
this speculation. On the previous night I had been sent
straight to bed in an attic with a sloping roof, which was so
low in the corner where the bedstead was that I calculated the
tiles as being within a foot of my eyebrows. In the same early
morning I discovered a singular affinity between seeds and
corduroys. Mr. Pumblechook wore corduroys, and so did his
shopman ; and somehow there was a general air and flavor about
the corduroys, so much in the nature of seeds, and a general
air and flavor about the seeds, so much in the nature of
corduroys, that I hardly knew which was which. The same
opportunity served me for noticing that Mr. Pumblechook
appeared to conduct his business by looking across the street
at the saddler, who appeared to transact his business by keep
ing his eye on the coachmaker, who appeared to get on in life
by putting his hands in his pockets and contemplating the baker,
who in his turn folded his arms and stared at the grocer, who
stood at his door and yawned at the chemist. The watch
maker, always poring over a little desk with a magnifying glass
at his eye, and always inspected by a group in smock-frocks
poring over him through the glass of his shop-window, seemed
to be about the only person in the High Street whose trade
engaged his attention.
(U)
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 7S
Mr. Pumblechook and I breakfasted at eight o'clock in the
parlor behind the shop, while the shopman took his mug of tea
and hunch of bread-and-butter on a sack of pease in the front
premises. I considered Mr. Pumblechook wretched company
Besides being possessed by my sister's idea that a mortifying
and penitential character ought to be imparted to my diet—
besides giving me as much crumb as possible in combination with as little butter, and putting such a quantity of warm water
into my milk that it would have been more candid to have left
the milk out altogether—his conversation consisted of nothing
but arithmetic. On my politely bidding him Good-morning, he
said, pompously, " Seven times nine, boy 1" And how should
I be able to answer, dodged in that way, in a strange place,
on an empty stomach 1 I was hungry, but before I had
swallowed a morsel he began a running sum that lasted all
through the breakfast. " Seven ?" " And four " " And eight ?"
"And six?" "And two?" "And ten?" And so on. And
after each figure was disposed of, it was as much as I could
do to get a bite or a sup before the next came ; while he sat
at his ease guessing nothing and eating bacon and hot roll in
(if I may be allowed the expression) a gorging and gormandiz
ing manner. For such reasons I was very glad when ten o'clock came and
we started for Miss Havisham's; though I was not at all at my
ease regarding the manner in which I should acquaint myself
under that lady's roof. Within a quarter of an hour we came
to Miss Havisham's house, which was of old brick, and dismal,
and had a great many iron bars to it. Some of the windows
had been walled up ; of those that remained all the lower
were rustily barred, There was a court-yard in front, and that
was barred ; so we had to wait, after ringing the bell, until
some one should come to open it. While we waited at the
gate I peeped in (even then Mr. Pumblechook said, "And
fourteen ?" but I pretended not to hear him), and saw that at
the side of the house there was a large brewery ; no brewing
was going on in it, and none seemed to have gone on for a long
long time.
A window was raised, and a clear voice demanded " What
name?" To which my conductor replied "Pumblechook."'
76 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
The voice returned " Quite right," and the window was shut
again, and a young lady came across the court-yard with keys
in her hand.
"This," said Mr. Pumblechook, " is Pip."
" This is Pip, is it ?" returned the young lady, who was
very pretty and seemed very proud; " Come in, Pip."
Mr. Pumblechook was coming in also, when she stopped
him with the gate.
" Oh 1" she said. " Did you wish to see Miss Havisham ?"
" If Miss Havisham wishes to see me," returned Mr. Pumble
chook, discomfited.
"Ah 1" said the girl ; " but you see she don't."
She said it so finally, and in such an undiscussible way, that
Mr. Pumblechook, though in a condition of ruffled dignity,
could not protest. But he eyed me severely—as if I had done
any thing to him 1 —and departed with the words reproachfully
delivered: "Boy 1 Let your behavior here be a credit unto
them which brought you up by hand !" I was not free from
apprehension that he would come back to propound through the
gate, "And sixteen ?" But he didn't.
My young conductress locked the gate, and we went across
the court-yard. It was paved and clean, but grass was grow
ing in every crevice. The brewery buildings had a little lane
of communication with it, and the wooden gates of that lane
stood open, and all the brewery beyond stood open, away to the
high enclosing wall, and all was empty and disused. The cold
wind seemed to blow colder there than outside the gate, and it
made a shrill noise in howling in and out at the open side of
the brewery, like the noise of wind in the rigging of a ship at sea.
She saw me looking at it, and she said, " You could drink
without hurt all the strong beer that's brewed there now, boy.'
" I should think I could, miss," said I, in a shy way.
" Better not try to brew beer there now, or it would turn out
sour, boy ; don't you think so ?"
"It looks like it, miss."
" Not that any body means to try," she added, " for that's
all done with, and the place will stand as idle as it is till it
falls. As to strong beer, there's enough of it in the cellars
already to drown the Manor House."
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 11
" Is that the name of this house, miss ? "
" One of its names, boy."
" It has more than one, then, miss ?"
"One more. Its other name was Satis; which is Greek, or
Latin, or Hebrew, or all three—or all one to me—for enough."
" Enough House," said I ; " that's a curious name, miss."
"Yes," she replied; "but it meant more than it said. It
meant, when it was given, that whoever had this house could
want nothing else. They must have been easily satisfied in
those days, I should think. But don't loiter, boy."
Though she called me " boy" so often, and with a carelessness
that was far from complimentary, she was of about my own age
—or very little older. She seemed much older than I, of course,
being a girl, and beautiful and self-possessed : and she was
as scornful of me as if she had been one-and-twenty, and a
queen.
We went into the house by a side door—the great front
entrance had two chains across it outside—and the first thing
I noticed was, that the passages were all dark, and that she
had left a candle burning there. She took it up, and we went
through more passages and up a staircase, and still it was all
dark, and only the candle lighted us.
At last we came to the door of a room, and she said,
"Go in." I answered, more in shyness than politeness, " After you,
miss." To this, she returned : " Don't be ridiculous, boy ; I am
not going in." And scornfully walked away, and—what was
worse—took the candle with her. This was very uncomfortable, and I was half afraid. How
ever, the only thing to be done being to knock at the door, I
knocked, and was told from within to enter. I entered, there
fore, and found myself in a pretty large room well lighted
with wax candles. No glimpse of daylight was to be seen in it.
It was a dressing-room, as I supposed from the furniture,
though much of it was of forms and uses then quite unknown
to me. But prominent in it was a draped table with a gilded
looking-glass, and that I made out at first sight to be a fine
lady's dressing-table .
78 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
Whether I should have made out this object so soon if there
had been no fine lady sitting at it I cannot say. In an arm
chair, with an elbow resting on the table and her head leaning
on that hand, sat the strangest lady I have ever seen, or shall
ever see.
She was dressed in rich materials—satins, and lace, and silks
—all of white. Her shoes were white. And she had a long
white vail dependent from her hair, and she had bridal flowers
in her hair, but her hair was white. Some bright jewels sparkled
on her neck and on her hands, and some other jewels lay
sparkling on the table. Dresses, less splendid than the dress
she wore, and half-packed trunks, were scattered about. She
had not quite finished dressing, for she had but one shoe on—.
the other was on the table near her hand—her vail was but half
arranged, her watch and chain were not put on, and some lace
for her bosom lay with those trinkets, and with her handker
chief, and gloves, and some flowers, and a prayer-book, all con
fusedly heaped about the looking-glass.
It was not in the first minute that I saw all these thintrs,
though I saw more of them in the first minute than might be
supposed. But I saw that every thing within my view which
ought to be white had been white long ago, and had lost its
lustre, and was faded and yellow. I saw that the bride within
the bridal dress had withered like the dress, and like the flowers,
and had no brightness left but the brightness of her sunken eyes.
I saw that the dress had been put upon the rounded figure of
a young woman, and that the figure upon which it now hung
loose had shrunk to skin and bone. Once, I had been taken
to see some ghastly wax-work at the Fair, representing I know
not what impossible personage lying in state. Once, I had
been taken to one of our old marsh churches to see a skeleton
in the ashes of a rich dress that had been dug out of a vault
under the church pavement. Now, wax-work and skeleton seemed to have dark eyes that moved and looked at me. I sho-uld
have cried out if I could.
"Who is it?" said the lady at the table.
" Pip, ma'am."
"Pip "
" Mr. Pumblechook's boy, ma'am. Come—to play."

"WHO IS IT?" SAID THE LADY AT THE TABLE. "PIP, MA'AM."

GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 79
"Come nearer; let me look at you. Come close."
It was when I stood before her, avoiding her eyes, that I
took note of the surrounding objects in detail, and saw that
her watch had stopped at twenty minutes to nine, and that a
clock in the room had stopped at twenty minutes to nine. '• Look at me," said Miss Havisham. " You are not afraid
of a woman who has never seen the sun since you were born ?"
I regret to state that I was not afraid of telling the enormous
lie comprehended in the answer,
"No."
" Do you know what I touch here J" she said, laying her
hands, one upon the other, on her left side.
" Yes, ma'am." (It made me think of the young man.)
" What do I touch ?"
" Your heart."
" Broken 1"
She uttered the word with an eager look, and with strong
emphasis, and with a weird smile that had a kind of boast in
it. Afterward, she kept her hands there for a little while, and
slowly took them away as if they were heavy.
" I am tired," said Miss Havisham. " I want diversion, and
I have done with men and women. Piny 1"
I think it will be conceded by my most disputatious reader
that she could hardly have directed an unfortunate boy to do
any thing in the wide world more difficult to be done under
the circumstances.
" I sometimes have sick fancies," she went on, " and I have a
sick fancy that I want to see some play. There, there !" with an
impatient movement of the fingers of her right hand; "play,
play, play !"
For a moment, with the fear of my sister's working me
before my eyes, I had a desperate idea of starting round the
room in the assumed character of Mr. Pumblechook's chaisecart.
But I felt myself so unequal to the performance that I
gave it up, and stood looking at Miss Havisham in what I sup
pose she took for a dogged manner, inasmuch as she said, when
we had taken a good look at each other :
" Are you sullen and obstinate ?"
" No, ma'am, I am very sorry for you, and very sorry I cant
80 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
play just now. If you complain of me I shall get into trouble
with my sister, so I would do it if I could ; but it's so new
here, and so strange, and so fine—and melancholy—" I stopped,
fearing I might say too much, or had already said it, and we
took another look at each other.
Before she spoke again she turned her eyes from me and
looked at the dress she wore, and at the dressing-table, and
finally at herself in the looking-glass.
" So new to him," she muttered, " so old to me ; so strange
to him, so familiar to me ; so melancholy to both of us 1 Call
Estella."
As she was still looking at the reflection of herself, I thought
she was still talking to herself, and kept quiet.
" Call Estella," she repeated, flashing a look at me. "You
can do that. Call Estella. At the door."
To stand in the dark in a mysterious passage of an unknown
house bawling Estella to a scornful young lady neither visible
nor responsive, and feeling it a dreadful liberty so to roar out
her name, was almost as bad as playing to order. But she
answered at last, and her light came along the long dark pas
sage like a star.
Miss Havisham beckoned her to come close, and took up a
jewel from the table, and tried its effect upon her fair young
bosom and against her pretty brown hair. " Your own, one
day, my dear, and you will use it well. Let me see you play
cards with this boy."
" With this boy 1 Why, he is a common laboring boy 1"
I thought I overheard Miss Havisham answer—only it seemed
so unlikely—"Well ? You can break his heart."
" What do you play, boy ?" asked Estella of myself, with the
greatest disdain.
" Nothing but beggar my neighbor, miss."
"Beggar him," said Miss Havisham to Estella. So we sat
down to cards.
It was then I began to understand that every thing in the
room had stopped, like the watch and the clock, a long time
ago. I noticed that Miss Havisham put down the jewel
exactly on the spot from which she had taken it up. As
Estella dealt the cards I glanced at the dressing-table again,
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 81
and saw that the shoe upon it, once white, now yellow, had
never been worn. I glanced down at the foot from which the
shoe was absent, and saw that the silk stocking on it, once
white, now yellow, had been trodden ragged. Without this
arrest of every thing, this standing still of all the pale decayed
objects, not even the withered bridal dress on the collapsed form
could have looked so like grave-clothes, or the long vail so
like a shroud.
So she sat corpse-like, as we played at cards : the frillings
and trimmings on her bridal dress looking like earthy paper,
as if they would crumble under a touch. I knew nothing
then of the discoveries that are occasionally made of bodies
buried in ancient times, which fall to powder in the moment of
being distinctly seen ; but I have often thought since that she
must have looked as if the admission of the natural light of day
would have struck her to dust. •'He calls the knaves Jacks, this boy?" said Estella, with
disdain, before our first game was out. " And what coarse
hands he has 1 And what thick boots 1"
I had never thought of being ashamed of my hands before ;
but I began to consider them a very indifferent pair. Her contetnpt
was so strong that it became infectious, and I caught it.
She won the game, and I dealt. I misdealt, as was only
natural, when I knew she was lying in wait for me to do
wrong, and she denounced me for a stupid, clumsy laboring boy.
" You say nothing of her," remarked Miss Havisham to me as
she looked on. " She says many hard things of you, but you
say nothing of her. What do you think of her?"
" I don't like to say," I stammered.
" Tell me in my ear," said Miss Havisham, bending down.
" I think she is very proud," I replied, in a whisper.
" Any thing else ?"
" I think she is very pretty."
" Any thing else?"
" I think she is very insulting." (She was looking at me, then,
with a look of supreme aversion.)
" Any thing else ?"
" I think I should like to go home,"
" And never see her again, though she is so pretty P
5
82 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
" I am not sure that I should not like to see her again, but I
should like to go home now."
" You shall go soon," said Miss Havisham, aloud. " Play
the game out." Saving for the one weird smile at first, I
should have felt almost sure that Miss Havisham's face could
not smile. It had dropped into a watchful and brooding
expression—most likely when all the things about her had
become transfixed—and it looked as if nothing could ever lift
it up any more. Her chest had dropped, so that she stooped ;
and her voice had dropped, so that she spoke low, and with a
dead lull upon her; altogether she had the appearance of
having dropped, body and soul, within and without, under the
weight of a crushing blow.
I played the game to an end with Estella, and she beggared
me. She threw the cards down on the table when she had won
them all, as if she despised them for having been won of me.
"When shall I have you here again ?" said Miss Havisham.
"Let me think."
I was beginning to remind her that to-day was Wednesday,
when she checked me with her former impatient movement of
the fingers of her right hand.
" There, there ! I know nothing of days of the week ; I
know nothing of weeks of the year. Come again after three
days. You hear ?"
"Yes, ma'am."
"Estella, take him down. Let him have something to eat,
and let him roam and look about him while he eats it. Go,
Pip."
I followed the candle down as I had followed the candle up,
and she stood it in the place where we had found it. Until
she opened the side entrance I had fancied, without thinking about it, that it must necessarily be night time. The rush of
the daylight quite confounded me, and made me feel as if I
had been in the candle-light of the strange room many hours.
" You are to wait here, you boy," said Estella, and disappeared
and closed the door.
I took the opportunity of being alone in the court-yard to
look at my coarse hands and my common boots. My opinion
of those accessories was not favorable. They had never troubled
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 83
me before, but they troubled me now, as vulgar appendages. I
determined to ask Joe why he had ever taught me to call those
picture-cards Jacks which ought to be called knaves. I wished
Joe had been rather more genteelly brought up, and then I
should have been so too.
She came back with some bread and meat and a little mug
of beer. She put the mug down on the stones of the yard,
and gave me the bread and meat without looking at me, as
insolently as if I were a dog. I was so humiliated, hurt, spurned,
offended, angry, sorry—I can not hit upon the right name for
the smart—God knows what its name was—that tears started
to my eyes. The moment they sprang there the girl looked
at me with a quick delight in having been the cause of them.
It gave me power to force them back and to look at her ; so
she gave a contemptuous toss—but with a sense, I thought,
of having made too sure that I was so wounded—and
left me.
But when she was gone I looked about me for a place
to hide my face in, and got behind one of the gates in the
brewery-lane, and leaned my sleeve against the wall there, and
leaned my forehead on it and cried. As I cried I kicked the
wall and took a hard twist at my hair; so bitter were my
feelings, and so sharp was the smart without a name, that
needed counteraction.
My sister's bringing up had made me sensitive. In the little
world in which children have their existence, whosoever brings
them up, I am convinced there is nothing so finely perceived
and so finely felt as injustice. It may be only small injustice
that the child can be exposed to ; but the child is small, and
its world is small, and its rocking-horse stands as many hands
high, according to scale, as a big-boned Irish hunter. Within
myself I had sustained from my babyhood a perpetual conflict
with injustice. I had known from the time when I could speak
that my sister, in her capricious and violent coercion, was
unjust to me. I had cherished a profound conviction that her
bringing me up by hand gave her no right to bring me up by
jerks. Through all my punishments, disgraces, fasts, and
vigils, and other penitential performances, I had nursed this
assurance ; and to my communing so much with it, in a soli
GREAT EXPECTATIONS
tary and unprotected way, I, in great part, refer the fact that
I was morally timid and very sensitive.
I got rid of my injured feelings for the time by kicking them
into the brewery wall, and twisting them out of my hair, and
then I smoothed my face with my sleeve and came from behind
the gate. The bread and meat were acceptable, and the beer
was warming and tingling, and I was soon in spirits to look
about me.
To be sure it was a deserted place, down to the pigeonhouse
in the brewery-yard, which had been blown crooked on
its pole by some high wind, and would have made the pigeons
think themselves at sea, if there had been any pigeons there to
be rocked by it. But there were no pigeons in the dove-cot,
no horses in the stable, no pigs in the sty, no malt in the store
house, no smells of grains and beer in the copper or the vat.
All the uses and scents of the brewery might have evaporated
with its last reek of smoke. In a by-yard there was a wilder
ness of empty casks, which had a certain sour remembrance
of better days lingering about them ; but it was too sour to be
accepted as a sample of the beer that was gone—and in
this respect I remember those recluses as being like most
others.
Behind the farthest end of the brewery was a rank garden
with an old red wall : not so high but that I could struggle up
and hold on long enough to look over it, and see that the rank
garden was the garden of the house, and that it was overgrown
with tangled weeds, but that there was a track upon the green
and yellow paths, as if some one sometimes walked there, and
that Estella was walking away from me even then. But she
seemed to be every where. For when I yielded to the tempta
tion presented by the casks, and began to walk on them, I saw
her walking on them at the end of the yard of casks. She had
her back to me, and held her pretty brown hair spread out in
her two hands, and never looked round, and passed out of my
view directly. So in the brewery itself—by which I mean the
large paved lofty place in which they used to make the beer, and
where the brewing utensils still were. When I first went into
it, and, rather oppressed by its gloom, stood near the door look
ing about me, I saw her pass among the extinguished fires, and
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 80
ascend some light iron stairs, and go out by an iron gallery
high overhead, as if she were going oat into the sky.
It was in this place, and at this moment, that a strange thing
happened to my fan y. I thought it a strange thing then, and
I thought it stranger long afterward. I turned my eyes—a
little dimmed by looking up at the frosty light—toward a great
wooden beam in a low nook of the building near me on my right
hand, and I saw a figure hanging there by the neck. A figure
all in yellow white, with but one shoe to the feet; and it hung
so that I could see that the faded trimmings of the dress were
like earthy paper, and that the face was Miss Havisham's with
the eyes open, and with a movement going over the whole
countenance as if she were trying to call to me. In the terror
of seeing the figure, and in the terror of being certain that it
bad not been there a moment before, I at first ran from it, and
then ran toward it. And my terror was greatest of all when I
found no figure there.
Nothing less than the frosty light of the cheerful sky, the
sight of people passing beyond the bars of the court-yard gate,,
and the reviving influence of the rest of the bread and meat and
beer, would have brought me round. Even with those aids I
might not have come to myself as soon as I did, but that I
saw Estella approaching with the keys to let me out. She
would have some fair reason for looking down upon me, I
thought, if she saw me frightened ; and she should have no fair
reason.
She gave me a triumphant glance in passing me, as if she
rejoiced that my hands were so coarse and my boots were so
thick, and she opened the gate and stood holding it. I was
passing out without looking at her, when she touched me with
a taunting hand.
"Why don't you cry ?" said she.
" Because I don't want to," said I.
" You do," said she. " You have been crying, and you are
near crying again."
She laughed contemptuously, pushed me out, and locked the
gate upon me. I went straight to Mr. Pumblechook's, and was
immensely relieved to find him not at home. So leaving word
with the shopman on what day I was wanted at Miss Havi
86 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
sham's again, I set off on the four-mile walk to our forge;
pondering, as I went along, on all I had seen, and deeply re
volving that I was a common laboring boy, that my hands were
coarse, that my boots were thick, that I had fallen into a
despicable habit of calling knaves Jacks, that I was much more
ignorant than I had considered myself last night, and, on the
wiiole, that I was in a low-lived bad way.
CHAPTER IX.
When I reached home my sister was very curious to know aD
about Miss Havisham's, and asked a number of questions
And I soon found myself getting heavily bumped in the nape
of the neck and the small of the back, and having my face
ignominiously shoved against the kitchen wall, because I did
not answer those questions at sufficient length.
If a dread of not being understood be hidden in the breasts
of other young people to any thing like the extent to which it
used to be hidden in mine—which I consider probable, as I
have no particular reason to suspect myself of having been a
monstrosity—it is the key to many reservations. I felt con
vinced that if I described Miss Havisham's as my eyes had
seen it, I should not be understood. Not only that, but I felt
convinced that Miss Havisham too would not be understood ;
and although she was perfectly incomprehensible to me, I en
tertained an impression that there would be something coarse
and treacherous in my dragging her (to say nothing of Miss
Estella) before the contemplation of Mrs. Joe. Consequently,
I said as little as I could, and had my face shoved against the
kitchen wall.
The worst of it was that that bullying old Pumblechook,
preyed upon by a devouring curiosity to be informed of all I
had seen and heard, came gaping over in his chaise-cart at teatime
to have the details divulged to him. And the mere sight
of the torment, with his fishy eyes and mouth open, his sandy
hair inquisitively on end, and his waistcoat heaving with windy
arithmetic, made me vicious in my reticence.
" Well, boy," Uncle Pumblechook began, as soon as he was
seated in the chair of honor by the fire. " How did you get on
up town ?"
I answered, " Pretty well, Sir," and my sister shook her fist
at me. (87)
88 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
" Pretty well ?" Mr. Pumblechook repeated. " Pretty well
is no answer. Tell us what you mean by pretty well, boy t"
Whitewash on the forehead hardens the brain into a state of
obstinacy, perhaps. Any how, with whitewash from the wall
on my forehead, my obstinacy was adamantine. I reflected for
sometime, and then answered, " I mean pretty well."
My sister, with an explanation of impatience, was going to
fly at me—I had no shadow of defense, for Joe was busy in the
forge—when Mr. Pumblechook interposed with, " No 1 Don't
lose your temper. Leave this lad to me, ma'am ; leave this lad
to me." Mr. Pumblechook then turned me toward him, as if
he were going to cut my hair or take out one of my teeth, or
perform some such operation, and said :
" First (to get our thoughts in order) : Forty-three pence "
I calculated the consequences of replying "Four Hundred
Pound," and, finding them against me, went as near the answer
as I could—which was somewhat about eight pence off. Mr.
Pumblechook then put me through my pence-table from "twelve
pence make one shilling," up to "forty pence make three-andfour
pence," and then triumphantly demanded, as if he had done
for me, "Now! How much is forty-three pence?" To
which I replied, after a long interval of reflection, " I don't
know." And I was so aggravated that I almost doubt if I did
know.
Mr Pumblechook worked his head like a screw to screw it out of me, and said, " Is forty-three pence seven and sixpence
three fardens, for instance "
"Yes !" said I. And although my sister instantly boxed my
ears, it was highly gratifying to me to see that the answer spoilt
his joke, and brought him to a dead stop.
"Boy 1 What like is Miss Havisham ?" Mr. Pumblechook
began again when he had recovered ; folding his arms tight on
his chest and applying the screw.
" Very tall and dark," I told him.
" Is she, uncle ?" asked my sister.
Mr. Pumblechook winked assent; from which I at once in
ferred that he had never seen Miss Havisham, for she was no
thing of the kind.
" Good " said Mr. Pumblechook, conceitedly. " This is the
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 89
way to have him I We are beginning to hold our own, I think,
Mum "
" I am sure, uncle," returned Mrs. Joe, " I wish you had him
always; you know so well how to deal with him."
"Now, boy 1 What was she a doing of when you went in
to-day ?" asked Mr. Pumblechook.
"She was sitting," I answered, " in a black velvet coach."
Mr. Pumblechook and Mrs. Joe stared at one another—as
they well might—and both repeated, "In a black velvet
coach ?"
"Yes," said I. "And Miss Estella—that's her niece, I
think—handed her in cake and wine at the coach window, on a
gold plate. And we all had cake and wine on gold plates.
And I got up behind the coach to eat mine, because she
told me to."
" Was any body else there ?" asked Mr. Pumblechook.
" Four dogs," said I.
" Large or small ?"
" Immense," said I. " And they fought for veal cutlets out
of a silver basket."
Mr. Pumblechook and Mrs. Joe stared at one another again,
in utter amazement. I was perfectly frantic—a reckless witness
under the torture—and would have told them any thing.
" Where was this coach, in the name of gracious?" asked
my sister.
"In Miss Havisham's room." They stared again. "But
there weren't any horses to it." I added this saving clause, in
the moment of rejecting four richly caparisoned coursers which
I had had wild thoughts of harnessing.
" Can this be possible, uncle ?" asked Mrs. Joe. " What can
the boy mean ?"
" I'll tell you, Mum," said Mr. Pumblechook. " My opinion
is, it's a sedan-chair. She's flighty, you know—very flighty—
quite flighty enough to pass her days in a sedan-chair."
" Did you ever see her in it, uncle ?" asked Mrs. Joe.
" How could I ?" he returned, forced to the admission, "when
I never see her in my life ? Never clapped eyes upon her ?"
" Goodness, uncle I And yet you have spoken to her ?"
"Why, don't you know," said Mr. Pumblechook, testily.
90 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
" that when I have been there I have been took up to the out.
side of her door, and the door has stood ajar, and she has
spoke to me that way. Don't say that you don't know that,
Mum. Howsoever, the boy went there to play. What did you
play at, boy 1"
" We played with flags," I said. (I beg to observe that I
think of myself with amazement, when I recall the lies I told on
this occasion.)
" Flags 1" echoed my sister.
"Yes," said I. "Estella waved a blue flag, and I waved a
red one, and Miss Havisham waved one sprinkled all over with
little gold stars, out at the coach window. And then we all
waved our swords and hurrahed."
" Swords 1" repeated my sister. "Where did you get swords
from ?"
" Out of a cupboard," said I. " And I saw pistols in it—and
jam—and pills. And there was no daylight in the room, but it
was all lighted up with candles."
" That's true. Mum," said Mr. Pumblechook, with a grave
nod. "That's the state of the case, for that much I've seen
myself." And then they both stared at me, and I with an
obtrusive show of artlessness on my countenance stared at them,
and plaited the right leg of my trowsers with my right hand.
If they had asked me any more questions I should undoubt
edly have betrayed myself, for I was even then on the point of
mentioning that there was a balloon in the yard, and should
have hazarded the statement but for my mind being divided be
tween that phenomenon and a bear in the brewery. They were
so much occupied, however, in discussing the marvels I had
already presented for their consideration that I escaped. The
subject still held them when Joe came in from his work to have
a cup of tea, to whom my sister, more for the relief of her own
mind than for the gratification of his, related my pretended ex
periences.
Now when I saw Joe open his blue eyes and roll them all
round the kitchen in helpless astonishment, I was overtaken by
penitence ; but only as regarded him—not in the least as
regarded the other two. Toward Joe, and Joe only, I con
sidered myself a young monster while they sat debating what
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 91
results would come to me from Miss Havisham's acquaintance)
and favor. They had no doubt that Miss Havishaui would
" do something" for me ; their doubts related to the form
that something would take. My sister stood out " for property."
Mr. Pumblechook was in favor of a handsome premium for
binding me apprentice to some genteel trade—say, the corn
and seed trade for instance. Joe fell into the deepest disgrace
with both, for offering the bright suggestion that I might only
be presented with one of the dogs who had fought for the vealcutlets.
"If a fool's head can't express better opinions than
that," said my sister, " and you have got any work to do you
had better go and do it." So he went.
After Mr. Pumblechook had driven off, and when my sister
was washing up, I stole into the forge to Joe, and remained
by him until he had done for the night. Then I said, " Before
the fire goes quite out, Joe, I should like to tell you some
thing."
"Should you, Pip?" said Joe, drawing his shoeing-stool
near the forge. " Then tell us. What is it, Pip ?"
" Joe," said I, taking hold of his rolled up shirt-sleeve,
and twisting it between my finger and thumb, " you remember
all that about Miss Havisham's ?"
" Remember ?" said Joe. " I believe you I Wonderful I"
" It's a terrible thing, Joe ; it an't true."
"What are you telling of, Pip ?" cried Joe, falling back in
the greatest amazement. " You don't mean to say it's —"
"Yes I do ; it's lies, Joe."
" But not all of it ? Why sure you don't mean to say, Pip,
that there was no black welwetco—eh ?" For I stood shaking
my head. "But at least there was dogs, Pip. Come, Pip,"
said Joe, persuasively, " if there warn't no weal-cutlets, at least
there was dogs ?"
"No, Joe."
"A dog?" said Joe. "A puppy ? Come ?"
"No, Joe, there was nothing at all of the kind."
As I fixed my eyes hopelessly on Joe, Joe contemplated me
in dismay. "Pip, old chap 1 this won't do, old fellow 1 I say !
where do you expect to go to ?"
" It's terrible, Joe ; an't it ?"
OS GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
" Terrible ?'' cried Joe. " Awful 1 What possessed you ?"
" I don't know what possessed me, Joe," I replied, letting
his shirt-sleeve go, and sitting down in the ashes at his feet,
hanging my head ; "but I wish you hadn't taught me to call
Knaves at cards Jacks; and I wish my boots weren't so thick
nor my hands so coarse."
And then I told Joe that I felt very miserable, and that I
hadn't been able to explain myself to Mrs. Joe and Pumblechook,
who were so rude to me, and that there had been a
beautiful young lady at Miss Havisham's who was dreadfully
proud, and that she had said I was common, and that I knew
I was common, and that I wished I was not common, and that
the lies had come of it, somehow, though I didn't know
how.
This was a case of metaphysics, at least as difficult for Joe
to deal with as for me. But Joe took the case altogether out
of the region of metaphysics, and by that means got the better
of it. "There's one thing you may be sure of, Pip," said Joe, after
some rumination, " namely, that lies is lies. However they
come, they didn't ought to come, and they come from the
father of lies, and work round to the same. Don't you tell
no more of 'em, Pip. That ain't the way to get out of being
common, old chap. And as to being common, I don't make it
out at all clear. You are oncommon in some things. You're
oncommon small. Likewise you're an oncommon scholar."
"No, I am ignorant and backward, Joe."
" Why, see what a letter you wrote last night. Wrote in
print even 1 I've seen letters—Ah ! and from gentlefolks 1 —that
I'll swear weren't wrote in print," said Joe.
" I have learned next to nothing, Joe. You think much of
me. It's only that."
"Well, Pip," said Joe, "be it so or be it son't, you must be
a common scholar afore you can be an oncommon one, I should
hope ! The king upon his throne, with his crown upon his ed,
can't sit and write his acts of Parliament in print, without
having begun, when he were a unpromoted Prince, with the
alphabet—Ah 1" added Joe, with a shake of the head that was
full of meaning, " and begun at A too, and worked his way to
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 93
Z. And I know what that is to do, though I can't say I've
done it."
There was some hope in this piece of wisdom, and it rather
encouraged me.
" Whether common ones as to callings and earnings," pursued
Joe, reflectively, " mightn't be the better of continuing for to
keep company with common ones, instead of going out to play
with oncommon ones—which reminds me to hope that there
were a flag perhaps ?"
"No, Joe."
"(I'm sorry there weren't a flag, Pip.) Whether that might
be or mightn't be, is a thing as can't be looked into now,
without putting your sister on the Ram-page ; and that's a thing
not to be thought of as being done intentional. Lookee here,
Pip, at what is said to you by a true friend. Which this
to you the true friend say. If you can't get to the oncommon
through going straight, you'll never do it through going
crooked. So don't tell no more on 'em, Pip, and live well and
die happy."
" You are not angry with me, Joe ?"
" No, old chap. But bearing in mind that them were which
I meantersay of a stunning and thundering sort—alluding to
them which bordered on weal-cutlets and dog-fighting—a sin
cere well-wisher would adwise, Pip, their being dropped into
your meditations when you go up-stairs to bed. That's all,
old chap, and don't never do it no more."
When I got up to my little room, and said my prayers, I
did not forget Joe's recommendation, and yet my young mind
was in that disturbed and unthankful state, that I thought
long after I laid me down, how common Estella would consider
Joe, a mere blacksmith ; how thick his boots, and how coarse
his hands. I thought how Joe and my sister were then sitting
in the kitchen, and how I'd come up to bed from the kitchen,
and how Miss Havisham and Estella never sat in a kitchen,
but were far above the level of such common doings. I fell
asleep recalling what I " used to do" when I was at Miss
Havisham's; as though I had been there weeks or months,
instead of hours, and as though it were quite an old subject of
remembrance, instead of one that had arisen only that day.
M GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
That was a memorable day to me, for it made great changes
in me and in my fortunes. But it is the same with any life.
Imagine one selected day struck out of it, and think how different
its course would have been. Pause, you who read this, and
think for a moment of the long chain of iron or gold, of
thorns or flowers, that would never have bound you, but for tbfl
formation of the first link on one memorable day.
CHAPTER X.
The felicitous idea occurred to me a morning or two later
when I awoke, that the best step I could take toward making
myself uncommon, was to get out of Biddy every thing she
knew, and to pay the strictest attention to Mr. Wopsle when
he read aloud. In pursuance of this luminous conception I
mentioned to Biddy when I went to Mr. Wopsle's great-aunt's
at night, that I had a particular reason for wishing to get on
in life, and that I should feel very much obliged to her if she
would impart all her learning to me. Biddy, who was the most
obliging of girls, immediately said she would, and indeed began
to carry out her promise within five minutes.
The Educational scheme or Course established by Mr.
Wopsle's great-aunt may be resolved into the following synop
sis. The pupils ate apples and put straw up one another's
backs, until Mr. Wopsle's great-aunt collected her energies, and
made an indiscriminate totter at them with a birch-rod. After
receiving the charge with every mark of derision, the pupils
formed in line and buzzingly passed a ragged book from hand
to hand. The book had an alphabet in it, some figures and
tables, and a little spelling—that is to say, it had once. As soon
as this volume began to circulate, Mr. Wopsle's great-aunt fell
into a state of coma ; arising either from sleep or a paroxysm
of rheumatics. The pupils then entered among themselves
upon a competitive examination on the subject of Boots, with
the view of ascertaining who could tread the hardest upon whose
toes. This mental exercise lasted until Biddy made a rush at
them and distributed three defaced Bibles, shaped as if they
had been unskillfully cut off the chump-end of something, more
illegibly printed at the best than any curiosities of literature I
have since met with, speckled all over with iron-mould, and hav
ing various specimens of the insect world smashed between their
leaves. This part of the Course was usually lightened by several
(96)
N GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
single combats between Biddy and refractory students. When
the fights were over, Biddy gave out the number of a page,
and then we all read aloud what we could—or what we couldn't
—in a frightful chorus; Biddy lending with a high shrill mo
notonous voice, and none of us having the least notion what we
were reading about. When this horrible din had lasted a cer
tain time, it mechanically awoke Mr. Wopsle's great-aunt, who
staggered at a boy and fortuitously pulled his ears. This was
understood to terminate the Course for the evening, and we
emerged into the air with shrieks of intellectual victory. It is
fair to remark that there was no prohibition against any pupil's
entertaining himself with a slate or even with the ink (when there
was any), but that it was not easy to pursue that brunch of study
in the winter season, on account of the little general shop in
which the classes were holden—and which was also Mr.
Wopsle's great-aunt's sitting-room and bedchamber—being
but faintly illuminated through the agency of one low-spirited
dip-candle and no snuffers.
It appeared to me that it would take time to become uncom
mon under these circumstances: nevertheless I resolved to try it,
and that very evening Biddy entered on our special agreement,
by imparting some information from her little catalogue of
Prices, under the head of moist sugar, and lending me, to copy
at home, a German text or old English D which she had imitated
from the heading of some newspaper, and which I supposed,
until she told me what it was, to be a design for a buckle.
Of course there was a public-house in the village, and of
course Joe liked sometimes to smoke his pipe there. I had
received strict orders from my sister to call for him at the Three
Jolly Bargemen, that evening, on my way from school, and bring
him home at my peril. To the Three Jolly Bargemen, there
fore, I directed my steps.
There was a bar at the Jolly Bargemen, with some alarm
ingly long chalk scores in it on the wall at the side of the door,
which seemed to me to be never paid off. They had been there
ever since I could remember, and had grown more than I had.
But there was a quantity of chalk about our country, and per
haps the people neglected no opportunity of turning it to ac
count.
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 97
It being Saturday night, I found the landlord looking rather
grimly at these records; but as my business was with Joe and
not with him, I merely wished him good-evening, and passed
into the common room at the end of the passage, where there
was a bright large kitchen fire, and where Joe was smoking his
pipe in company with Mr. Wopsle and a stranger. Joe greeted
me as usual with " Halloa, Pip, old chap 1" and the moment he
said that, the stranger turned his head and looked at me.
He was a secret-looking man whom I had never seen before.
His head was all on one side, and one of his eyes was half shut
tip, as if he were making aim at something with an invisible gun.
He had a pipe in his mouth, and he took it out, and, after
slowly blowing all his smoke away and looking hard at me all
the time, nodded. So I nodded, and then he nodded again,
and made room on the settle beside him that I might sit down
there.
But as I was used to sit beside Joe whenever I entered that
place of resort, I said " No, thank you, Sir," and fell into the
space Joe made for me on the opposite settle. The strange
man, after glancing at Joe, and seeing that his attention was
otherwise engaged, nodded to me again when I had taken my
Beat, and then rubbed his leg in a very odd way, as it struck me.
" You was saying," said the strange man, turning to Joe,
" that you was a blacksmith."
" Yes, I said it, you know," said Joe.
"What'll you drink, Mr. ? You didn't mention
your name, by-the-by."
Joe mentioned it now, and the strange man called him by it.
"What'll you drink, Mr. Gargery ? At my expense? To top
up with ?"
" Well," said Joe, " to tell you the truth, I ain't much in the
habit of drinking at any body's expense but my own."
"Habit? No," returned the stranger, "but once and away,
and on a Saturday night too. Come 1 Put a name to it, Mr.
Gargery."
"I wouldn't wish to be stiff company," said Joe. "Rum."
"Rum," repealed the stranger. "And will the other gentle
man originate a sentiment?"
" Rum," said Mr. Wopsle.
6
98 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
"Three Rums here!" cried the stranger, calling to the land
lord. " Glasses round 1"
" This other gentleman," observed Joe, by way of introducing
Mr. Wopsle, " is a gentleman that you would like to hear give
it out. Our clerk at church."
" Aha 1" said the stranger, quickly, and cocking his eye at
me. " The lonely church, right out on the marshes, with the
graves round it 1"
" That's it," said Joe.
The stranger, with a comfortable kind of grunt over his pipe,
put his legs up on the settle that he had all to himself. He
wore a flapping broad-brimmed traveler's hat, and under it a
handkerchief tied over his head in the manner of a cap ; so
that he showed no hair. As he looked at the fire, I thought
I saw a cunning expression, followed by a half laugh, come
into his face.
"I am not acquainted with this country, gentlemen, but it
seems a solitary country toward the river."
" Most marshes is solitary," said Joe.
"No doubt, no doubt. Do you find any gipsies now, or
tramps, or vagrants of any sort out on those lowlands ?"
"No." said Joe; "none but a runaway convict now and
then. And we don't find them easy. Eh, Mr. Wopsle ?"
Mr. Wopsle, with a majestic remembrance of old discomfi
ture, assented ; but not warmly.
" Seems you have been out after such?" asked the stranger.
" Once," returned Joe. " Not that we wanted to take them,
you understand ; we went out as lookers-on ; me, and Mr.
Wopsle, and Pip. Didn't us, Pip ?"
"Yes, Joe."
The stranger looked at me again—still cocking his eye, as
if he were expressly taking aim at me with his invisible gun
—and said, " He's a likely young parcel of bones that. What
is it you call him ?"
" Pip," said Joe.
" Christened Pip ?"
" No, not christened Pip."
'' Surnamed Pip ?"
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 99
"No," said Joe, "it's a kind of a family name what he gave
himself when a infant, and is called by."
" Son of yours ?"
"Well," said Joe, meditatively—not, of course, that it could
he in anywise necessary to consider about it, but because it
was the way at the Jolly Bargemen to seem to consider deeply
about every thing that was discussed over pipes ; " well—no.
No, he ain't."
" Nevvy ?" said the strange man.
"Well," said Joe, with the same appearance of profound
cogitation, " he is not—no, not to deceive you, he is not—my
nevvy."
" What the Blue Blazes is he?" asked the stranger. Which
appeared to me to be an inquiry of unnecessary strength.
Mr. Wopsle struck in upon that ; as one who knew all about
relationships, having professional occasion to bear in mind what
female relations a man might not marry ; and expounded the
ties between me and Joe. Having his hand in, Mr. Wopsle in
troduced a most terrifically snarling passage from Richard the
Third, and seemed to think he had done quite enough to ac
count for it when he added " —as the poet says."
And here I may remark that when Mr. Wopsle referred to
me, he considered it a necessary part of such reference to
rumple my hair and poke it into my eyes. I cannot conceive
why any body of his standing who visited at our house should
always have put me through the same inflammatory process
under similar circumstances. Yet I do not call to mind that I
was ever in my earlier youth the subject of remark in our social
family circle, but some large-handed person took these ophthal
mic steps to patronize me.
All this while the strange man looked at nobody but me, and
looked at me as if he were determined to have a shot at me at
last, and bring me down. But he said nothing after offering
his Blue Blazes observation until the glasses of rum-and-water
were brought ; and then he made his shot, and a most extraordi
nary one it was.
It was not a verbal remark, but a proceeding in dumb-show,
and was pointedly addressed to me. He stirred his rum-andwater
pointedly at me, and he tasted his rum-and-water pointedly
100 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
at me. And he stirred it and he tasted it, not with a spoon
that was brought to him, but with a file.
He did this so that nobody but I saw the file ; and when he
had done it he wiped the file and put it in a breast-pocket. I
knew it to be Joe's file, and I knew that he knew my convict
the moment I saw the instrument. I sat gazing at him, spell
bound. But he now reclined on his settle, taking very little
notice of me, and talking principally about turnips.
There was a delicious sense of cleaning-up and making a
quiet pause before going on in life afresh, in our village on
Saturday nights, which stimulated Joe to dare to stay out half
an hour longer on Saturdays than at other times. The halfhour
and the rum-and-water running out together, Joe got up
to go, and look me by the hand.
" Stop half a moment, Mr. Gargery," said the strange man.
"I think I've got a bright new shilling somewhere in my pocket,
and if I have the boy shall have it."
He looked it out from a handful of small change, folded it
in some crumpled paper, and gave it to me. " Yours 1" said
he. "Mind! your own."
I thanked him, staring at him far beyond the bounds of good
manners, and holding tight to Joe. He gave Joe good-night,
and he gave Mr. Wopsle good-night (who went out with us),
and he gave me only a look with his aiming eye—no, not a
look, for he shut it up, but wonders may be done with an eye by
hiding it.
On the way home, if I had been in a humor for talking, the
talk must have been all on my side, for Mr. Wopsle parted from
us at the door of the Jolly Bargemen, and Joe went all the
way home with his mouth wide open, to rinse the rum out with
as much air as possible. But I was in a manner stupefied by
this turning up of my old misdeed and old acquaintance, and
could think of nothing else.
My sister was not in a very bad temper when we presented
ourselves in the kitchen, and Joe was encouraged by that un
usual circumstance to tell her about the bright shilling. "A
bad 'un, I'll be bound," said Mrs. Joe, triumphantly, "or he
wouldn't have given it to the boy 1 Let's look at it."
I took it out of the paper, and it proved to be a good one.
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 101
" Bat what's this " said Mrs. Joe, throwing down the shilling
and catching up the paper. " Two One-Pound notes "
Nothing less than two fat sweltering one-pound notes, that
seemed to have been on terms of the warmest intimacy with all
the cattle- markets in the county. Joe caught up his hat again,
and ran with them to the Jolly Bargemen, to restore them to
their owner. While he was gone, I sat down on my usual stool
and looked vacantly at my sister, feeling pretty sure that the
man would not be there.
Presently Joe came back, saying that the man was gone, but
that he, Joe, had left word at the Three Jolly Bargemen con
cerning the notes. Then my sister sealed them up in a piece
of paper, and put them under some dried rose-leaves in an ornamental
tea-pot on the top of a press in the state parlor. There
they remained, a night-mare to me, many and many a night and
day.
I had sadly broken sleep when I got to bed, through think
ing of the strong man taking aim at me with his invisible gun,
and of the guiltily-coarse and common thing it was to be on
secret terms of conspiracy with convicts—a feature in my low
career that I had previously forgotten. I was haunted by the
file too. A dread possessed me that, when I least expected it,
the file would reappear. I coaxed myself to sleep by thinking
of Miss Havisham's, next Wednesday ; and in my sleep I saw
the file coming at me out of a door, without seeing who held it,
and I screamed myself awake.
CHAPTER XI.
At the appointed time I returned to Miss Havisham's, and
my hesitating ring at the gate brought out Estella. She locked
it after admitting me, as she had done before, and again pre
ceded me into the dark passage where her candle stood. She
took no notice of me until she had the candle in her hand, when
she looked over her shoulder, superciliously saying, "You are
to come this way to-day," and took me to quite another part of
the house.
The passage was a long one, and seemed to pervade the whole
square basement of the Manor House. We traversed but one
side of the square, however, and at the end of it she stopped and
put her candle down and opened a door. Here the daylight
reappeared, and I found myself in a small paved court-yard, the
opposite side of which was formed by a detached dwelling-house,
that looked as if it had once belonged to the manager or head
clerk of the extinct brewery. There was a clock in the outer
wall of this house. Like the clock in Miss Havisham's room,
and like Miss Havisham's watch, it had stopped at twenty
minutes to nine.
We went in at the door which stood open, and into a gloomy
room with a low ceiling on the ground-floor at the back.
There was some company in the room, and Estella said to me
as she joined it, " You are to go and stand there, boy, till you
are wanted." " There" being the window, I crossed to it, and
stood " there" in a very uncomfortable state of mind, looking
out.
It opened to the ground, and looked into a most miserable
corner of the neglected garden, upon a rank ruin of cabbage
stalks, and one box-tree that had been clipped round long ago,
like a pudding, and had a new growth at the top of it out of
shape and of a different color, as if that part of the pudding
(102)
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 103
had stuck to the sauce-pan and got burned. This was my homely
thought, as I contemplated the box-tree. There had been some
light snow over night, and it lay nowhere else to my knowl
edge ; but it had not quite melted from the cold shadow of this
bit of garden, and the wind caught it up in little eddies and
threw it at the window, as if it pelted me for coming there.
I divined that my coming had stopped conversation in the
room, and that its other occupants were looking at me : I could
see nothing of the room except the shining of the fire in the
window-glass, but I stiffened in all my joints with the conscious
ness that I was under close inspection.
There were three ladies in the room, and one gentleman.
Before I had been standing at the window five minutes they
somehow conveyed to me that they were all toadies and hum
bugs, but that each of them pretended not to know that the
others were toadies and humbugs, because the admission that
he or she did know it would have make him or her out to be a
toady and humbug.
They all had a listless and dreary air of waiting somebody's
pleasure, and the most talkative of the ladies had to speak quite
rigidly to repress a yawn. This lady, whose name was Camilla,
very much reminded me of my sister, with the difference that
she was older and (as I found when I caught sight of her) of a
blunter cast of features. Indeed, when I knew her better, I
began to think it was a Mercy she had any features at all, so
very black and high was the dead wall of her face.
" Poor dear soul !" said this lady with an abruptness of man
ner quite my sister's. " Nobody's enemy but his own 1"
" It would be much more commendable to be somebody else's
enemy," said the gentleman ; " far more natural."
" Cousin John," observed another lady, " we are to love our
neighbor."
" Sarah Pocket," returned Cousin John, " if a man is not his
own neighbor, who is ?"
Miss Pocket laughed, and Camilla laughed, and said (check
ing a yawn), "The idea!" But I thought they seemed to
think it rather a good idea too. The other lady, who had not
spoken yet, said, gravely and emphatically, " Very true 1"
" Poor soul I" Camilla presently went on (I knew they had all
lot GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
been looking at me in the mean time), "he is so very strange !
Would any one believe that when Tom's wife died, he actually
could not be induced to see the importance of the children's
having the deepest of trimmings to their mourning? 'Good
Lord 1' says he, ' Camilla, what can it signify so long as the
poor bereaved little things are in black ?" So like Matthew 1
The idea !" " Good points in him ; good points in him !" said Cousin
John ; " Heaven forbid I should deny good points in him !
but he never had, and he never will have, any sense of the pro
prieties."
" You know I was obliged," said Camilla—" I was obliged to
be firm. I said, ' It will not do for the credit of the family.'
I told him that, without deep trimmings, the family was dis
graced. I cried about it from breakfast till dinner. I injured
my digestion. And at last he flung out in his violent way, and
said with a D, ' Then do as you like 1' Thank Goodness it will
always be a consolation to me to know that I instantly went out
in a pouring rain and bought the things."
" He paid for them, did he not ?" asked Estella.
" It's not the question, my dear child, who paid for them," re
turned Camilla ; " / bought them. And I shall often think of
that with peace when I wake up in the night."
The ringing of a distant bell, combined with the echoing of
some cry or call along the passage by which I had come, inter
rupted the conversation, and caused Estella to say to me,
" Now, boy 1" On my turning round, they all looked at me
with the utmost contempt, and, as I went out, I heard Sarah
Pocket say, "Well! I am sure! What next?" and Camilla
add, with indignation, " Was there ever such a fancy ? The
i—<le—a!"
As we were going with our candle along the dark passage
Estella stopped all of a sudden, and facing round said, in her
taunting manner, with her face quite close to mine,
" Well "
" Well, Miss ?" I answered, almost falling over her, and check
ing myself.
She stood looking at me, and of course, I stood looking at
her.
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 105
" Am I pretty ?"
" Yes i I think you are very pretty."
" Am I insulting ?"
" Not so much as you were last time," said I.
" Not so much so 1"
" No."
She fired when she asked the last question, and she slapped
my face with such force as she had when I answered it.
" Now ?" said she, " you little coarse monster, what do you
think of me now ?"
" I shall not tell you."
" Because you are going to tell up stairs. Is that it ?"
'' No," said I, " that's not it."
'' "Why don't you cry again, you little wretch ?"
" Because I'll never cry for you again," said I. Which was,
I suppose, as false a declaration as ever was made ; for I was
inwardly crying for her then, and I know what I know of the
pain she cost me afterward.
We went on our way up stairs after this episode; and, as we
were going up, we met a gentleman groping his way down.
" Who have we here ?" asked the gentleman, stopping and
looking at me.
" A boy," said Estella.
He was a burly man of an exceedingly dark complexion, with
an exceedingly large head and a correspondingly large hand.
He took my chin in his large hand and turned up my face to
have a look at me by the light of the candle. He was pre
maturely bald on the top of his head, and had bushy black eye
brows that wouldn't lie down, but stood up bristling. His eyes
were set very deep in his head, and were disagreeably sharp and
suspicious. He had a very large watch-chain, and very strong
black dots where his beard and whiskers would have been if he
had let them. He was nothing to me, and I could have had no
foresight then that he ever would be any thing to me, but it
happened that I had this opportunity of observing him well.
" Boy of the neighborhood ? Hey ?" said he.
" Yes, Sir," said I.
" How do you come here ?"
"Miss Havisham sent for me, Sir," I explained.
10G GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
" Well I Behave yourself. I have a pretty large experience
of boys, and you're a bad set of fellows. Now mind!" said he,
biting the side of his great fore-finger as he frowned at me,
" you behave yourself 1"
With these words he released me—which I was glad of, for
his hand smelled of scented soap—and went his way down stairs.
I wondered whether he could be a doctor ; but no, I thought he
couldn't be a doctor, or he would have a quieter and more per
suasive manner. There was not much time to consider the
subject, for we were soon in Miss Havisham's room, where she
and every thing else were just as I had left them. Estella left
me standing near the door, and I stood there until Miss Havisham
cast her eyes upon me from the dressing table.
"So!" she said, without being startled or surprised, "the
days have worn away, have they ?"
"Yes, ma'am. To-day is —"
"There, there, there 1" with the impatient movement of her
fingers. " I don't want to know. Are you ready to play ?"
I was obliged to answer in some confusion, " I don't think I
am, ma'am."
" Not at cards again ?" she demanded, with a searching look.
"Yes, ma'am ; I could do that if I was wanted."
" Since this house strikes you old and grave, boy," said Miss
Havisham, impatiently, " and you are unwilling to play, are you
willing to work ?"
I could answer this inquiry with a better heart than I had
been able to find for the other question, and I said I was quite
willing.
" Then go into that opposite room," said she, pointing at
the door behind me with her withered hand, " and wait there
till I come."
I crossed the stair-case landing, and entered the room she
indicated. From that room, too, the daylight was completely
excluded, and it had an airless smell that was oppressive. A
fire had been lately kindled in the damp old-fashioned grate,
and it was more disposed to go out than to burn up, and the
reluctant smoke which hung in the room seemed colder than the
clearer air—like our own marsh mist. Certain wintry branches
of candles on the high chimney-piece faintly lighted the cham
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 107
ber : or it would be more expressive to say, faintly disturbed and
troubled its darkness. It was spacious, and I daresay had once
been handsome, but every discernible thing in it was covered
with dust and mould and dropping to pieces. The most prom
inent object was a long table with a table-cloth spread on it, as
if a feast had been in preparation when the house and the clocks
all stopped together. An epergne or centre-piece of some kind
was in the middle of this cloth; it was so heavily overhung with
cobwebs that its form was quite undistinguishable, and as I
looked along the yellow expanse out of which I remember
its seeming to grow like a black fungus, I saw speckled-legged
spiders with blotchy bodies running home to it, and running out
from it, as if some circumstance of the greatest public impoitance
had just transpired in the spider community.
I heard the mice too rattling behind the panels, as if the
same occurrence were important to their interests. But the
black beetles took no notice of the agitation, and groped about
the hearth in a ponderous elderly way, as if they were short
sighted and hard of hearing and not on terms with one another.
These crawling things had fascinated my attention and I was
watching them from a distance, when Miss Havisham laid a
hand upon my shoulder. In her other hand she had a crutchheaded
stick on which she leaned, and she looked like the Witch
of the place.
" This," said she, pointing to the long table with her stick, " is
where I will be laid when I am dead. They shall come and look
at me here."
With some vague misgiving that she might get upon the table
then and there and die at once, the complete realization of the
ghastly waxwork at the Fair, I shrank under her touch.
'' What do you think that is ?" she asked me, again pointing
with her stick ; " that, where those cobwebs are ?"
" I can't guess what it is, ma'am 1"
" It's a great cake. A bride-cake. Mine 1"
She looked all round the room in a glaring manner, and
then said, leaning on me while her hand twitched my shoulder,
" Come, come, come 1 Walk me, walk me 1"
I made out from this that the work I had to do was to walk
Miss Havisham round and round the room Accordingly 1
108 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
started at once, and she leaned upon my shoulder, and we went
away at a pace that might have been an imitation (founded on
my first impulse under that roof) of Mr. Pumblechook's chaisecart.
She was not physically strong, and after a little time she said
"Slower 1" Still we went at an impatient fitful speed, and as
we went she twitched the hand upon my shoulder and worked
her mouth, and led me to believe that we were going fast be
cause her thoughts went fast. After awhile she said, "Call
Estella 1" so I went out on the landing and roared that name
as I had done on the previous occasion. When her light ap
peared I returned to Miss Havisham, and we started away
again round and round the room.
If only Estella had come to be a spectator of our proceed
ings I should have felt sufficiently discontented ; but as she
brought with her the three ladies and the gentleman whom I
had seen below, I didn't know what to do. In my politeness
I would have stopped, but Miss Havisham twitched my shoul
der, and we posted on—with a shame-faced consciousness on my
part that they would think it was all my doing.
"Dear Miss Havisham," said Miss Sarah Pocket. "How
well you look 1"
" I do not," returned Miss Havisham. " I am yellow skin
and bone."
Camilla brightened when Miss Pocket met with this rebuff ;
and she murmured, as she plaintively contemplated Miss Havi
sham, "Poor dear soul! Certainly not to be expected to
look well, poor thing. The idea 1"
" And how are you ?" said Miss Havisham to Camilla. As
we were close to Camilla then, I would have stopped as a
matter of course, only Miss Havisham wouldn't stop. We
swept on, and I felt that I was highly obnoxious to Camilla.
" Thank you, Miss Havisham," she returned, "I am as well
as can be expected."
"Why, what's the matter with you?" asked Miss Havisham,
with exceeding sharpness.
"Nothing worth mentioning," replied Camilla. "I don't
wish to make a display of my feelings, but I have habitually
thought of you more in the night than I am quite equal to."
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 109
" Then don't think of me," returned Miss Havisham.
" Very easily said 1" remarked Camilla, amiably repressing a
sob, while a hitch came into her upper lip, and her tears over
flowed. " Raymond is a witness what ginger and sal volatile
I am obliged to take in the night. Raymond is a witness what
nervous jerkings I have in my legs. Chokings and nervous
jerkings, however, are nothing new to me when I think with
anxiety of those I love. If I could be less affectionate and
sensitive I should have a better digestion and an iron set of
nerves. I am sure I wish it could be so. But as to not think
ing of you in the night—The idea 1" Here a burst of tears.
The Raymond referred to I understood to be the gentleman
present, and him I understood to be Mr. Camilla. He came to
the rescue at this point, and said, in a consolatory and compli
mentary voice, " Camilla, my dear, it is well known that your
family feelings are gradually undermining you to the extent of
making one of your legs shorter than the other."
" I am not aware," observed the grave lady whose voice I had
heard but once, " that to think of any person is to make a great
claim upon that person, my dear."
Miss Sarah Pocket, whom I now saw to be a little dry brown
corrugated old woman, with a small face that might have been
made of walnut shells, and a large mouth like a cat's without
the whiskers, supported this position by saying, " No, indeed,
my dear. Hem 1"
" Thinking is easy enough," said the grave lady.
" What is easier, you know ?" assented Miss Sarah Pocket.
" Oh yes, yes 1" cried Camilla, whose fermenting feelings ap
peared to rise from her legs to her bosom. " It's all very true !
It's a weakness to be so affectionate, but I can't help it. No
doubt my health would be much better if it was otherwise, still
I wouldn't change my disposition if I could. It's the cause of
much suffering, but it's a consolation to know I possess it
when I wake up in the night." Here another burst of feeling.
Miss Havisham and I had never stopped all this time, but
kept going round and round the room, now brushing against
the skirts of the visitors, and now giving them the whole length
of the dismal chamber.
" There's Matthew 1" said Camilla. " Never mixing with
no GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
my natural ties, never coming here to see how Miss Havisham
is 1 I have taken to the sofa with my stay-lace cut, and have
lain there hours insensible, with my head over the side, and my
hair all down, and my feet I don't know where—"
(" Much higher than your head, my love," said Mr. Camilla.)
" I have gone off into that state hours and hours on account
of Matthew's strange and inexplicable conduct, and nobody has
thanked me."
"Really I must say I should think not!" interposed the
grave lady.
" You see, my dear," added Miss Sarah Pocket (a blandly
vicious personage), "the question to put to yourself is, who
did you expect to thank you, my love ?"
" Without expecting any thanks, or any thing of the sort,"
resumed Camilla, " I have remained in that state, hours and
hours, and Raymond is a witness of the extent to which I have
choked, and what the total inefficacy of ginger has been, and
I have been heard at the pianoforte-tuner's across the street,
where the poor, mistaken children have even supposed' it to be
pigeons cooing at a distance—and now to be told—" Here
Camilla put her hand to her throat, and began to be quite
chemical as to the formation of new combinations there.
When this same Matthew was mentioned Miss Havisham
stopped me and herself and stood looking at the speaker. This change had a great influence in bringing Camilla's chemistry
to a sudden end.
" Matthew will come and see me a'- last," said Miss Havi
sham, sternly, " when I am laid on that table. That will be
his place—there," striking the table with her stick, "at my
head 1 And yours will be there 1 And your husband's there 1
And Sarah Pocket's there 1 And Georgiana's there 1 Now
you all know where to take your stations when you come to
feast upon me. And now go 1"
At the mention of each name she had struck the table with
her stick in a new place. She now said, " Walk me, walk me 1"
and we went on again.
" I suppose there is nothing to be done," exclaimed Ca
milla, " but comply and depart. It's something to have seen
the object of one's love and duty for even so short a time. I
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. Ill
shall think of it with a melancholy satisfaction when I wake up
in the night. I wish Matthew could have that comfort, but he
sets it at defiance. I am determined not to make a display of
my feelings, but it's very hard to be told one wants to feast on
one's relations, and to be told to go. The bare idea 1"
Mr. Camilla interposing, as Mrs. Camilla laid her hand upon
her heaving bosom, that lady assumed an unnatural fortitude
of manner which I supposed to be expressive of an intention
to drop and choke when out of view, and kissing her hand to
Miss Hiivisham, was escorted forth. Sarah Pocket and Georgiana
contended who should remain last, but Sarah was too
knowing to be. outdone, and ambled round Georgiana with that
artful slipperiness, that the latter was obliged to take prece
dence. Sarah Pocket then made her separate effect of depart
ing with "Bless you, Miss Havisham dear!" and with a smile of
forgiving pity on her walnut-shell countenance for the weak
nesses of the rest.
While Estella was away lighting them down, Miss Havisham
still walked with her hand on my shoulder, but more and more
slowly. At last she stopped before the fire, and said, after
muttering and looking at it some seconds :
" This is my birthday, Pip."
I was going to wish her many happy returns, when she lifted
her stick.
" I don't suffer it to be spoken of. I don't suffer those who
were here just now or any one to speak of it. They come
here on the day, but they dare not refer to it.
Of course I made no further effort to refer to it.
" On this day of the year, long before you were born, this heap
of decay," stabbing with her crutched stick at the pile of cob
webs on the table but not touching it, " was brought here.
It and I have worn away together. The mice have gnawed
at it, and sharper teeth than teeth of mice have gnawed a'- me."
She held the head of her stick against her heart as she
stood looking at the table ; she in her once white dress, all
yellow and withered ; the once white cloth all yellow and
withered ; every thing around in a state to crumble under a
touch.
"When the ruin is complete," said she, with a ghastly look,
112 GREAT EXPECTATIONS
"and when they lay me dead in my bride's dress on the bride's
table—which shall be done, and which will be the finished curse
upon him—so much the better if it is on this day 1"
She stood looking at the table as if she stood looking at
her own figure lying there. I remained quiet. Estella returned,
and she too remained quiet. It seemed to me that we con
tinued thus for a long time. In the heavy air of the room,
and the heavy darkness that brooded in its remoter corners,
I even had an alarming fancy that Estella and I would pres
ently begin to decay.
At length, not coming out of her distraught state by degrees
but in an instant, Miss Havisham said, "Let me see you
two play cards ; why have you not begun ?" vVith that, we
returned to her room, and sat down as before ; I was beggared
as before; and again, as before, Miss Havisham watched us
all the time, directed my attention to Estella's beauty, and
made me notice it the more by trying her jewels on Estella's
breast and hair.
Estella, for her part, likewise treated me as before ; except
that she did not condescend to speak. When we had played
some half dozen games a day was appointed for my return,
and I was taken down into the yard to be fed in the former
dog-like manner. There, too, I was again left to wander
about as I liked.
It is not much to the purpose whether a gate in that garden
wall which I had scrambled up to peep over on the last occasion
was, on that last occasion, open or shut. Enough that I
saw no gate then, and that I saw one now. As it stood open,
and as I knew that Estella had let the visitors out—for she
had returned with the keys in her hand—I strolled into the
garden and strolled all over it. It was quite a wilderness, and
there were old melon-frames and cucumber-frames in it, which
seemed in their decline to have produced a spontaneous growth
of feeble attempts at pieces of old hats and boots, with now
and then a weedy offshoot into the likeness of a battered sauce
pan.
When I had exhausted the garden, and a green-house with
nothing in it but a fallen down grape-vine and some bottles,
I found myself in the dismal comer upon which I had looked
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 113
out of window. Never questioning for a moment that the
house was now empty, I looked in at another window, and found
myself, to my great surprise, exchanging a broad stare with
a pale young gentleman with red eyelids and very light hair.
This pale young gentleman quickly disappeared, and reap
peared beside me. He had been at his books when I had
found myself staring at him, and I now saw that he was inky.
"Halloa!" said he, "young fellow!" Halloa being a
general observation which I have usually observed to be best
answered by itself, I said "Halloa!" politely omitting young
fellow.
" Who let you in ?" said he.
" Miss Estella."
"Who gave you leave to prowl about?"
" Miss Estella."
" Come and fight," said the pale young gentleman.
What could I do but follow him ? I have often asked
myself the question since; but what else could I do ? His
manner was so final, and I was so astonished, that I followed
where he led, as if I had been under a spell.
"Stop a minute, though," he said, wheeling round before
we had gone many paces. " I ought to give you a reason for
fighting, too. There it is 1" In a most irritating manner he
instantly slapped his hands against one another, daintily flung
one of his legs up behind him, pulled my hair, slapped his
hands again, dipped his head, and ran it into my stomach.
The bull-like proceeding last mentioned, besides that it was
unquestionably to be regarded in the light of a liberty, was
particularly disagreeable just after bread and meat. I there
fore hit out at him, and was going to hit out again, when he
said, "Aha! Would you?" and begun dancing backward
and forward in a manner quite unparalleled within my limited
experience.
" Laws of the game 1" said he. Here he skipped from his
left leg on to his right. " Regular rules 1" Here he skipped
from his right leg on to his left. " Come to the ground,
and go through the preliminaries 1" Here he dodged back
ward and forward, and did all sorts of things, while I looked
helplessly at him.
7
114 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
I was secretly afraid of him when I saw him so dexterous;
but I felt morally and physically convinced that his light head
of hair could have had no business in the pit of my stomach,
and that I had a right to consider it irrelevant when so ob
truded on my attention. Therefore I followed him, without
a word, to a retired nook of the garden formed by the junction
of two walls and screened by some rubbish. On his asking me
if I was satisfied with the ground, and on my replying Yes,
be begged my leave to absent himself for a moment and quickly
returned with a bottle of water and a sponge dipped in vinegar.
" Available for both," he said, placing these against the wall.
And then fell to pulling off, not only his jacket and waist
coat, but his shirt too, in a manner at once light-hearted,
business-like, and blood-thirsty.
Although he did not look very healthy—having pimples on
his face, and a breaking out at his mouth—these dreadful pre
parations quite appalled me. I judged him to be about my
own age, but he was much taller, and he had a way of spinning
himself about that was full of appearance and highly impres
sive. For the rest he was a young gentleman in a gray suit
(when not denuded fur battle), with his elbows, knees, wrists,
and heels considerably in advance of the rest of him as to
development.
My heart failed me when I saw him squaring at me with
every demonstration of mechanical nicety, and eying my anatomy
as if he were minutely choosing his bone. I never have been
so surprised in my life as I was when I let out the first blow,
and saw him lying on his back looking up at me with a bloody
nose and his face exceedingly foreshortened.
But he was on his feet directly, and after sponging himself
with a great show of dexterity, began squaring again. The
second greatest surprise I have ever had in my life was seeing
him on his back again, looking up at me out of a black eye.
His spirit inspired me with great respect. He seemed to
have no strength, and he never once hit me hard, and he was
always knocked down ; but he would be up again in a moment,
sponging himself or drinking out of the water-bottle, with the
greatest satisfaction in seconding himself according to form, and
ttaen came at me with an air and a show that made me believe
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 115
he really was going to do for me at last. He got heavily
bruised, for I am sorry to record that the more I hit him the
harder I hit him, but he came up again and again and again,
until at last he got a bad fall with the back of his head against
the wall. Even after that crisis in our affairs he got up and
turned round and round confusedly a few times, not knowing
where I was, but finally went on his knees to his sponge p.nd
threw it up: at the same time panting out, "That means you
have won."
He seemed so brave and innocent, that, although I had not
proposed the contest, I felt but a gloomy satisfaction in my
victory. Indeed, I go so far as to hope that I regarded my
self while dressing as a species of savage young wolf, or other
wild beast. However, I got dressed, darkly wiping my face
at intervals, and I said, " Can I help you ?" and he said, "No,
thankee," and I said, " Good-afternoon," and he said, " Same to
you." When I got into the court-yard I found Estella waiting
with the keys. But she neither asked me where I had been,
nor why I had kept her waiting ; and there was a bright flush
upon her face as though something had happened to delight
her. Instead of going straight to the gate, too, she stepped
back into the passage, and beckoned me.
" Come here 1 You may kiss me, if you like."
I kissed her cheek as she turned it to me. I think I
would have gone through a great deal to kiss her cheek. But
I felt that the kiss was given to the coarse, common boy, as a
piece of money might have been, and that it was worth
nothing.
What with the birthday visitors, and what with the cards,
and what with the fight, my stay had lasted so long, that when
I neared home the light on the spit of sand off the point on the
marshes was gleaming against a black night-sky, and Joe's
furnace was flinging a path of fire across the road.
CHAPTER XII.
My mind grew very uneasy on the subject of the pale young
gentleman. The more I thought of the fight, and recalled
the pale young gentleman on his back in various stages of
puffy and in crimsoned countenance, the more certain it
appeared that something would be done to me. I felt that
the pale young gentleman's blood was on my head, and that
the Law would avenge it. Without having any definite idea
of the penalties I had incurred, it was clear to me that village
boys could not go stalking about the country, ravaging the
houses of gentlefolks and pitching into the studious youth
of England, without laying themselves open to severe punish
ment. For some days I even kept close at home, and
looked out at the kitchen-door with the greatest caution and
trepidation before going on an errand, lest the officers of the
County Jail should pounce upon me. The pale young gentle
man's nose had stained my trowsers, and I tried to wash out
that evidence of my guilt in the dead of night. I had cut my
knuckles against the pale young gentleman's teeth, and I
twisted my imagination into a thousand tangles, as I devised
incredible ways of accounting for that damnatory circumstance
when I should be haled before the Judges.
When the day came round for my return to the scene of
the deed of violence, my terrors reached their height. Whether
myrmidons of Justice, specially sent down from London, would
be lying in ambush behind the gate? Whether Miss Havisham,
preferring to take personal vengeance for an outrage
done to her house, might rise in those grave-clothes of hers,
draw a pistol, and shoot me dead ? Whether suborned boys
-—a numerous band of mercenaries—might be engaged to fall
upon me in the brewery, and knock me about until I was no
more? It was high testimony to my confidence in the spirit
of the pale young gentleman, that I never imagined him (116)
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 117
accessary to these retaliations ; they always came into my mind
as the acts of injudicious relatives of his, goaded on by the
state of his visage and an indignant sympathy with the family
features. However, go to Miss Havisham's I must, and go I did.
And behold! nothing came of the late struggle. It was not
alluded to in any way, and no pale young gentleman was to be
discovered on the premises. I found the same gate open, airl I
explored the garden, and even looked in at the windows of
the detached house ; but my view was suddenly stopped by the
closed shutters within, and all was lifeless and deserted. Only
in the corner where the combat had taken place could I detect
any evidence of the young gentleman's existence. There were
traces of his gore in that spot, and I covered them with gardenmould
from the eye of man.
On the broad landing between Miss Havisham's own room
and that other room in which the long table was laid out, I
saw a garden-chair—a light chair on wheels that you pushed
from behind. It had been placed there since my last visit, and
I entered, that same day, on a regular occupation of pushing
Miss Havisham in this chair (when she was tired of walking
with her hand upon my shoulder) round her own room, and
across the landing, and round the other room. Over and over
and over again, we would make these journeys, and sometimes
they would last as long as three hours at a stretch. I
insensibly fall into a general mention of these journeys as
numerous, because it was at once settled that I should return
every alternate day at noon for these purposes, and because I am
now going to sum up a period of at least eight or ten months.
As we began to be more used to one another, Miss Havi
sham talked more to me, and asked me such questions as what
had I learned and what was I going to be ? I told her I was
going to be apprenticed to Joe, I believed ; and I enlarged
upon my knowing nothing and wanting to know every thing,
in the hope that she might offer some help toward that
desirable end. But she did not ; on the contrary, she seemed to
like my being ignorant. Neither did she ever give me any
money—or any thing but my daily dinner—nor ever stipulate
that I should be paid for my services.
118 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
Estella was always about, and always let me in and out, but
never told me I might kiss her again. Sometimes, she would
coldly tolerate me; sometimes, she would condescend to me;
sometimes, she would be quite familiar with me; sometimes,
she would tell me energetically that she hated me. Miss Havisham
would often ask me in a whisper, or when we were alone,
" Does she grow prettier and prettier, Pip ?" And when I said
yes (for indeed she did), would seem to enjoy it greedily in
secret. Also, when we played at curds Miss Havisham would
look on, with a miserly relish of Estella's moods, whatever they
were. And sometimes, when her moods were so many and so
contradictory of one another that I was puzzled what to say
or do, Miss Hvisham would embrace her with lavish fondness,
murmuring something in her ear that sounded like " Break
their hearts my pride and hope, break their hearts and have no
mercy 1 "
There was a song Joe used to hum fragments of at the forge,
of which the burden was Old Clem. This was not a very
ceremonious way of rendering homage to a patron saint; but
I believe Old Clem stood in that relation toward smiths. It
was a song that imitated the measure of beating upon iron,
and was a mere lyrical excuse for the introduction of Old Clem's
respected name. Thus, you were to hammer boys round —Old
Clem 1 With a thump and a sound—Old Clem 1 Beat it out,
beat it out—Old Clem 1 With a clink for the stout—Old
Clem 1 Blow the tire, blow the fire—Old Clem 1 Roaring
dryer, soaring higher—Old Clem 1 One day soon after the
appearance of the chair, Miss Havisham suddenly saying to me,
with the impatient movement of her fingers, "There, there,
there 1 Sing!" I was surprised into crooning this ditty as I
pushed her over the floor. It happened so to catch her fancy,
that she took it up in a low brooding voice as if she were sing
ing in her sleep. After that, it became customary with us to
have it as we moved about, and Estella would often join in ;
though the whole strain was so subdued, even when there were
three of us, that it made less noise in the grim old house than
the lightest breath of wind.
What could I become with these surroundings ? How could
my character fail to be influenced by them ? Is it to be
CiREAT EXPECTATIONS. 119
wondered at if my thoughts were dazed, as my eye? were,
when I came out into the natural light from the misty yellow
rooms 1
Perhaps I might have told Joe about the pale young gentle
man, if I had not previously been betrayed into those enormous
inventions to which I have confessed. Under the circum
stances, I felt that Joe could hardly fail to discern in the pale
young gentleman an appropriate passenger to be put into the
black velvet coach ; therefore I said nothing of him. Besides,
that shrinking from having Miss Havisham and Estella dis
cussed, which had come upon me in the beginning, grew much
more potent as time went on. I reposed complete confidence
in no one but Biddy ; but I told poor Biddy every thing. Why k
it came natural to me to do so, and why Biddy had a deep
concern in every thing I told her, I did not know then, though I
think I know now. Siiade of poor Biddy, forgive me 1
Meanwhile councils went on in the kitchen at home, fraught
with almost insupportable aggravation to my exasperated
spirit. That ass, Pumblechook, used often to come over of a
night for the purpose of discussing my prospects with my sister;
and I really do believe (to this hour with less penitence than I
ought to feel), that if these hands could have taken a linch-pin
out of his chaise-cart they would have done it. The miserable
man was a man of that confined stolidity of mind that he could
not discuss my prospects without having me before him—as it
were, to operate upon —and he would drag me up from my stool
(usually by the collar) where I was quiet in a corner, and, stand
ing me before the fire as if I was going to be cooked, would
begin by saying, " Now, mum, here is this boy 1 Here is this
boy which you brought up by hand. Hold up your head, boy,
and be forever grateful unto them which so did do. Now, mum,
with respections to this boy 1" And then he would rumple my
hair the wrong way—which, from my earliest remembrance, as
already hinted, I have in my soul denied the right of any fellowcreature
to do—and would hold me before him by the sleeve ; a
spectacle of imbecility only to be equaled by himself.
Then he and my sister would pair off in such nonsensical
speculations about Miss Havisham, and about what she would
do with me and for me, that I used to want—quite pamfully—
GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
to burst in spiteful tears, fly at Pumblechook, and pommel him
all over. In these dialogues my sister spoke of me as if she
were morally wrenching one of my teeth out at every reference ;
while Pumblechook himself, self-constituted my patron, would
Bit supervising me with a depreciatory eye, like the architect of
my fortunes who thought himself engaged on a very unremunerative
job.
In these discussions Joe bore no part. But he was often
talked at, while they were in progress, by reason of Mrs. Joe's
perceiving that he was not favorable to my being taken from the
forge. I was fully old enough now to be apprenticed to Joe ;
and when Joe sat with the poker on his knees thoughtfully
raking out the ashes between the lower bars, my sister would so
distinctly construe that innocent action into opposition on his
part, that she would dive at him, take the poker out of his
hands, shake him and put it away. There was a most irritating
end to every one of these debates. All in a moment, with no
thing to lead up to it, my sister would stop herself in a yawn,
and would swoop upon me, with " Come 1 There's enough of
you I You get along to bed ; you've given trouble enough for
one night, I hope 1" As if I had besought them as a favor to
bother my life out.
Well 1 We went on in this way for a long time, and it
seemed likely that we should continue to go on in this way for a
long time, when one day Miss Havisham stopped short as she
and I were walking, she leaning on my shoulder; and said, with
some displeasure,
" You are growing tall, Pip I"
, I thought it best to hint, through the medium of a meditative
look, that this might be occasioned by circumstances over which
I had no control.
She said no more at the time ; but she presently stopped and
looked at me again ; and presently again ; and after that looked
frowning and moody. On the next day of my attendance when
our usual exercise was over, and I had landed her at her dress
ing-table, she staid me with a movement of her impatient
fingers :
" Tell me the name again of that blacksmith of yours."
"Joe Gargery, ma'am."
GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
" Meaning the master you were to be apprenticed to "
" Yes, Miss Havisham."
" You had better be apprenticed at once. Would Gargery
come here with you, and bring your indentures, do you think?"
I signified that I had no doubt he would take it as an honor
to be asked.
"Then let him come."
"At any particular time, Miss Havisham?"
" There, there ! I know nothing about times. Let him
come soon, and come alone with you."
When I got home at night, and delivered this message for
Joe, my sister " went on the Ram-page," as Joe expressed it, in
a more alarming degree than at any previous period. She asked
me and Joe whether we supposed she was door mats under our
feet, and how we dared to use her so, and what company we
graciously thought she was fit for? When she had exhausted
a torrent of such inquiries, she threw a candlestick at Joe,
burst into a loud sobbing, got out the dust-pan—which was
always a very bad sign —put on her coarse apron, and began
cleaning up to a terrible extent. Not satisfied with a dry clean
ing, she took to a pail and scrubbing brush, and cleaned us
out of house and home, so that we stood shivering in the back
yard. It was ten o'clock at night before we ventured to creep
in again, and then she asked Joe why he hadn't married a Ne
gress Slave at once ? Joe offered no answer, poor fellow 1 but
stood feeling his whisker and looking dejectedly at me, as if
he thought it really might have been a better speculation.
CHAPTER Xni.
It was a trial to my feelings on the next day but one, to
see Joe arraying himself in his Sundiiy clothes to accompany
me to Miss Havisham's. However, as he thought his court-suit
necessary to the occasion, it was not for me to tell him that he
looked far better in his working dress; the rather, because I
knew he made himself so dreadfully uncomfortable, entirely on
my account, and that it was for me he pulled up his shirt-collar
so very high behind that it made the hair on the crown of his
head stand up like a tuft of feathers.
At breakfast-time my sister declared her intention of going
to town with us, and being left at Uncle Pumblechook's, and
called for " when we had done with our fine ladies"—a way of
putting the case, from which Joe appeared inclined to augur the
worst. The forge was shut up for the day, and Joe inscribed in
chalk upon the door (as it was his custom to do on the very
rare occasions when he was not at work) the monosyllable hout,
accompanied by a sketch of an arrow supposed to be flying in
the direction he had taken.
We walked to town, my sister leading the way in a very large
beaver bonnet, and carrying a basket like the Great Seal of
England in plaited straw, a pair of pattens, and an umbrella,
though it was a fine bright day. I am not quite clear whether
these articles were carried penitentially or ostentatiously ; but I
rather think they were displayed as articles of property—much
as Cleopatra, or any other sovereign lady on the Ram-page,
might exhibit her wealth in a pageant or procession.
When we came to Pumblechook's my sister bounced in and
left us. As it was almost noon Joe and I held straight on to
Miss Havisham's house. Estella opened the gate as usual, and
the moment she appeared Joe took his hat off and stood weigh
ing it by the brim in both his hands—as if he had some ur-
(122)

• WHICH I MEANTERSAY, PIP."

GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 123
gent reason in his mind for being particular to half a quarter
of an ounce.
Estella took no notice of either of us, but led us the way that
I knew so well. I followed next to her, and Joe came last.
When I looked back at Joe in the long passage he was still
weighing his hat with the greatest care, and was coming after
us in long strides on the tips of his toes.
Estella told me we were both to go in, so I took Joe by the
coat-cuff and conducted him into Miss Havisham's presence.
She was seated at her dressing-table, and looked round at us
immediately.
"Oh I" said she to Joe. "You are the husband of the sister
of this boy ?"
I could hardly have imagined dear old Joe looking so unlike
himself or so like some extraordinary bird ; standing, as he did,
speechless, with his tuft of feathers ruffled, and his mouth open,
as if he wanted a worm.
"You are the husband," repeated Miss Havisham, "of the
sister of this boy ?"
It was very aggravating, but throughout the interview Joe
persisted in addressing Me instead of Miss Havisham.
"Which I meantersay, Pip," Joe now observed in a manner
that was at once expressive of forcible argumentation, strict
confidence, and great politeness, "as I hup and married your
sister, and I were at the time what you might call (if you was
any ways inclined) a single man."
"Well!" said Miss Havisham. "And you have reared the
boy, with the intention of taking him for your apprentice ; is
that so, Mr. Giirjrery ?"
" You know, Pip," replied Joe, "us you and me were ever
friends, and it were look'd for'ard to betwixt us, as being
calc'lated to lead to larks. Not but what, Pip, if you had
ever made objections to the business—such as its being open
to black and sut, or such like—not but what they would
have been attended to; don't you see ?"
" Has the boy," said Miss Havisham, " ever made any
objection ? Does he like the trade "
"Which it is well beknown to yourself, Pip," returned Joe,
strengthening his former mixture of argumentation, confidence,
124 GREAT EXPECTATIONS
and politeness, "that it were the wish of your own hart."
(I saw the idea suddenly break upon him that he would adapt
his epitaph to the occasion, before he went on to say) "And
there were no objection on your part, and, Pip, it were the
great wish of your hart 1"
It was quite in vain for me to endeavor to make him
sensible that he ought to speak to Miss Havisham. The
more I made faces and gestures to him to do it, the more
confidential, argumentative, and polite he persisted in being
to Me.
" Have you brought his indentures with you ?" asked Miss
Havisham.
" Well, Pip, you know," replied Joe, as if that were a
little unreasonable, "you yourself see me put 'em in my 'at,
and therefore you know as they are here." With which he
took them out, and gave them, not to Miss Havisham, but to
me. I am afraid I was ashamed of the dear, good fellow—I
know I was ashamed of him—when I saw that Estella stood
at the back of Miss Havisham's chair, and that her eyes laughed
mischievously. I took the indentures out of his hand and
gave them to Miss Havisham.
" You expected," said Miss Havisham, as she looked them
over, "no premium with the boy ?"
"Joe!" I remonstrated, for he made no answer at all.
"Why don't you—"
"Pip," returned Joe, cutting me short as if he were
hurt, " which I meantersay that were not a question requiring
a answer betwixt yourself and me, and which you know the
answer to be full well No. You know it to be No, Pip,
and wherefore should I say it?"
Miss Havisham glanced at him as if she understood what he
really was, better than I had thought possible, seeing what he
was there ; and took up a little bag from the table beside her.
"Pip has earned a premium here," she said, "and here it
is. There are five-and-twenty guineas in this bag. Give
it to your master, Pip."
As if he were absolutely out of his mind with the wonder
awakened in him by her strange figure and the strange room,
Joe, even at this pass, persisted in addressing me.
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 125
"This is very liberal on your part, Pip," said Joe, "and
it is as such received and grateful welcome, though never
looked for, far nor near nor nowheres. And now, old chap,"
said Joe, conveying to me a sensation, first of burning and
then of freezing, for I felt as if that familiar expression were
applied to Miss Havisham ; "and now, old chap, may we do
our duty 1 May you and me do our duty, both on us by one
and another, and by them which your liberal present—have—
conweyed—to be—for the satisfaction of mind—of—them as
never—" here Joe showed that he felt he had fallen into
frightful difficulties, until he triumphantly rescued himself with
the words, " and from myself far be it 1" These words had
such a round and convincing sound to him that he said them
twice.
"Good-by, Pip 1" said Miss Havisham. "Let them out,
Estella."
" Am I to come again, Miss Havisham ?" I asked.
" No. Gargery is your master now. Gargery I One
word 1" Thus calling him back as I went out of the door, I heard her
say to Joe in a distinct emphatic voice, "The boy has been
a good boy here, and that is his reward. Of course, as an
honest mini, you will expect no other and no more."
How Joe got out of the room I have never been able to
determine; but I know that when he did get out he was insanely
proceeding up stairs instead of coming down, and was deaf to
all remonstrances until I went after him and laid hold of him.
In another minute we were outside the gate, and it was locked,
and Estella was gone.
When we stood in the daylight alone again, Joe backed up
against a wall, and said to me, "Astonishing!" And there he
remained so long, saying " Astonishing 1" at intervals, so often,
that I began to think his senses were never coming back. At
length he prolonged his remark into " Pip, I do assure you
that this is as-TON-ishing !" and so, by degrees, became con
versational and able to walk away.
I have reason to think that Joe's intellects were brightened
by the encounter they had passed through, and that on our
way to Pumblechook's he invented a subtle and deep desigu.
126 GKEAT EXPECTATIONS.
My reason is to be found in what took place in Mr. Pumble
hook's parlor: where, on our presenting ourselves, my sister
r*. in conference with that detested seedsman.
" Well ?" cried my sister, addressing us both at once. " And
what's happened to you? I wonder you condescend to come
back to such poor society as this, I am sure I do 1"
" Miss Havisham," said Joe, with a Dxed look at me, like
an effort of remembrance, "made it wery partick'ler that we
should give her—were it compliments or respects, Pip ?"
" Compliments," I said.
"Which that were my own belief," answered Joe—"her
compliments to Mrs. J. Gargery."
" Much good they'll do me 1" observed my sister ; but rather
gratified too.
"And wishing," pursued Joe, with another fixed look at
me, like another effort of remembrance, " that the state of Miss
Ilavisham's elth were sitch as would have—allowed, were it,
Pip ?"
" Of her having the pleasure," I added.
"Of ladies' company," said Joe. And drew a long breath.
" Well !" cried my sister, with a mollified glance at Mr.
Pumblechook. "She might have had the politeness to send
that message at first, but it's better late than never. And what
did she give young Rantipole here?"
"She giv' him," said Joe, "nothing." Mrs. Joe was going
to break out, but Joe went on.
"What she giv'," said Joe, "she giv' to his friends. 'And
by his friends,' were her explanation, 'I mean into the hands
of his sister Mrs. J. Gargery.' Them were her words ; ' Mrs.
J. Gargery.' She mayn't have know'd," added Joe, with an
appearance of reflection, " whether it were Joe, or Jorge."
My sister looked at Pumblechook, who smoothed the elbows
of his wooden arm-chair, and nodded at her and at the fire, as
if he had known all about it beforehand.
" And how much have you got?" asked my sister laughing.
Positively laughing 1
" What would present company say to ten pound ?" demanded
Joe.
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 127
" They'd say," returned my sister, curtly, " pretty well. Not
too much, but pretty well." "It's more than that, then," said Joe.
That fearful Impostor, Pumblechook, immediately nodded,
and said, as he rubbed the arms of his chair : "It's more
than that, mum." "Why, you don't mean to say—" began my sister.
"Yes, I do, mum," said Pumblechook; "but wait a bit.
Go on, Joseph. Good in you 1 Go on 1"
" What would present company say," proceeded Joe, "to
twenty pound ?"
" Handsome would be the word," returned my sister.
"Well, then," said Joe, "it's more than twenty pound."
That abject Hypocrite, Pumblechook, nodded again, and
said, with a patronizing laugh, " It's more than that, mum.
Good again 1 Follow her up, Joseph 1"
"Then to make an end of it," said Joe, delightedly handing
the bag to my sister; "it's five-and-twenty pound."
"It's five-and-twenty pound, mum," echoed that basest of
swindlers, Pumblechook, rising to shake hands with her; "and
it's no more than your merits (as I said when my opinion was
asked), and I wish you joy of the money 1"
If the Villain had stopped here his case would have been
sufficiently awful, but he blackened his guilt by proceeding to
take me into custody, with a right of patronage that left his
former criminality far behind.
" Now you see, Joseph and wife," said Pumblechook, as he
took me by the arm above the elbow, "I am one of them that al
ways go right through with what they've begun. This boy must
be bound out of hand. That's my way. Bound out of hand."
"Goodness knows, Uncle Pumblechook," said my sister
grasping the money), " we're deeply beholden to you."
Never mind me, mum," returned that diabolical cornchandler.
" A pleasure's a pleasure all the world over. But
this boy, you know; we must have him bound. I said I'd see
to it—to tell you the truth."
The Justices were sitting in the Town Hall near at hand, and
we at once went over to have me bound apprentice to Joe in
the Magisterial presence. I say we went over but I was pushed
138 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
over by Pumblechook, exactly as if I had that moment picked
a pocket or fired a rick ; indeed it was the general impression in
Court that I had been taken red-handed, for, as Pumblechook
shoved me before him through the crowd, I heard some peo
ple say, " What's he done " and others, " He's a young 'un too,
but looks bad, don't he ?" One person of mild and benevo
lent aspect even gave me a tract ornamented with a woodcut
of a malevolent young man in a perfect sausage-shop of fetters,
and entitled, To be read in my Cell.
The Hall was a queer place, I thought, with higher pews in it
than a church—and with people hanging over the pews looking
on—and with mighty Justices (one with a powdered head) lean
ing back in chairs, with folded arms, or taking snuff, or going
to sleep, or writing, or reading the newspapers—and with some
shining black portraits on the walls, which my unartistic eye re
garded as a composition of hard bake and sticking-plaster.
Here, in a corner, my indentures were duly signed and at
tested, and I was " bound ;" Mr. Pumblechook holding me all
the while as if we had looked in on our way to the scaffold to
have those little preliminaries disposed of.
When we had come out again, and had got rid of the boys
who had been put into great spirits by the expectation of seeing
me publicly tortured, and who were much disappointed to find
that my friends were merely rallying round me, we went back to
Pumblechook's. And there my sister became so excited by the
twenty-five guineas, that nothing would serve her but we must
have a dinner out of that windfall at the Blue Boar, and that
Pumblechook must go over in his chaise-cart and bring the
Hubbles and Mr. Wopsle.
It was agreed to be done ; and a most melancholy day I passed.
For it inscrutably appearetl to stand to reason, in the minds of
the whole company, that I was an excrescence on the entertain
ment. And to make it worse, they all asked me from time to
time—in short, whenever they had nothing else to do?why I
didn't enjoy myself. And what could I possibly do then but
say I was enjoying myself—when I wasn't ?
However, they were grown up and had their own way, and
they made the most of it. That swindling Pumblechook, ex
alted into the beneficent contriver of the whole occasion,
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 12S
actually took the top of the table ; and, when he addressed them
on the subject of my being bound, and fiendishly congratulated
them on my being liable to imprisonment if I played at cards,
drank strong liquors, kept late hours or bad company, or indulged
In other vagaries which the form of my indentures appeared to
contemplate as next to inevitable, he placed me standing on a
chair beside him to illustrate his remarks.
My only other remembrances of the great festival are, that
they wouldn't let me go to sleep, but whenever they saw me
dropping off, woke me up and told me to enjoy myself. That,
rather late in the evening Mr. Wopsle gave us Collins's Ode,
and threw his blood-stain'd sword in thunder down with such
effect that a waiter came in and said : " The Commercials un
derneath sent up their compliments, and it wasn't the Tumbler's
Arms." That, they were all in excellent spirits on the road
home, and sang O Lady Fair! Mr. Wopsle taking the bass, and
asserting with a tremendously strong voice (in reply to the in
quisitive bore who leads that piece of music in a most imperti
nent manner, by wanting to know all about everybody's
private affairs), that he was the man with his white locks
flowing, and that he was upon the whole the weakest pilgrim
going.
Finally, I remember that when I got into my little bedroom
I was truly wretched, and had a strong conviction on me that
I should never like Joe's trade. I had liked it once, but once
was not now.
8
CHAPTER XIV.
^ It is a most miserable thing to feel ashamed of home. There
may be black ingratitude in the thing, and the punishment may
be retributive and well deserved ; but that it is a miserable thing,
I can testify.
Home had never been a very pleasant place to me, because of
my sister's temper. But Joe had sanctified it, and I had be
lieved in it. I had believed in the best parlor as a most elegant
saloon ; I had believed in the front door as a mysterious portal
of the Temple of State whose solemn opening was attended with
a sacrifice of roast fowls; I had believed in the kitchen as a
chaste though not magnificent apartment; I had believed in the
forge as the glowing road to manhood and independence.
Within a single year all this was changed. Now it was all coarse
and common, and I would not have had Miss Havisham and
Estella see it on any account.
How much of my ungracious condition of mind may have
been my own fault, how much Miss Havisham's, how much my
sister's, is now of no moment to me or to any one. The change
was made in me ; the thing was done. Well or ill done, excusa
bly or inexcusably, it was done.
Once it had seemed to me that when I should at last roll up
my shirt-sleeves and go into the forge, Joe's 'prentice, I should
be distinguished and happy. Now the reality was in my hold,
I only felt that I was dusty with the dust of small coal, and
that I had a weight upon my daily remembrance to which the
anvil was a feather. There have been occasions in my later
life (I suppose as in most lives) when I have felt for a time as
if a thick curtain had fallen on all its interest and romance,
to shut me out from any thing save dull endurance any more.
Never has that curtain dropped so heavy and blank as when
my way in life lay stretched out straight before me through the
newly-entered road of apprenticeship to Joe.
I remember that at a later period of my " time" I used to
(130)
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 131
Stand about the church-yard on Sunday evenings when night
was falling, comparing my own perspective with the windy marsh
view, and making out some likeness between them by thinking
how flat and low both were, and how on both there came an
unknown way and a dark mist and then the sea. I was quite as
dejected on the first working-day of my apprenticeship as in that
after-time ; but I am glad to know that I never breathed a
murmur to Joe while my indentures lasted. It is about the only
thing I am glad to know of myself in that connection.
For, though it includes what I proceed to add, all the merit
of what I proceed to add was Joe's. It was not because I was
faithful, but because Joe was faithful, that I never ran away and
went for a soldier or a sailor. It was not because I had a strong
sense of the virtue of industry, but because Joe had a strong sense
of the virtue of industry, that I worked with tolerable zeal against
the grain. It is not possible to know how far the influence
of any amiable honest-hearted duty-doing man flies out into the
world ; but it is very possible to know how it has touched one's
self in going by, and I know right well that any good that in
termixed itself with my apprenticeship came of plain contented
Joe, and not of restlessly aspiring discontented me.
What I wanted who can say ? How can I say when I never
knew ? What I dreaded was, that in some unlucky hour I,
being at my grimiest and commonest, should lift up my eyes
and see Estella looking in at one of the wooden windows of the
forge. I was haunted by the fear that she would, sooner or
later, find me out, with a black face and hands, doing the coarsest
part of my work, and would exult over me and despise me.
Often after dark, when I was pulling the bellows for Joe and
we were singing Old Clem, and when the thought how we used
to sing it at Miss Havisham's would seem to show me Estella's
face in the fire with her pretty hair fluttering in the wind and
her eyes scorning me—often at such a time I would look toward
those panels of black night in the wall which the wooden win
dows then were, and would fancy that I saw her just drawing
her face away, and would believe that she had come at last.
After that, when we went into supper, the place and the meal
would have a more homely look than ever, and I would feel
more ashamed of home than ever in my own ungracious breast.
CHAPTER XV.
As I was getting too big for Mr. Wopsle's great-aunt's
room, my education under that preposterous female terminated.
Not, however, until Biddy had imparted to me every thing she
knew, from the little catalogue of prices to a comic song she
had once bought for a half-penny. Although the only coherent
parts of the latter piece of literature were the open lines,
When I went to Lunnou town sirs Too mi loo rul Too rul loo rul Wasn't I done very brown sirsToo ml loo ml Too rul loo ml
—still, in my desire to be wiser, I got this composition by
heart with the utmost gravity; nor do I recollect that I ques
tioned its merit, except that I thought (as I still do) the
amount of Too rul somewhat in excess of the poetry. In my
hunger for information I made proposals to Mr. Wopsle to be
stow some intellectual crumbs upon me : with which he kindly
complied. As it turned out, however, that he only wanted me
for a dramatic lay figure, to be contradicted and embraced and
wept over and bullied and clutched and stabbed and knocked
about in a variety of ways, I soon declined that course of in
struction ; though not until Mr. Wopsle in his poetic fury had
severely mauled me.
Whatever I acquired I tried to impart to Joe. This state
ment sounds so well that I can not in my conscience let it pass
unexplained. I wanted to make Joe less ignorant and com
mon, that he might be worthier of my society and less open to
Estella's reproach.
The old Battery out on the marshes was our place of study,
and a broken slate and a short piece of slate-pencil were our
(132)
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 133
educational implements : to which Joe always added a pipe of
tobacco. I never knew Joe to remember any thing from one
Sunday to another, or to acquire, under my tuition, any piece
of information whatever. Yet he would smoke his pipe at the
Battery with a far more sagacious air than any where else—I
would even say with a learned air—as if he considered himself
to be advancing immensely. Dear fellow, I hope he did.
It was pleasant and quiet out there, with the sails on the
river passing beyond the earth-work, and sometimes, when the
tide was low, looking as if they belonged to sunken ships that
were still sailing on at the bottom of the water. Whenever I
watched the vessels standing out to sea with their white sails
spread, I somehow thought of Miss Havisham and Estella; and
whenever the light struck aslant afar off, upon a cloud of sail
or green hill-side or water-line, it was just the same. Miss
Havisham and Estella and the strange house and the strange
life appeared to have something to do with every thing that
was picturesque.
One Sunday when Joe, greatly enjoying his pipe, had so
plumed himself on being "most awful dull," that I had given
him up for the day, I lay on the earth-work for some time with
my chin on my hand descrying tracts of Miss Ilavisham and
Estella all over the prospect, in the sky and in the water, until
at last I resolved to mention a thought concerning them that
had been much in my head.
" Joe," said I ; " don't you think I ought to make Miss
Havisham a visit ?"
"Well, Pip," returned Joe, slowly considering. "What
for ?"
" What for, Joe ? What is any visit made for ?"
" There is some wisits p'r'aps," said Joe, " as for ever re
mains open to the question, Pip. But in regard of wishing
Miss llavisham. She might think you wanted something—ex
pected something of her."
"Don't you think I might say that I did not, Joe ?"
" You might, old chap," said Joe. "And she might credit
it. Similarly she mightn't."
Joe felt, as I did, that he had made a point there, and he
134 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
pulled hard at his pipe to keep himself from weakening it by
repetition.
"You see, Pip," Joe pursued, as soon as he was past that
danger, "Miss Havisham done the handsome thing by you.
When Miss Havisham done the handsome thing by you, she
called me back to say to me as that were all."
"Yes, Joe. I heard her."
" All," Joe repeated, very emphatically.
"Yes, Joe. I tell you, I heard her."
" Which I meantersay, Pip, it might be that her meaning
were—Make a end on it ! —As you was 1 —Me to the North and
you to the South 1 —Keep in sunders 1"
I had thought of that too, and it was very far from comfort
ing to me to find that he had thought of it; for it seemed to
render it more probable.
"But, Joe."
"Yes, old chap."
" Here am I, getting on in the first year of my time, and
since the day of my being bound I have never thanked Miss
Havisham, or asked after her, or shown that I remember her."
" That's true, Pip ; and unless you was to turn her out a set
of shoes all four round—and which I meantersay as even a set
of shoes all four round might not act acceptable as a present,
in a total wacancy of hoofs—"
" I don't mean that sort of remem) rance, Joe ; I don't mean
a present."
But Joe had got the idea of a present in his head and must
harp upon it. " Or even," said he, "if you was helped to knock
ing her up n new chain for the front door—or say a gross or
two of shark-headed screws for general use—or some light
fancy article, such as a toasting-fork when she took her muffins
—or a gridiron when she took a sprat or such like—"
" I don't mean any present at all, Joe," I interposed.
" Well," said Joe, still harping on it as though I had parti cularly pressed it. "if I was yourself, Pip, I wouldn't. No.
I would not. For what's a door-chain when she's got one
always up?" And shark-headers is open to misrepresentations.
And if it was a toasting-fork, you'd go into brass and do your self no credit. And the oncommonest workman can't show
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 1SB •
himself oncommon in a gridiron—for a gridiron is a gridiron,"
said Joe, steadfastly impressing it upon me, as if he were en
deavoring to rouse me from a fixed delusion, "and you may haim
at what you like, but a gridiron it will come out, either by your
leave or again your leave, and you can't help yourself—"
" My dear Joe," I cried, in desperation, taking hold of his
coat, " don't go on in that way. I never thought of making
Miss Havisham any present."
" No, Pip," Joe assented, as if he had been contending for
that all along ; " and what I say to you is, you are right, Pip."
" Yes, Joe ; but what I wanted to say was, that as we are
rather slack just now, if you could give me a half holiday to
morrow, I think I would go up town and make a call on Miss
Est—Havisham."
" Which her name," said Joe, gravely, " ain't Estavisham,
Pip, unless she have been rechristened."
" I know, Joe, I know. It was a slip of mine. What do
you think of it, Joe ?"
In brief, Joe thought that if I thought well of it, he thought
well of it. But he was particular in stipulating that if I were
not received with cordiality, or if I were not encouraged to re
peat my visit as a visit which had no ulterior object but was
simply one of gratitude for a favor received, then this experi
mental trip should have no successor. By these conditions I
promised to abide.
Now Joe kept a journeyman at weekly wages whose name was
Orlick. He pretended that his Christian name was Dolge—a
clear impossibility—but he was a fellow of that obstinate dispo
sition that I believe him to have been the prey of no delusion
in this particular, but willfully to have imposed that name upon
the village as an affront to its understanding. He was a broad
shouldered, loose-limbed, swarthy fellow of great strength,
never in a hurry, and always slouching. He never even seemed
to come to his work on purpose, but would slouch in as if by
mere accident; and when he went to the Jolly Bargemen to eat
his dinner, or went away at night, he would slouch out like
Cain or the Wandering Jew, as if he had no idea where he
was going and no intention of ever coming back. He lodged
at a sluice-keeper's out on the marshes, and on working days
136 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
would come slouching from his hermitage, with his hands in his
pocket and his dinner loosely tied in a bundle round his neck
and dangling on his back. On Sundays he mostly lay all day
on sluice gates, or stood against ricks or barns. He always
slouched, locomotively, with his eyes on the ground ; and, when
accosted or otherwise required to raise them, he looked up in a
half resentful, half puzzled way, as though the only thought he
ever had, was, that it was rather an odd and injurious fact that
he should never be thinking.
This morose journeyman had no liking for me. When I
was very small and timid, he gave me to understand that the
Devil lived in a black corner of the forge, and that he knew
the fiend very well ; also that it was necessary to make up the
fire once in every seven years with a live boy, and that I might
consider myself fuel. When I became Joe's 'prentice, he was
perhaps confirmed in some suspicion that I should displace him ;
howbeit, he liked me still less. Not that he ever said any thing,
or did any thing openly importing hostility; I only noticed that
he always beat his sparks in my direction, and that whenever I
sang Old Clem he came in out of time.
Dolge Orlick was at work and present, next day, when I re
minded Joe of my half-holiday. He said nothing at the mo
ment, for he and Joe had just got a piece of hot iron between
them and I was at the bellows ; but by-and-by he said, leaning
on his hammer :
" Now, master 1 Sure you're not a going to favor only one
of us. If Young Pip has a half-holiday, do as much for Old
Orlick." I suppose he was about five-and-twenty, but he usu
ally spoke of himself as an ancient person.
" Why, what'U you do with a half holiday, if you get it ?"
said Joe. " What'll I do with it I What'll he do with it? I'll do as
much with it as him," said Orlick.
"As to Pip, he's going up town," said Joe.
" Well, then, as to Old Orlick, he's going up town," retorted
that worthy. " Two can go up town. Tan't only one wot can
go up town."
" Don't lose your temper," said Joe.
" Shall if I like," growled Orlick. " Some and their up
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 137
towning ? Now, master 1 Come. No favoring in this shop.
Be a man."
The master refusing to entertain the subject until the jour
neyman was in a better temper, Orlick plunged at the furnace,
drew out a red hot bar, made at me with it as if he were
going to run it through my body, whisked it round my head,
laid it on the anvil, hammered it out—as if it were I, I
thought, and the sparks were my spirting blood—and finally
said, when he had hammered himself hot and the iron cold, and
he again leaned on his hammer :
" Now, master 1"
"Are you all right now ?" demanded Joe.
" Ah I I am all right," said gruff Old Orlick.
" Then, as in general you stick to your work as well as most
men," said Joe, "let it be a half-holiday for all."
My sister had been standing silent in the yard, within hearing
—she was a most unscrupulous spy and listener—and she in
stantly looked in at one of the windows. '
"Like you, you fool 1" said she to Joe, "giving holidays to
great idle hulkers like that. You are a rich man, upon my life,
to waste wages in that way. I wish I was his master 1"
" You'd be every body's master, if you durst," retorted Orlick,
with an ill-favored grin.
(" Let her alone," said Joe.)
" I'd be a match for all noodles and all rogues," returned my
sister, beginning to work herself into a mighty rage. " And I
couldn't be a match for the noodles without being a match for
your master, who's the dunder-headed king of the noodles. And
I couldn't be a match for the rogues, without being a match for
you, who are the blackest-looking and the worst rogue between
this and France. Now 1"
" You're a foul shrew, Mother Gargery," growled the jour
neyman. " If that makes a judge of rogues, you ought to be a
good 'un."
(" Let her alone, will you ?" said Joe.)
" What did you say ?" cried my sister, beginning to scream.
" What did you say 1 What did that fellow Orlick say to me,
Pip ? What did he call me, with my husband standing by ?
0 I O 1 01" Each of these exclamations was a shriek ; and I
138 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
must remark of my sister, what is equally true of all the violent
women I have ever seen, that passion was no excuse for her,
because it is undeniable that, instead of lapsing into passion, she
consciously and deliberately took extraordinary pains to force
herself into it, and became blindly furious by regular stages ;
" what was the name he gave me before the base man who
wore to defend me ? O 1 Hold me 1 O 1"
" Ah-h-h 1" growled the journeyman, between his teeth, " I'd
hold you, if you was my wife. I'd hold you under the pump,
and choke it out of you."
("I tell you, let her alone," said Joe.) "O! To hear him 1"
cried my sister, with a clap of her hands and a scream together
—which was her next stage. " To hear the names he's giving
me 1 That Orlick 1 In my own house 1 Me, a married woman !
With my husband standing by 1 OIO!" Here my sister, after
a 6t of clappings and screamings, beat her hands upon her
bosom and upon her knees, and threw her cap off and pulled
her hair down—-.which were the last stages on her road to
frenzy. Being by this time a perfect Fury and a complete suc
cess, she made a dash at the door, which I had fortunately
locked.
What could the wretched Joe do now, after his disregarded
parenthetical interruptions, but stand up to his journeyman and
ask him what he meant by interfering betwixt himself and Mrs.
Joe ; and further, whether he was man enough to come on ?
Old Orlick felt that the situation admitted of nothing less than
coming on, and was on his defense straightway ; so, without so
much as pulling off their singed and burned aprons, they went
at one another like two giants. But if any man in that neigh
borhood could stand up long against Joe I never saw the man.
Orlick, as if he had been of no more account than the pale
young gentleman, was very soon among the coal-dust and in
no hurry to come out of it. Then Joe unlocked the door and
picked up my sister, who had dropped insensible at the window
(but who had seen the fight first, I think), and who was car
ried into the house and laid down, and who was recommended
to revive, and would do nothing but struggle and clench her
hands in Joe's hair. Then came that singular calm and silence'
which succeed all uproars ; and then, with the vague sensation
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 139
which I have always connected with that lull—namely, that it
.was Sunday, and somebody was dead—I went up stairs to dress
myself. When I came down again I found Joe and Orlick sweeping
up. without any other traces of discomposure than a slit in one
of Orlick's nostrils, which was neither expressive nor ornamen
tal. A pot of beer had appeared from the Jolly Bargemen,
and they were sharing it by turns in a peaceable manner. The
lull had a sedative and philosophic influence on Joe, who fol
lowed me out into the road to say, as a parting observation
that might do me good, " On the Ram-page, Pip, and off the
Ram-page, Pip—such is Life 1"
With what absurd emotions (for we think the feelings that
are very serious in a man quite comical in a boy) I found myself
again going to Miss Havisham's matters little here. Nor how
I passed and repassed the gate many times before I could make
up my mind to ring ; nor how I debated whether I should go
away without ringing ; nor how I should undoubtedly have
gone, if my time had been my own to come back.
Miss Sarah Pocket came to the gate. No Estella.
" How, then ? You here again ?" said Miss Pocket. "What
do you want ?"
When I said that I only came to see how Miss Havisham was,
Sarah evidently deliberated whether or no she should send me
about my business. But unwilling to hazard the responsibility,
she let me in, and presently brought the sharp message that I
was to " come up."
Every thing was unchanged, and Miss Havisham was alone.
" Well ?" said she, fixing her eyes upon me. " I hope you want
nothing ? You'll get nothing."
" No, indeed, Miss Havisham. I only wanted you to know
that I am doing very well in my apprenticeship, and am always
much obliged to you."
"There, there 1" with the old restless fingers. "Come now
and then ; come on your birthday. Ay 1" she cried suddenly,
turning herself and her chair toward me, "you are looking
round for Estella ? Hey ?"
I had been looking round, in fact, for Estella; and I stam
mered that I hoped she was well.
140 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
" Abroad," said Miss Havisham ; " educating for a lady ; far
out of reach ; prettier than ever ; admired by all who see her
Do you feel that you have lost her ?"
There was such a malignant enjoyment in her utterance of
the last words, and she broke into such a disagreeable laugh,
that I was at a loss what to say. She spared me the trouble of
considering by dismissing me. When the gate was closed upon
me by Sarah, of the walnut-shell countenance, I felt more than
ever dissatisfied with my home and with my trade and with every
thing ; and that was all I took by that motion.
As I was loitering along the High Street, looking in discon
solately at the shop-windows, and thinking what I should buy
if I were a gentleman, who should come out of the book-shop
but Mr. Wopsle. Mr. Wopsle had in his hand the affecting
tragedy of George Barnwell, in which he had that moment in
vested sixpence, with the view of heaping every word of it on
the head of Pumblechook, with whom he was going to drink tea.
No sooner did he see me than he appeared to consider that
a special Providence had put a 'prentice in his way to be read
at ; and he laid hold of me, and insisted on my accompanying
him to the Pumblechookian parlor. As I knew it would be
miserable at home, and as the nights were dark and the way was
dreary, and almost any companionship on the road was better
than none, I made no great resistance ; consequently we turned into Pumblechook's just as the street and the shops were light
ing up.
As I never assisted at any other representation of George
Barnwell, I don't know how long it may usually take ; but I
know very well that it took until past nine o'clock that night,
and that when Mr. Wopsle got into Newgate I thought he
never would go to the scaffold, he became so much slower than
at any former period of his disgraceful career. I thought it
a little too much that he should complain of being cut short in
his flower after all, as if he had not been running to seed, leaf
after leaf, ever since he was taken up. This, however, was a
mere question of length and wearisomeness. What stung me
was the identification of the whole affair with my unoffending
self. When Barnwell began to go wrong, I declare that I felt
positively apologetic, Pumblechook's indignant stare so taxed
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 141
me with it. Wopsle, too, took pains to present me in the worst
light. At once ferocious and maudlin, I was made to murder
my uncle with no extenuating circumstances whatever ; Mill
wood put me down in argument on every occasion ; it became
sheer monomania in my master's daughter to care a button for
me ; and all I can say for my gasping and procrastinating con
duct on the fatal morning is, that it was worthy of the general
feebleness of my character. Even after I was happily hanged,
mud Wopsle had closed the book, Pumblechook sat staring at
me, and shaking his head, and saying, "Take warning, boy!
take warning !" as if it were a well-known fact that, in my
private capacity, I contemplated murdering a near relation,
provided I could induce one to have the weakness to become
my benefactor.
It was a very dark night when it was all over, and when I
set out with Mr. Wopsle on the walk home. Beyond town we
found a heavy mist out, and it fell wet and thick. The turnpike
lamp was a blur, quite out of the lamp's usual place apparently,
and its rays looked solid substance on the fog. We were
noticing this, and saying how that the mist rose with a change
of whid from a certain quarter of our marshes, when we came
upon a man slouching under the lee of the turnpike house.
" Halloa 1" we said, stopping, " Orlick, there ?"
"Ah 1" he answered, slouching out. " I was standing by a
minute, on the chance of company."
" You are late," I remarked.
Orlick not unnaturally answered, "Well ? And you're late."
" We have been," said Mr. Wopsle, exalted with his late per
formance—"we have been indulging, Mr. Orlick, in an intellec
tual evening."
Old Orlick growled, as if he had nothing to say about that,
and we all went on together. I asked him presently whether
he had been spending his half-holiday up and down town ?
"Yes," said he, "all of it. I come in behind yourself. I
didn't see you, but I must have been pretty close behind you.
By-the-by the guns is going again."
" At the Hulks ?" said I.
".Ay 1 There's some of the birds flown from the cages
143 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
The guns have been going since dark, about. You'll hear one
presently."
In effect, we had not walked many yards further when the
well-remembered boom came toward us, deadened by the mist,
and heavily rolled away along the low grounds by the river, as
if it were pursuing and threatening the fugitives.
" A good night for cutting off in," said Orlick. "We'd be
puzzled how to bring down a jail-bird on the wing to-night."
The subject was a suggestive one to me, and I thought about
it in silence. Mr. Wopsle, as the ill-requited uncle of the
evening's tragedy, fell to meditating aloud in his garden at
Camberwell. Orlick, with his hands in his pockets, slouched
heavily at my side. It was very dark, very wet, very muddy,
and so we splashed along. Now and then the sound of the
signal cannon broke upon us again, and again rolled sulkily along
the course of the river. I kept myself to myself and my
thoughts. Mr. Wopsle died amiably at Camberwell, and ex
ceedingly game on Bosworth Field, and in the greatest agonies
at Glastonbury. Orlick sometimes growled, "Beat it out, beat
it out—old Clem 1 With a clink for the stout—old Clem 1" I
thought he had been drinking, but he was not drunk.
Thus we came to the village. The way by which we ap
proached it took us past the Three Jolly Bargemen, which we
were surprised to find—it being eleven o'clock—in a state of
commotion, with the door wide open, and unwonted lights, that
had been hastily caught up and put down, scattered about.
Mr. Wopsle dropped in to ask what was the matter (surmising
that a convict had been taken), but came running out in a great
hurry.
" There's something wrong," said he, without stopping, " up
at your place, Pip. Run all !"
" What is it ?" I asked, keeping up with him. So did Orlick,
at my side.
" I can't quite understand. The house seems to have been
violently entered when Joe was out. Supposed by convicts.
Somebody has been attacked and hurt."
We were running too fast to admit of more being said, and
we made no stop until we got into our kitchen. It was full of
people ; the whole village was there, or in the yard ; and there
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 143
was a surgeon, and there was Joe, and there were a group of
women, all on the floor in the midst of the kitchen. The unem
ployed bystanders drew back when they saw me, and so I be
came aware of my sister—lying without sense or movement on
the bare boards where she had been knocked down by a tre
mendous blow on the back of the head, dealt by some unknown
hand when her face was turned toward the fire—destined
never to be on the Ram-page again while she was wife of Joe.
CHAPTER XVI.
With my head full of George Barnwell, I was at first dis
posed to believe that I must have had some hand in the attack
upon my sister, or at all events that as her near relation, popu
larly known to be under obligations to her, I was a more legi
timate object of suspicion than any one else. But when, in the
clearer light of next morning, I began to reconsider the matter
and to hear it discussed around me on all sides, I took another
view of the case which was more reasonable.
Joe had been at the Three Jolly Bargemen, smoking his pipe,
from a quarter after eight o'clock to a quarter before ten.
While he was there my sister had been seen standing at the
kitchen door, and had exchanged Good-night with a farm- laborer going home. The man could not be more particular as
to the time at which he saw her (he got into dense confusion
when he tried to be) than that it must have been before nine.
When Joe went home at five minutes before ten he found her
struck down on the floor, and promptly called in assistance.
The fire had not then burned unusually low, nor was the snuff
of the candle very long ; the candle, however, had been blown
out.
Nothing had been taken away from any part of the house.
Neither, beyond the blowing out of the candle—which stood
on a table between the door and my sister, and was behind her
when she stood facing the fire and was struck—was there any
disarrangement of the kitchen, excepting such as she herself had
made in falling and bleeding. But there was one remarkable
piece of evidence on the spot. She had been struck with
something blunt and heavy on the head and spine ; after the
blows were dealt, something heavy had been thrown down at
her with considerable violence as she lay on her face. And on
the ground beside her, when Joe picked her up, was a convict's
leg-iron which had been filed asunder.
(144)
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 145
Now Joe, examining this iron with a smith's eye, declared it
to have been filed asunder sometime ago. The hue and cry
going off to the Hulks, and people coming thence to examine
the iron, Joe's opinion was corroborated. They did not under
take to say when it had left the prison-ships, to which it un
doubtedly had once belonged ; but they claimed to know for
certain that that particular manacle had not been worn by either
of two convicts who had escaped last night. Further, one of
those two was already retaken, and had not freed himself of his
iron.Knowing what I knew, I set up an inference of my own here.
I believed the iron to be my convict's iron—the iron I had seen
and heard him filing at on the marshes—but my mind did not
accuse him of having put it to its latest use. For I believed
one of two other persons to have become possessed of it, and
to have turned it to this cruel account. Either Orlick or the
strange man who had shown me the file.
Now as to Orlick, he had gone to town exactly as he told
us when we picked him up at the turnpike ; he had been seen aliout town all the evening, he had been in divers companies in
several public houses, and he had come back with myself and
Mr. Wopsle. There was nothing against him save the quarrel ;
and my sister had quarreled with him, and with every body else
about her, ten thousand times. As to the strange man, if he
had come back for his two bank-notes there could have been
no dispute about them, because my sister was fully prepared to
restore them. Besides, there had been no altercation ; the asBailant
had come in so silent and suddenly that she had been
felled before she could look round.
It was horrible to think that I had provided the weapon, how
ever undesignedly, but I could hardly think otherwise. I suf
fered unspeakable trouble while I considered and reconsidered
whether I should at last dissolve that spell of my childhood,
and tell Joe all the story. For months afterward I every day
settled the question finally in the negative, and reopened and
reargued it next morning. The contention came, after all, to
this ; the secret was such an old one now, had so grown into
me and become a part of myself, that I could not tear it away.
In addition to the dread that, having led up to so much mischief, 9
146 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
it would be now more likely than ever to alienate Joe from me
if he believed it, I had the further restraining dread that he
would not believe it, but would assort it with the fabulous dogs
and veal cutlets as a monstrous invention. However, I tempo
rized with myself, of course—for, was I not wavering between
right and wrong, when the thing is always done ?—and resolved
to make a full disclosure if I should see any such new occasion
as a new chance of helping in the discovery of the assailant.
The Constables, and the Bow Street men from London—for
this happened in the days of the extinct red waistcoated po
lice—were about the house for a week or two, and did pretty
much what I have heard and read of like authorities doing in
other such cases. They took up several obviously wrong peo
ple, and they ran their heads very hard against wrong ideas,
and persisted in trying to fit the circumstances to the ideas, in
stead of trying to extract ideas from the circumstances. Also,
they stood about the door of the Jolly Bargemen, with knowing
and reserved looks, that filled the whole neighborhood with ad
miration ; and they had a mysterious manner of taking their
drink, that was almost as good as taking the culprit. But not
quite, for they never did it.
Long after these constitutional powers had dispersed my sister
lay very ill in bed. Her sight was disturbed, so that she saw
objects multiplied, and grasped at visionary tea-cups and wine
glasses instead of realities ; her hearing was greatly impaired ;
her memory also; and her speech was unintelligible. When at
last she came round so far as to be helped down stairs, it was
still necessary to keep my slate always by her, that she might
indicate in writing what she could not indicate in speech. As
she was (very bad handwriting apart) a more than indifferent
speller, and as Joe was a more than indifferent reader, extraor
dinary complications arose between them, which I was always
called in to solve. The administration of mutton instead of
medicine, the substitution of Tea for Joe, and the baker for"
bacon, were among the mildest of my own mistakes.
However, her temper was greatly improved and she was pa
tient. A tremulous uncertainty of the action of all her limbs
soon became a part of her regular state, and afterward, at in
tervals of two or three months, she would often put her hands
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 147
to her head and would then remain for about a week at a time
in some gloomy aberration of mind. We were at a loss to find
a suitable attendant for her, until a circumstance happened con
veniently to relieve us. Mr. Wopsle's great-aunt conquered a
confirmed habit of living into which she had fallen, and Biddy
became a part of our establishment.'
It may have been about a month after my sister's reappear
ance in the kitchen when Biddy came to us with a small speckled
box containing the whole of her worldly effects, and became a
blessing to the household. Above all, she was a blessing to
Joe, for the dear old fellow was sadly cut up by the constant
contemplation of the wreck of his wife, and had been accus
tomed, while attending on her all the evening, to turn to me
every now and then, and say, with his blue eye moistened, "Such
a fine figure of a woman as she once were, Pip!" Biddy in
stantly taking the cleverest charge of her, as though she had
studied her from infancy, Joe became able in some sort to ap
preciate the greater quiet of his life, and to get down to the
Jolly Bargemen now and then, for a change that did him good.
It was characteristic of the police people that they had all
more or less suspected poor Joe (though he never knew it), and
that they had to a man concurred in regarding him as one of
the deepest spirits they had ever encountered.
Biddy's first triumph in her new office was to solve a difficulty
that had completely vanquished me. I had tried hard at it,
but had made nothing of it. Thus it was :
Again and again and again my sister had traced upon the
slate a character that looked like a curious T, and then, with
the utmost eagerness, had called our attention to it as some
thing she particularly wanted. I had in vain tried every thing
producible that began with a T, from tar to toast and tub.
At length it had come into my head that the sign looked like
a hammer, and on my lustily calling that word in my sister's ear
she had begun to hammer on the table, and expressed a qualified
assent. Thereupon I had brought in all our hammers, one
after another, but without avail. Then I bethought me of a
crutch, the shape being much the same, and I borrowed one of
a cripple in the village, and displayed it to my sister with con
siderable confidence. But she shook her head to that extent
lis GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
when she was shown it, that we were terrified lest, in her weak
and shattered state, she should dislocate her neck.
When my sister found that Biddy was very quick to under
stand her, this mysterious sign immediately reappeared on the
slate. Biddy looked thoughtfully at it, heard my explanation,
looked thoughtfully at my sister, looked thoughtfully at Joe,
(who was always represented on the slate by his initial letter),
and ran into the forge, followed by Joe and me.
"Why, of course!" cried Biddy, with an exultant face.
" Don't you see ? It's him /"
Orlick, without a doubt 1 She had lost his name, and could
only signify him by his hammer. We told him why we wanted
him to come into the kitchen, and he slowly laid down his
hummer, wiped his brow with his arm, took another wipe at it
with his apron, and came slouching out, with a curious loose,
vagabond bend in the knees that strongly distinguished him.
I confess that I expected to see my sister denounce him, and
that I was disappointed by the different result. She manifested
the greatest anxiety to be on good terms with him ; was evi
dently much pleased by his being at length produced, and mo
tioned that she would have him given something to drink. She
watched his countenance as if she were particularly wishful to
be assured that he took kindly to his reception ; she showed
every possible desire to conciliate him ; and there was an air of
humble propitiation in all she did, such as I have seen pervade
the bearing of a frightened child toward a hard master. After
that day, a day rarely passed without her drawing the hammer
on her slate, and without Orlick's slouching in and standing
doggedly before her, as if he knew no more than I did what to
make of it.
CHAPTER XVII.
I now fell into a regular routine of apprenticeship life,
which was varied, beyond the limits of the village and the
marshes, by no more remarkable circumstance than the arrival
of my birthday and my paying another visit to Miss Havisham.
I found Miss Sarah Pocket still on duty at the gate ; I found
Miss Havisham just as I had left her; and she spoke of Estella
in the very same way, if not in the very same words. The inter
view lasted but a few minutes, and she gave me a guinea when
I was going, and told me to come again on my next birthday.
I may mention at once that this became an annual custom. I
tried to decline taking the guinea on the first occasion, but
with no better effect than causing her to ask me, very angrily,
if I expected more ? Then, and after that, I took it.
So unchanging was the dull old house, the yellow light in the
darkened room, the faded spectre in the chair by the dressingtable
glass, that I felt as if the stopping of the clocks had
stopped Time in that mysterious place, and, while I and every
thing else outside it grew older, it stood still. Daylight never
entered the house as to my thoughts and remembrances of it,
any more than as to the actual fact. It bewildered me, and
under its influence I continued at heart to hate my trade and to
be ashamed of home.
Imperceptibly I became conscious of a change in Biddy, how
ever. Her shoes came up at the heel, her hair grew bright and
neat, her hands were always clean. She was not beautiful —she
was common, and could not be like Estella—but she was pleasant
and wholesome and sweet-tempered. She had not been with us
more than a year (I remember her being newly out of mourning
at the time it struck me), when I observed to myself one evening
that she had curiously thoughtful and attentive eyes ; eyes that
were very pretty and very good.
(149)
150 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
It came of my lifting up my own eyes from a task I was poring
at—writing some passages from a book, to improve myself
in two ways at once by a sort of stratagem—and seeing Biddy
observant of what I was about. I laid down my pen, and Biddy
stopped in her needle-work without laying it down.
"Biddy," said I, " how do you manage it? Either I am
very stupid or you are very clever."
" What is it that I manage ? I don't know," returned Biddy,
smiling.
She managed our whole domestic life, and wonderfully too ;
but I did not mean that, though that made what I did mean
more surprising.
" How do you manage, Biddy," said I, " to learn every thing
that I learn, and always to keep up with me ?" I was beginning
to be rather vain of my knowledge, for I spent my birthday
guineas on it, and set aside the greater part of my pocketmoney
for similar investment; though I have no doubt now
that the little I knew was extremely dear at the price.
"I might as well ask you," said Biddy, "how you manage?"
" No ; because when I come in from the forge of a night, any
one can see me turning to at it. But you never turn to at it,
Biddy."
"I suppose I must catch it—like a cough," said Biddy,
quietly ; and went on with her sewing.
Pursuing my idea as I leaned back in my wooden chair and
looked at Biddy sewing away with her head on one side, I began
to think her rather an extraordinary girl. For I called to my
mind now that she was equally accomplished in the terms of our
trade, and the names of our different sorts of work, and our
various tools. In short, whatever I knew, Biddy knew. The
oretically, she was already as good a blacksmith as I, or better.
" You are one of those, Biddy," said I, "who make the most
of every chance. You never had a chance before you came here,
and see how improved you are 1"
Biddy looked at me for an instant, and went on with her
sewing. "I was your first teacher though; wasn't I?" said
she, as she sewed.
"Biddy!" I exclaimed in amazement "Why, you are
crying 1"
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 151
" No, I am not," said Biddy, looking up and laughing.
" What put that in your head ?"
What could have put it in my head but the glistening of a tear
as it dropped on her work ? I sat silent, recalling what a drudge
she had been until Mr. Wopsle's great-aunt successfully over
came that bad habit of living, so highly desirable to be got rid
of by some people. I recalled the hopeless circumstances by
which she had been surrounded in the miserable little shop and
the miserable little noisy evening school, with that miserable
old bundle of incompetence always to be dragged and shoul
dered. I reflected that even in those untoward times there
must have been latent in Biddy what was now developed or devel
oping ; for in my first uneasiness and discontent I had turned to
her, as a matter of course, to help me. Biddy sat quietly sewing,
shedding no more tears, and while I looked at her, and thought
about it all, it occurred to me that perhaps I had not been suffi
ciently grateful to Biddy. I might have been too reserved, and
should have patronized her more (though I did not use that pre
cise word in my meditations) with my confidence.
"Yes, Biddy," I observed, when I had done turning it over,
"you were my first teacher, and that at a time when we little
thought of ever being together like this, in this kitchen."
"Ah, poor thing 1" replied Biddy ; and it was like her selfforgetfulness
to transfer the remark to my sister, and to get up
and be busy about her, making her more comfortable ; " that's
sadly true !"
" Well 1" said I, " we must talk together a little more, as
we used to do. And I must consult you a little more, as I used
to do. Let us have a quiet walk on the marshes nest Sunday,
Biddy, and a long chat."
My sister was never left alone now ; but Joe more than
readily undertook the care of her on that Sunday afternoon,
and Biddy and I went out together. It was summer time and
lovely weather. When we had passed the village and the
church and the church-yard, and were out on the marshes, and
began to fee the sails of the ships as they sailed on, I began to
combine Miss Havisham and Estella with the prospect, in my
usual way. When we came to the river-side and sat down on
the bank, with the water rippling at our feet, making it all more
152 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
quiet than it would have been without that sound I resolved
that it was a good time and place for the admission of Biddy
into my inner confidence.
" Biddy," said I, after binding her to secrecy, " I want to be
a gentleman."
"Oh, I wouldn't, if I was you!" she returned. "I don't
think it would answer."
" Biddy," said I, with some severity. " I have particular
reasons for wanting to be a gentleman."
" You know best, Pip ; but don't you think you are happier
as you are ?"
" Biddy," I exclaimed, impatiently, " I am not at all happy
as I am. I am disgusted with my calling and with my life.
I have never taken to either since I was bound. Don't be
absurd !"
" Was I absurd ?" said Biddy, quietly raising her eyebrows ;
" I am sorry for that ; I didn't mean to be. I only want you
to do well, and to be comfortable."
" Well, then, understand once for all that I never shall or can
be comfortable—or any thing but miserable—there, Biddy 1 —
unless I can lend a very different sort of life from the life I lead
now."
" That's a pity !" said Biddy, shaking her head with a sor
rowful air.
Now, I too had so often thought it a pity, that, in the singu
lar kind of quarrel with myself which I was always carrying on,
I was half inclined to shed tears of vexation and distress when
Bidd y gave utterance to her sentiment and my own. I told her
she was right, and I knew it was much to be regretted, but still
it was not to be helped.
" If I could have settled down " ; I said to Biddy, plucking
up the short grass within reach, much as I had once upon a
time pulled my feelings out of my hair and kicked them into the
brewery wall : " if I could have settled down and been but half
as fond of the forge as I was when I was little, I know it
would have been much better for me. You and I and Joe
would have wanted nothing then, and Joe and I would per
haps have gone partners when I was out of my time, and I
might even have grown up to keep company with you, and
GREA1 EXPECTATIONS. 153
wo might have sat on this very bank on a fine Sunday, quite
different people. I should have been good enough for you ;
shouldn't I, Biddy "
Biddy sighed as she looked at the ships sailing on, and
returned for answer, "Yes; I am not over particular." It
scarcely sounded flattering, but I knew she meant well.
" Instead of that," said I, plucking up more grass and
chewing a blade or two, " see how I am going on. Dissatis
fied and uncomfortable, and —what would it signify to me,
being coarse and common, if nobody had told me so 1"
Biddy turned her face suddenly toward mine, and looked
far more attentively at me than she had looked at the sailing
ships.
" It was neither a very true nor a very polite thing to say,"
she remarked, directing her eyes to the ships again. " Who
said it ?"
I was disconcerted, for I had broken away without seeing
where I was going. It was not to be shuffled off now, however,
and I answered, "The beautiful young lady at Miss Havisham's,
and she's more beautiful than any body ever was, and I admire
her dreadfully, and I want to be a gentleman on her account."
Having made which lunatic confession I began to throw my
torn-up grass in the river, as if I had some thoughts of follow
ing it.
" Do you want to be a gentleman to spite her or to gain her
over ?" Biddy quietly asked me, after a pause.
"I don't know," I moodily answered.
" Because, if it is to spite her," Biddy pursued, " I should
think—but you know best—that might be better and more
independently done by caring nothing for her words. And if
it is to gain her over, I should think—but you know best—she
was not worth gaining."
Exactly what I myself had thought many times. Exactly
what was perfectly manifest to me at the moment. But how
could I, a poor dazed village lad, avoid that wonderful incon
sistency into which the best and wisest of men fall every day ?
" It may be all quite true," said I to Biddy, " but I admire
her dreadfully."
In short, I turned over on my face when I came to that
154 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
and got a good grasp on the hair on each side of my head,
and wrenched it well. All the while knowing the madness
of my heart to be so very mad and misplaced, that I was
quite conscious it would have served my face right if I had
lifted it up by my hair and knocked it against the pebbles as a
punishment for belonging to such an idiot.
Biddy was the wisest of girls, and she tried to reason no more
with me. She put her hand, which was a comfortable hand
though roughened by work, upon my hands, one after another,
and gently took them out of my hair. Then she softly patted
my shoulder in a soothing way, while with my face upon my
sleeve I cried a little—exactly as I had done in the brewery
yard—and felt vaguely convinced that I was very much ill-used
by somebody, or by every body ; I can't say which.
" I am glad of one thing," said Biddy, "and that is, that you
have felt you could give me your confidence, Pip. And I am
glad of another thing, and that is, that of course you know
you may depend upon my keeping it and always so far
deserving it. If your first teacher (dear ! such a poor one, and
so much in need of being taught herself 1) had been your
teacher at the present time, she thinks she knows what lesson
she would set. But it would be a hard one to learn, and you
have got beyond her, and it's of no use now." So, with
a quiet sigh for me, Biddy rose from the bank, and said,
with a fresh and pleasant change of voice, " Shall we walk
a little further, or go home "
" Biddy," I cried, jumping up, putting my arm round her
neck, and giving her a kiss, " I shall always tell you every
thing."
"Till you're a gentleman," said Biddy.
"You know I never shall be, so that's always. Not that I
have any occasion to tell you any thing, for you know every
thing I know—as I told you at home the other night."
" Ah 1" said Biddy, quite in a whisper, as she looked away
at the ships. And then repeated, with her former pleasant
change : " Shall we walk a little further, or go home ?"
I said to Biddy we would walk a little further, and we did
so, and the summer afternoon toned down into the summer
evening, and it was very beautiful. I began to consider

 ____~
= __mE
___ _.H___.._.__ g: 2E , v.
‘ V >
h "1., . \ .1; ~ I"

“HULLOA,” HE GROWLED; “WHERE ARE YOU TWO GOING?"

GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 155
whether I was not more naturally and wholesomely situated,
after all, in these circumstances, than playing beggar my neigh
bor by candlelight in the room with the stopped clocks, and
being despised by Estella. I thought it would be very good
for me if I could get her out of my head, with all the rest of
those remembrances and fancies, and could go to work deter
mined to relish what I had to do, and stick to it, and make the
best of it. I asked myself the question whether I did not surely
known that if Estella were beside me at that moment instead of
Biddy she would make me miserable? I was obliged to admit
that I did know it for a certainty, and I said to myself, " Pip,
what a fool you are ?"
We talked a good deal as we walked, and all that Biddy
said seemed right. Biddy was never insulting or capricious,
or Biddy to-day and somebody else tomorrow ; she would have
derived only pain, and not pleasure, from giving me pain ; she
would far rather have wounded her own breast than mine.
How could it be, then, that I did not like her much the better
of the two ?
"Biddy," said I, when we were walking homeward, "I wish
you could put me right."
" I wish I could," said Biddy.
"If I could only get myself to fall in love with you—you
don't mind my speaking so openly to such an old acquaintance."
" Oh dear, not at all !" said Biddy. " Don't mind me."
" If I could only get myself to do it, that would be the thing
for me.
"But you never will, you see," said Biddy.
It did not appear quite so unlikely to me that evening as it
would have done if we had discussed it a few hours before.
I therefore observed I was not quite sure of that. But Biddy
said she was, and she said it decisively. In my heart I believed
her to be right ; and yet I took it rather ill, too, that she
should be so positive upon the point.
When we came near the church-yard we had to cross an
embankment, and get over a stile near a sluice-gate. There
started up, from the gate, or from the rushes, or from the ooze
(which was quite in his stagnant way), old Orlick.
" Hulloa 1" he growled ; " where are you two going ?"
m GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
" Where should we be going, but home T'
"Well, then," said he, "I'm jiggered if I don't see you
home "
This penalty of being jiggered was a favorite supposititious
case of his. He attached no defmite meaning to the word that
I am aware of, but used it, like his own pretended Christian
name, to affront mankind, and convey an idea of something sav
agely damaging. When I was younger. I had a general belief
that if he had jiggered me personally he would have done it
with a sharp and twisted hook. Biddy was much against his going with us, and said to me
in a whisper, "Don't let him come ; I don't like him." As I
did not like him either, I took the liberty of saying that we
thanked him, but we didn't want seeing home. He received
that piece of information with a yell of laughter, and dropped
back, but came slouching after us at a little distance.
Curious to know whether Biddy suspected him of having had
a hand it> that murderous attack of which my sister had never
been able to give any account, I asked her why she did not
like him 1
" Oh 1" she replied, glancing over her shoulder as he slouched
after us, "because I—I am afraid he likes me."
" Did he ever tell you he liked you ?" I asked, indignantly.
" No," said Biddy, glancing over her shoulder again, " he
never told me so ; but he dances at me whenever he can catch
my eye."
However novel and peculiar this testimony of attachment, I
did not doiibt the accuracy of the interpretation. I was very
hot indeed upon old Orlick's daring to admire her ; as hot as
if it were an outrage on myself.
" But it makes no difference to you, you know," said Biddy,
calmly.
" No, Biddy, it makes no difference to me ; only I don't like
it : I don't approve of it."
" Nor I either," said Biddy. "Though that makes no differ
ence to you."
" Exactly," said I ; " but I must tell you I should have no
opinion of you, Biddy, if he danced at you with your own
consent."
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 157
I kept an eye on Orlick after that night, and, whenever cir
cumstances were favorable to his dancing at Biddy, got before
him to obscure that demonstration. He had struck root in
Joe's establishment by reason of my sister's sudden fancy for
him, or I should have tried to get him dismissed. He quite
understood and reciprocated my good intentions, as I had reason
to know thereafter.
And now, because my mind was not confused enough before,
I complicated its confusion fifty thousand-fold, by having states
and seasons when I was clear that Biddy was immeasurably bet
ter than Estella, and that the plain honest working life to which
I was born had nothing in it to be ashamed of, but offered me
sufficient means of self-respect and happiness. At those times
I would decide conclusively that my disaffection to dear old Joe
and the forge was gone, and that I was growing up in a fair way
to be partners with Joe and to keep company with Biddy, when
all in a moment some confounding remembrance of the Havisham
days would fall upon me like a destructive missile and scatter
my wits again. Scattered wits take a long time picking up;
and often, before I had got them well together again, they would
be dispersed in all directions by one stray thought, that perhaps
after all Miss Havisham was going to make my fortune when
my time was out.
If my time had run out, it would have left me still at the
height of my perplexities, I dare say. It never did run out,
however, but was brought to a premature end, as I proceed to
relate.
CHAPTER XVin.
It was in the fourth year of my apprenticeship to Joe, and
it was a Saturday night. There was a group assembled round
the fire at the Three Jolly Bargemen, attentive to Mr. Wopsle
as he read the newspaper aloud. Of that group I was one.
A high y popular murder had been committed, and Mr.
Wopsle wm imbrued in blood to the eyebrows. He gloated
over every abhorrent adjective in the description, and identi
fied himself with every witness at the Inquest. He faintly
moaned, " I am done for," as the victim, and he barbarously bel
lowed, " I'll serve you out," as the murderer. He gave the
medical testimony, in pointed imitation of our local practitioner;
and he piped and shook, as the aged turnpike-keeper who had
heard blows, to an extent so very paralytic as to suggest a doubt
regarding the mental competency of that witness. The coroner,
in Mr. Wopsle's hands, became Timon of Athens ; the beadle,
Coriolanus. He enjoyed himself thoroughly and we all enjoyed
ourselves, and were delightfully comfortable. In this cozy state
of mind we came to the verdict, Willful Murder.
Then, and not sooner, I became aware of a strange gentleman
leaning over the back of the settle opposite me, looking on.
There was an expression of contempt on his face, and he bit
the side of a great forefinger as he watched the group of faces.
" Well !" said the stranger to Mr. Wopsle, when the reading
was done, " you have settled it all to your own satisfaction, I
have no doubt ?"
Every body stared and looked up, as if it were the murderer.
He looked at every body coldly and sarcastically.
" Guilty, of course ?" said he. " Out with it. Come 1"
" Sir," returned Mr. Wopsle, " without having the honor of
your acquaintance, I do say Guilty." Upon this we all took
courage to unite in a confirmatory murmur.
(158)
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. IS*
"I know you do," said the stranger;" I knew yon. wo ld, I
told you so. But now I'll ask you a question. Do you know,
or do you not know, that the law of England supposes every
man to be innocent until he is proved—proved—to be guilty ?'*
"Sir," Mr. Wopsle began to reply," as an Englishman my
self, I—"
" Come !" said the stranger, biting his forefinger at him.
" Don't evade the question. Either you know it or you don't
know it. Which is it to be?"
He stood with his head on one side, and himself on one side,
in a bullying, interrogative manner, and he threw his forefinger
at Mr. Wopsle—as it were to mark him out—before biting it
again.
" Now 1" said he. " Do you know it, or don't you know it ?"
" Certainly I know it," replied Mr. Wopsle.
" Certainly you know it. Then why didn't you say so at first ?
Now I'll ask you another question ;" taking possession of Mr.
Wopsle, as if he had a right to him. "Do you know that none
of these witnesses have yet been cross-examined ?"
Mr. Wopsle was beginning, " I can only say—" when the
stringer stopped him.
" What ? You won't answer the question, yes or no ? Now
I'll try you again." Throwing his finger at him again. "At
tend to me. Are you aware, or are you not aware, that none of
these witnesses have yet been cross-examined ? Come, I only
want one word from you. Yes or no ?"
Mr. Wopsle hesitated, and we all began to conceive rather
a poor opinion of him.
" Come 1" said the stranger, " I'll help you. You don't de
serve help, but I'll help you. Look at that paper you hold in
your hand. What is it ?"
" What is it ?" repeated Mr. Wopsle, eying it, much at a loss.
" Is it," pursued the stranger in his most sarcastic and sus
picious manner, " the printed paper you have just been reading
from ?"
"Undoubtedly."
" Undoubtedly Now turn to that paper and tell me whether
it distinctly states that the prisoner expressly said that his legal
advisers instructed him altogether to reserve his defense ?"
160 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
"I read that just now," Mr. Wopsle pleaded.
" Never mind what you read just now, Sir ; I don't ask you
what you read. You may read the Lord's Prayer backward, if
you like—and, perhaps, have done it before to-day. Turn to
the paper. No, no, no, my friend ; not to the top of the column ;
you know better than that; to the bottom, to the bottom."
(We all began to think Mr. Wopsle full of subterfuge )
" Well ? Have you found it ?"
"Here it is," said Mr. Wopsle.
"Now follow that passage with your eye, and tell me whether
it distinctly states that the prisoner expressly said that he was
instructed by his legal advisers wholly to reserve his defense ?
Come 1 Do you make that of it ?"
Mr. Wopsle answered, "Those are not the exact words."
" Not the exact words !" repeated the gentleman, bitterly.
" Is that the exact substance "
" Yes," said Mr. Wopsle.
" Yes 1" repeated the stranger, looking round at the rest of
the company with his right hand extended toward the witness,
Wopsle. "And now I ask you what you say to the conscience
of that man who, with that passage before his eyes, can lay his
head upon his pillow after having pronounced a fellow-creature
guilty, unheard ?"
We all began to suspect that Mr. Wopsle was not the man
we had thought him, and that he was beginning to be found
out."And that same man, remember," pursued the gentleman,
throwing his finger at Mr. Wopsle heavily ; " that same man
might be summoned as a juryman upon this very trial, and,
having thus deeply committed himself, might return to the
bosom of his family and lay his head upon his pillow, after de
liberately swearing that he would well and truly try the issue
joined between Our Sovereign Lord the King and the prisoner
at the bar, and would a true verdict give according to the
evidence, so help him God 1"
We were all deeply persuaded that the unfortunate Wopsle
had gone too far, and had better stop in his reckless career while
there was yet time.
The strange gentleman, with an air of authority not to be
GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
disputed, and with a manner expressive of knowing something
secret about every one of us that would effectually do for each
individual if he chose to disclose it, left the back of the settle,
and came into the space between the two settles, in front of the
fire, where he remained standing ; his left hand in his pocket, and
he biting the forefinger of his right.
"From information I have received," said he, looking round
at us as we all quailed before him, " I have reason to believe
there is a blacksmith among you, by name Joseph—or Joe—
Gargery. Which is the man ?"
" Here is the man," said Joe.
The strange gentleman beckoned him out of his place, and Joe
went.
" You have an apprentice," pursued the stranger, "commonly
known as Pip ? Is he here V
" I am here " I cried.
The stranger did not recognize me, but I recognized hira
as the gentleman I had met on the stairs on the occasion of my
second visit to Miss Havisham. His appearance was too re
markable for me to have forgotten. I had known him the
moment I saw him looking over the settle, and now that I stood
confronting him with his hand upon my shoulder, I checked off
again in detail, his large head, his dark complexion, his deep-set
eyes, his bushy black eyebrows, his large watch-chain, his strong
black dots of beard and whisker, and even the smell of scented
soap on his great hand.
" I wish to have a private conference with you two," said he,
when he had surveyed me at his leisure. " It will take a little
time. Perhaps we had better go to your place of residence. I
prefer not to anticipate my communication here ; you will im
part as much or as little of it as you please to your friends
afterward ; I have nothing to do with that."
Amidst a wondering silence we three walked out of the Jolly
Bargemen, and in a wondering silence walked home. While
going along, the strange gentleman occasionally looked at me,
and occasionally bit the side of his finger. As we neared
home, Joe, vaguely acknowledging the occasion as an impres
sive and ceremonious one, went on ahead to open the front door.
Our conference was held in the state-parlor, which was feebly
10
162 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
lighted by one candle. It began with the strange gentleman's
sitting down at the table, drawing the candle to him, and looking
over some entries in his pocket book. He then pot up the
pocket-book, and set the candle a little aside : after peering
round it into the darkness at Joe and me, to ascertain which
was which.
"My name," he said, "is Jaggers, and I am a lawyer in
London. I am pretty well known. I have unusual business
to transact with you, and I commence by explaining that it
is not of my originating. If my advice had been asked, I
should not have been here. It was not asked, and you see nie
here. What I have to do, as the confidential agent of another,
I do. No less, no more."
Finding that he could not see us very well from where he sat,
he got up, and threw one leg over the back of a chair, and
leaned upon it ; thus having one foot on the seat of the chair,
and one foot on the ground.
" Now, Joseph Gargery, I am the bearer of an offer to relieve
you of this young fellow, your apprentice. You would not object
to cancel his indentures, at his request and for his good ? You
would not want any thing for so doing ?"
" Lord forbid that I should want any thing for not standing
in Pip's way 1" said Joe, staring.
"Lord forbidding is pious, but not to the purpose," returned
Mr. Jaggers. " The question is, Would you want any thing t
Do you want any thing ?"
"The answer is," returned Joe, sternly, " No."
I thought Mr. Jaggers glanced at Joe as if he considered
him a fool for his disinterestedness. But I was too much be
wildered between breathless curiosity and surprise to be sure
of it.
" Very well," said Mr. Jaggers. " Recollect the admission
you have made, and don't try to go from it presently."
"Who's a going to try?" retorted Joe.
" I don't say any body is. Do you keep a dog ?"
"Yes, I do keep- a dog."
"Bear in mind, then, that Brag is a good dog, but Holdfast
is a better. Bear that in mind, will you ?" repeated Mr. Jag
gers, shutting his eyes and nodding his head at Joe, as if he
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 163
were forgiving him something. " Now I return to this young
fellow. And the communication I have got to make is, that he
has great expectations."
Joe and I gasped, and looked at one another.
" I am instructed to communicate to him," said Mr. Jaggers,
throwing his fingers at me, sideways, "that he will come into a
handsome property. Further, that it is the desire of the present
possessor of that property that he be immediately removed from
his present sphere of life and from this place, and be brought
up as a gentleman—in a word, as a young fellow of great ex
pectations."
My dream was out ; my wild fancy was surpassed by sober
reality ; Miss Havisham was going to make my fortune on a
grand scale.
" Now, Mr. Pip," pursued the lawyer, " I address the rest of
what I have to say to you. You are to understand first, that
it is the request of the person from whom I take my instructions,
that you always bear the name of Pip. You will have no objec
tion, I dare say, to your great expectations being encumbered
with that easy condition. But if you have any objection, this
is the time to mention it."
My heart was beating so fast, and there was such a singing
in my ears, that I could scarcely stammer I had no objection.
" I should think not 1 Now you are to understand, secondly,
Mr. Pip, that the name of the person who is your liberal bene
factor remains a profound secret until the person chooses to re
veal it. I am empowered to mention that it is the intention of
the person to reveal it at first hand by word of mouth to your
self. When that intention may be carried out I can not say ;
no one can say. It may be years hence ; even many years.
Now, you are distinctly to understand that you are most posi
tively prohibited from making any inquiry on this head, or any
allusion or reference, however distant, to any individual whom
soever as the individual in all the communications you may
have with me. If you have a suspicion in your own breast,
keep that suspicion in your own breast. It is not the least to
the purpose what the reasons of this prohibition are: there may
be the strongest and gravest reasons, or they may be mere whim.
That is not for you to inquire into. The condition is laid
164 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
down. Your acceptance of it, and your observance of it as
binding, is the only remaining condition that I am charged
with, by the person from whom I take my instructions, and for
whom I am not otherwise responsible. That person is the per
son from whom you derive your expectations, and the secret is
solely held by that person and by me. Again, not a very diffi
cult condition with which to encumber such a rise in fortune ;
but if you have any objection to it, this is the time to mention
it. Speak out."
Once more I stammered with difficulty that I had no objec
tion.
" I should think not ! Now, Mr. Pip, I have done with stipu
lations." Though he called me Mr. Pip, and began rather to
make up to me, he still could not get rid of a certain air of
bullying suspicion ; and even now he occasionally shut his
eyes and threw his finger at me while he spoke, as much as to
express that he knew all kinds of things to my disparagement,
if he only chose to mention them. "We come next to mere
details of arrangement. You must know that, although I have
used the term ' expectations' more than once, you are not en
dowed with expectations only. There is already lodged in my
hands a sum of money amply sufficient for your suitable educa
tion and maintenance. You will please consider me your guar
dian. Oh 1" for I was going to thank him, " I tell you at once
I am paid for my services, or I shouldn't render them. It is
considered that you must be better educated in accordance with
your altered position, and that you will be alive to the import
ance and necessity of at once entering on that advantage."
I said I had always longed for it.
" Never mind what you have always longed for, Mr. Pip,'*
he retorted ; " keep to the record. If you long for it now,
that's enough. Aml answered that you are ready to be placed
at once under some proper tutor ? Is that it ?"
I stammered, yes, that was it.
" Good. Now your inclinations are to be consulted. I don't
think that wise, mind, but it's my trust. Have you ever heard
of any tutor whom you would prefer to another?"
I had never heard of any tutor but Biddy and Mr. Wopsle's
great-aunt ; so I replied in the negative.
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 165
"There is a certain tutor, of whom I have some knowledge,
who I think might suit the purpose," said Mr. Jaggers. " I
don't recommend him, observe; because I never recommend
any body. The gentleman I speak of is one Mr. Matthew
Pocket."
Ah 1 I caught at the name directly. Miss Havisham's re
lation. The Matthew whom Mr. and Mrs. Camilla had spoken
of. The Matthew whose place was to be at Miss Havisham's
head when she lay dead in her bride's dress on the bride's
table.
"You know the name?" said Mr. Jaggers, looking shrewdly
at me, and then shutting up bis eyes while he waited for my
answer.
My answer was, that I had heard of the name.
" Oh 1" said he. " You have heard of the name. But the
question is, what do you say of it ?"
I said, or tried to say, that I was much obliged to him for
his recommendation—
"No, my young friend 1" he interrupted, shaking his great
head very slowly. " Recollect yourself!"
Not recollecting myself, I began again that I was much
obliged to him for his recommendation—
"No, my young friend," he interrupted, shaking his head
and frowning and smiling both at once ; " no, no, no ; it's very
well done, but it won't do ; you are too young to fix me with it.
Recommendation is not the word, Mr. Pip. Try another."
Correcting myself, I said that I was much obliged to him for
his mention of Mr. Matthew Pocket—
" That's more like it 1" cried Mr. Jaggers.
—And (I added) I would gladly try that gentleman.
" Good. You had better try him in his own house. The
way shall be prepared for you, and you can see his son first,
who is in London. When will you come to London ?"
I said (glancing at Joe, who stood looking on motionless),
that I supposed I could come directly.
" First," said Mr. Jaggers, " you should have some new
clothes to come in, and they should not be working clothes.
Say this day week. You'll want some money. Shall I leave
you twenty guineas ?"
168 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
He produced a long purse, with the greatest coolness, and
counted them out on the table and pushed them over to me.
This was the first time he had taken his leg from the chair.
He sat astride of the chair when he had pushed the money over,
mid sat swinging his purse and eying Joe.
"Well, Joseph Gargery 1 You look dumb-foundered ?"
" I am /" said Joe, in a very decided manner.
" It was understood that you wanted nothing for yourself,
remember ?"
" It were understood," said Joe. " And it are understood.
And it ever will be similar according."
" But what," said Mr. Jaggers, swinging his purse, " what if
it was in my instructions to make you a present, as compen
sation ?"
" As compensation what for ?" Joe demanded.
" For the loss of his services."
Joe laid his hand upon my shoulder with the touch of a
woman. I have often thought him since like the steam-hammer,
that can crush a man or pat an egg-shell, in his combination
of strength with gentleness. " Pip is that hearty welcome,"
said Joe, " to go free with his services to honor and fortun', as
no words can tell him. But if you think as Money can make
compensation to me for the loss of the little child—what come
to the forge—and ever the best of friends 1" O dear, good
Joe, whom I was so ready to leave and so unthankful to, I see
you again, with your muscular blacksmith's arm before your
eyes, and your broad chest heaving, and your voice dying away.
O dear good faithful tender Joe, I feel the loving tremble of
your hand upon my arm as solemnly this day as if it had been
the rustle of an angel's wing 1
But I encouraged Joe at the time. I was lost in the mazes
of my future fortunes, and could not retrace the by-paths we
had trodden together. I begged Joe to be comforted, for (as
he said) we had ever been the best of friends, and (as I said)
we ever would be so. Joe scooped his eyes with his disengaged
wrist, as if he were bent on gouging himself, but said not an
other word.
Mr. Jaggers had looked on at this as one who recognized in
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 167
Joe the village idiot, and in me his keeper. When it was over,
he said, weighing in his hand the purse he had ceased to swing,
" Now, Joseph Gargery, I warn you this is your last chance.
No half measures with me. If you mean to take a present that
I have it in charge to make you, speak out, and you shall have
it. If, on the contrary, you mean to say—" Here, to his great
amazement, he was stopped by Joe's suddenly working round
him with every demonstration of a fell pugilistic purpose.
"Which I meantersay," cried Joe, "that if you come into
my place bull-baiting and badgering me, come out ! Which I
meantersay as such if you're a man, come on 1 Which I meant
ersay that what I say I meantersay, and stand or fall by 1"
I drew Joe away, and he immediately became placable ;
merely stating to me, in an obliging manner, and as a polite expostulatory
notice to any one whom it might concern, that he
were not a-going to be bull-bailed and badgered in his own
place. Mr. Jaggers had risen when Joe demonstrated, and had
backed to near the door. Without evincing any inclination to
come in again, he there delivered his valedictory remarks. They
were these :
" Well, Mr. Pip, I think the sooner you leave here—as you
are to be a gentleman—the better. Let it stand for this day
week, and you shall receive my printed address in the mean
time. You can take a hackney-coach at the stage-coach office
in London, and come straight to me. Understand that I ex
press no opinion, one way or other, on the trust I undertake. I
am paid for undertaking it, and I do so. Now, understand
that, finally. Understand that 1"
He was throwing his finger at both of us, and I think would
have gone on, but for his seeming to think Joe dangerous, and
going off.
Something came into my head which induced me to run after
him, as he was going down to the Jolly Bargemen where he
had left a hired carriage.
" I beg your pardon, Mr. Jaggers."
" Halloa !" said he, facing round, " what's the matter ?"
"I wish to be quite right, Mr. Jaggers, and to keep to your
directions ; so I thought I had better ask. Would there be
168 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
any objection to my taking leave of any one I know about here
before I go away ?"
" No," said he, looking as if he hardly understood me.
" I don't mean in the village only, but up town."
" No," said he. " No objection."
I thanked him and ran home again, and there I found that
Joe had already locked the front door, and vacated the stateparlor,
and was seated by the kitchen fire with a hand on
each knee, gazing intently at the burning coals. I too sat
down before the fire and gazed at the coals, and nothing was
said for a long time.
My sister was in her cushioned chair in her corner, and
Biddy sat at her needle-work before the fire, and Joe sat
next Biddy, and I sat next Joe in the corner opposite my
sister. The more I looked into the glowing coals the more
incapable I became of looking at Joe; the longer the silence
lasted the more unable I felt to speak.
At length I got out, " Joe, have you told Biddy ?"
" No, Pip," returned Joe, still looking at the fire, and hold
ing his knees tight, as if he had private information that they
intended to make off somewhere, " which I left it to yourself, Pip."
" I would rather you told, Joe."
" Pip's a gentleman of fortun', then," said Joe, " and God
bless him in it 1"
Biddy dropped her work and looked at me. Joe held his
knees and looked at me. I looked at both of them. After a
pause they both heartily congratulated me; but there was a
certain touch of sadness in their congratulations that I rather
resented.
I took it upon myself to impress Biddy (and through
Biddy, Joe) with the grave obligation I considered my friends
under, to know nothing and say nothing about the maker of my
fortune. It would all come out in good time, I observed,
and in the mean while nothing was to be said save that I had
come into great expectations from a mysterious patron.
Biddy nodded her head thoughtfully at the fire as she took
up her work again, and said she would be very particular,
and Joe, still detaining his knees, said, " Ay, ay, I'll be
ekervally partickler, Pip ;" and then they congratulated me
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 169
again, and went on to express so much wonder at the notion
of my being a gentleman that I didn't half like it.
Infinite pains were then taken by Biddy to convey to my
sister some idea of what had happened. To the best of my
belief those efforts entirely failed. She laughed and nodded
her head a great many times, and even repeated after Biddy
the words "Pip" and "Property." But I doubt if they had
more meaning in them than an election cry, and I can not
suggest a darker picture of her state of mind.
I never could have believed it without experience, but as
Joe and Biddy became more at their cheerful ease again I
became quite gloomy. Dissatisfied with my fortune of course
I could not be ; but it is possible that I may have been,
without quite knowing it, dissatisfied with myself.
Any how, I sat with my elbow on my knee and my face
upon my hand, looking into the fire, as those two talked
about my going away, and about what they should do with me,
and all that. And whenever I caught one of them looking
at me, though never so pleasantly (and they often looked at
me—particularly Biddy), I felt in a manner offended : as if
they were expressing some mistrust of me. Though Heaven
knows they never did by word or sign.
At those times I would get up and look out at the door ;
for our kitchen door opened at once upon the night, and stood
open on summer evenings to air the room. The very stars to
which I then raised my eyes, I am afraid I took to be but
poor and humble stars for glittering on the rustic objects
among which I had passed my life.
" Saturday night," said I, when we sat at our supper of
bread-and-cheese and beer. " Five more days, and then the
day before the day 1 They'll soon go."
"Yes, Pip," observed Joe, whose voice sounded hollow in
his beer mug. " They'll soon go."
" Soon, soon go," said Biddy.
"I have been thinking, Joe, that when I go down town
on Monday, and order my new clothes, I shall tell the tailor
that I'll come and put them on there- or that I'll have them
sent to Mr. Pumblechook's. It would be very disagreeable to
be stared at by all the people here."
170 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
" Mr. and Mrs. Hubble might like to see you In your new
figure too, Pip," said Joe, industriously cutting his bread, with
his cheese on it, in the palm of his left hand, and glancing at
my untasted supper as if he thought of the time when we
used to compare slices. " So might Wopsle. And the Jolly
Bargemen might take it as a compliment."
"That's just what I don't want, Joe. They would make
such a business of it—such a coarse and common business—
that I couldn't bear myself."
" Ah, that indeed, Pip 1" said Joe. " If you couldn't abear
yourself—"
Biddy asked me here, as she sat holding my sister's plate,
" Have you thought about when you'll show yourself to Mr.
Gargery, and your sister, and me ? You will show yourself
to us, won't you ?"
"Biddy," I returned, with some resentment, "you are so
exceedingly quick that it's difficult to keep up with you."
(" She always were quick," observed Joe.)
" If you had waited another moment, Biddy, you would have
heard me say that I shall bring my clothes here in a bundle
one evening—most likely on the evening before I go away."
Biddy said no more. Handsomely forgiving her, I soon
exchanged an affectionate good-night with her and Joe, and
went up to bed. When I got into my little room I sat down
and took a long look at it, as a mean little room that I should
Boon be parted from and raised above, forever. It was furnished
with fresh young remembrances too, and even at the same
moment I fell into much the same confused division of mind
between it and the better rooms to which I was going, as I
had been in so often between the forge and Miss Havisham's,
and Biddy and Estella.
The sun had been shining brightly all day on the roof of my
attic, and the room was warm. As I put the window open and
stood looking out, I saw Joe come slowly forth at the dark
door below and take a turn or two in the air ; and then I saw
Biddy come and bring him a pipe and light it for him. He
never smoked so late, and it seemed to hint to me that he
wanted comforting, for some reason or other.
He presently stood at the door immediately beneath me,
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 171
smoking his pipe, and Biddy stood there too, quietly talking to
him, and I knew that they talked of me, for I heard my name
mentioned in a loving tone by both of them more than once.
I would not have listened for more, if I could have heard more :
so I drew away from the window, and sat down in my one
chair by the bedside, feeling it very sorrowful and strange
that this first night of my bright fortunes should be the loneliest
I had ever known.
Looking toward the window, I saw light wreaths from Joe's
pipe floating there, and I fancied it was like a blessing from
Joe—not obtruded on me or paraded before me, but pervading
the air we shared together. I put my light out and crept into
bed ; and it was an uneasy bed now, and I never slept the old
Bound sleep in it any more.
CHAPTER XIX.
Morning made a considerable difference in my general
prospect of Life, and brightened it so much that it scarcely
seemed the same. What lay heaviest on my mind was the
consideration that six days intervened between me and the
day of departure ; for I could not divest myself of a misgiving
that something might happen to London in the mean while,
and that, when I got there, it would be either greatly deterio
rated or clean gone.
Joe and Biddy were very sympathetic and pleasant when I
spoke of our approaching separation ; but they only referred
to it when I did. After breakfast Joe brought out my indentures
from the press in the best parlor, and we put them in the fire,
and I felt that I was free. With all the novelty of my eman
cipation on me, I went to church with Joe, and thought perhaps
the clergyman wouldn't have read that about the rich man and
the kingdom of Heaven if he had known all.
After an early dinner I strolled out alone, purposing to finish
off the marshes at once, and get them done with. As I passed
the church, I felt (as I had felt during service in the morning)
a sublime compassion for the poor creatures who were destined
to go there, Sunday after Sunday, all their lives through, and
to lie obscurely at last among the low green mounds. I
promised myself that I would do something for them one of
these days, and formed a plan in outline for bestowing a dinner
of roast beef and plum-pudding, a pint of ale, and a gallon of
condescension, upon every body in the village.
If I had often thought before, with something allied to shame,
of my companionship with the fugitive whom I had once seen
limping among those graves, what were my thoughts on this
Sunday, when the place recalled the wretch, ragged and shiver
ing, with h is felon iron and badge 1 My comfort was that it (172)
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 173
happened a long time ago, and that he had doubtless been
transported a long way off, and that he was dead to me, and
might be veritably dead into the bargain.
No more low, wet grounds, no more dykes and sluices, no
more of these grazing cattle—though they seemed, in their dull
manner, to wear a more respectful air now, and to face round,
in order that they might stare as long as possible at the pos
sessor of such great expectations—farewell, monotonous ac
quaintances of my childhood, henceforth I was for London and
greatness : not for smith's work in general and for you 1 I made
my exultant way to the old Battery, and, lying down there to
consider the question whether Miss Havisham intended me for
Estella, fell asleep.
When I awoke I was much surprised to find Joe sitting be
side me smoking his pipe. He greeted me with a cheerful smile
on my opening my eyes, and said :
"As being the last time, Pip, I thought I'd foller."
" And, Joe, I am very glad you did so."
" Thankee, Pip," said Joe.
" You may be sure, dear Joe," I went on, after we had shaken
hands, "that I shall never forget you."
"No, no, Pip 1" said Joe, in a comfortable tone, " I'm sure
of that. Ay, ay, old chap ! Bless you, it were only necessary
to get it well round in a man's mind to be certain on it. But it
took a bit of time to get it well round; the change come so
uncommon plump; didn't it ?"
Somehow I was not best pleased with Joe's being so mightily
secure of me. I should have liked him to have betrayed emo
tion, or to have said, "It does you credit, Pip," or something
of that sort. Therefore I made no remark on Joe's first head :
merely saying, as to his second, that the tidings had indeed
come suddenly, but that I had always wanted to be a gentleman,
and had often and often speculated on what I would do if I
were one.
" Have you though 1" said Joe. " Astonishing 1"
" It's a pity now, Joe," said I, "that you did not get on a
little more, when we had our lessons here; isn't it?"
"Well, I don't know," returned Joe. "I'm so awful dull.
I'm only master of my own trade. It were always a pity as 1
174 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
was so awful dull ; but it's no more of a pity now than it was—
say this day twelvemonth—don't you see?"
What I had meant was, that when I came into my property
and was able to do something for Joe, it would have been much
more agreeable if he had been better qualified for a rise in station.
He was so perfectly innocent of my meaning, however, that I
thought I would mention it to Biddy in preference.
So, when we had walked home and had had tea, I took Biddy
into our little garden by the side of the lane, and, after throwing
out in a general way for the elevation of her spirits, that I
should never forget her, said I had a favor to ask of her.
" And it is, Biddy," said I, " that you will not omit any oppor
tunity of helping Joe on a little."
" How helping him on " asked Biddy, with a steady sort of
glance.
" Well 1 Joe is a dear good fellow—in fact, I think he is the
dearest fellow that ever lived—but he is rather backward in
some things. For instance, Biddy, in his learning and his man
ners."
Although I was looking at Biddy as I spoke, and although
she opened her eyes very wide when I had spoken, she did not
look at me.
"Oh, his manners! Won't his manners do then?" asked
Biddy, plucking a black currant leaf.
" My dear Biddy, they do very well here—"
" Oh 1 they do very well here ?" interposed Biddy, looking
closely at the leaf in her hand.
" Hear me out—but if I were to remove Joe into a higher
sphere, as I shall hope to remove him when I come into my
property, they would hardly do him justice."
"And don't you think he knows that?" asked Biddy.
It was such a very provoking question (for it had never in
the most distant manner occurred to me), that I said, snap
pishly, "Biddy, what do you mean ?"
Biddy having rubbed the leaf to pieces between her hands—
and the smell of a black currant bush has ever since recalled to
me that evening in the little garden by the side of the lane—
Baid, " Have you ever considered that he may be proud ?"
"Proud 1" I repeated, with disdainful emphasis.
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 178
" Oh ! there are many kinds of pride," said Biddy, looking full
at me and shaking her head ; " pride is not all of one kind—"
" Well 1 What are you stopping for " said I.
" Not all of one kind," resumed Biddy. " He may be too
proud to let any one take him out of a place that he is compe
tent to fill, and fills well and with respect. To tell you the
truth, I think he is ; though it sounds be 1d in me to say so, for
you must know him far better than I do."
" Now, Biddy," said I, " I am very sorry to see this in you.
I did not expect to see this in you. You are envious, Biddy,
and grudging. You are dissatisfied on account of my rise in
fortune, and you can't help showing it."
" If you have the heart to think so," returned Biddy, " say
so. Say so over and over again, if you have the heart to
think so."
" If you have the heart to be so, you mean, Biddy," said I, in
a virtuous and superior tone; "don't put it off upon me. I
am very sorry to see it, and it's a—it's a bad side of human
nature. I did intend to ask you to use any little opportunities
you might have after I was gone of improving dear Joe. But
after this I ask you nothing. I am extremely sorry to see this
in you, Biddy," I repeated. "It's a—it's a bad side of human
nature."
" Whether you scold me or approve of me," returned poor
Biddy, " you may equally depend upon my trying to do all that
lies in my power here at all times. And whatever opinion you
take away of me, shall make no difference in my remembrance of
you. Yet a gentleman should not be unjust neither," said Biddy,
turning away her head.
I again warmly repeated that it was a bad side of human
nature (in which sentiment, waiving its application, I have since
seen reason to think I was right), and I walked down the little
path away from Biddy, and Biddy went into the house, and I
went out at the garden gate and took a dejected stroll until
supper-time ; again feeling it very sorrowful and strange that
this, the second night of my bright fortunes, should be as lonely
and unsatisfactory as the first.
But morning once more brightened my view, and I extended
my clemency to Biddy, and we dropped the subject. Putting
176 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
on the best clothes I had, I went into town as early as I could
hope to find the shops open, and presented myself before Mr.
Trabb, the tailor, who was having his breakfast in the parlor
behind his shop, and who did not think it worth his while to
come out to me, but called me in to him.
"Well 1" said Mr. Trabb, in a hail-fellow-well-met kind of
way. " How are you, and what can I do for you ?"
Mr. Trabb had sliced his hot roll into three feather beds, and
was slipping butter in between the blankets, and covering it up.
He was a prosperous old bachelor, and his open window looked
into a prosperous little garden and orchard, and there was a
prosperous iron safe let into the wall at the side of his fire-place,
and I did not doubt that heaps of his prosperity were put
away in it in bags. " Mr. Trabb," said I, "it's an unpleasant thing to have to
mention, because it looks like boasting ; but I have come into a
handsome property."
A change passed over Mr. Trabb. He forgot the butter in
bed, got up from the bedside, and wiped his fingers on the table
cloth, exclaiming, " Lord bless my soul 1"
" I am going up to my guardian in London," said I, casually
drawing some guineas out of my pocket and looking at them ;
"and I want a fashionable suit of clothes to go in. I wish
to pay for them," I added—otherwise I thought he might
only pretend to make them, "with ready money."
" My dear Sir," said Mr. Trabb, as he respectfully bent
his body, opened his arms, and took the liberty of touching me
on the outside of each elbow, " don't hurt me by mentioning
that. May I venture to congratulate you ? Would you do me
the favor of stepping into the shop ?"
Now Mr. Trabb's boy was the most audacious boy in all that
country-side. When I had entered he was sweeping the shop,
and he had sweetened his labors by sweeping over me. He
was still sweeping when I came out into the shop with Mr.
Trabb. and he knocked the broom against all possible corners
and obstacles, to express (as I understood it) equality with
any blacksmith, alive or dead.
"Hold that noise," said Mr. Trabb, with the greatest stern
ness, "or I'll knock your head off 1 Do me the favor to be
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 177
seated, Sir. Now this," said Mr. Trabb, taking down a roll of
cloth, and tiding it out in a flowing manner over the counter,
preparatory to getting his hand under it to show the gloss, " is
a very sweet article. I can recommend it for your purpose,
Sir, because it really is extra super. But you shall see some
others. Give me Number Four, you 1" (To the boy, and with
dreadful severity, foreseeing the danger of that miscreant's
brushing me with it, or making some other sign of familiarity.)
Mr. Trabb never removed his stern eye from the boy until
he had deposited number four on the counter and was at a safe
distance again. Then he commanded him to bring number
five and number eight. " And let me have none of your tricks
here," said Mr. Trabb, " or you shall repent it, you young
scoundrel, the longest day you have to live."
Mr. Trabb then bent over number four, and in a sort of
deferential confidence recommended it to me as a light article
for summer wear, an article much in vogue among' the nobility
and gentry, an article that it would ever be an honor to him to
reflect upon a distinguished fellow-townsman's (if he might
claim me for a fellow-townsman) having worn. "Are you
bringing numbers five and eight, you vagabond," said Mr.
Trabb to the boy after that; "or shall I kick you out of the
shop and bring them myself ?"
I selected the materials for a suit, with the assistance of Mr.
Trabb's judgment, and re-entered the parlor to be measured.
For, although Mr. Trabb had my measure already, and had
previously been quite contented with it, he said apologetically
that it " wouldn't do under existing circumstances, Sir—wouldn't
do at all." So Mr. Trabb measured and calculated me, in the parlor, as if I were an estate and he the finest species of sur
veyor, and gave himself such a world of trouble that I felt that
no suit of clothes could possibly remunerate him for his pains.
When he had at last done, and had appointed to send the
articles to Mr. Pumblechook's on the Thursday evening, he
said, with his hand upon the parlor lock, " I know, Sir, that
London gentlemen can not be expected to patronize local work,
as a rule ; but if you would give me a turn now and then in
the quality of a townsman, I should greatly esteem it. Good
morning, Sir ; much obliged. Door 1"
11
178 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
The last word was flung at the boy, who had not the least
notion what it meant. But I saw him collapse as his master
rubbed me out with his hands, and my first decided experience
of the stupendous power of money was, that it had morally
laid upon his back Trabb's boy.
After this memorable event, I went to the hatter's, and the
bootmaker's, and the hosier's, and felt rather like Mother
Hubbard's dog, whose outfit required the services of so many
trades. I also went to the coach-office, and took my place for
seven o'clock on Saturday morning. It was not necessary to
explain every where that I had come into a handsome
property ; but whenever I said any thing to that effect, it
followed that the officiating tradesman ceased to have his
attention diverted through the window by the High Street,
and concentrated his mind upon me. When I had ordered
every thing I wanted I directed my steps toward Pumblechook's,
and as I approached that gentleman's place of business I saw
him standing at his door.
He was waiting for me with great impatience. He had been
out early with the chaise-cart, and had called at the forge and
heard the news. He had prepared a collation for me in the
Barnwell parlor, and he too ordered his shopman to "come out
of the gangway" as my sacred person passed.
" My dear friend," said Mr. Pumblechook, taking me by
both hands, when he and I and the collation were alone, "I
give you joy of your good fortune. Well deserved, well
deserved 1"
This was coming to the point, and I thought it a sensible
way of expressing himself.
" To think," said Mr. Pumblechook, after snorting admiration
at me for some moments, " that I should have been the humble
instrument of leading up to this, is a proud reward."
I begged Mr. Pumblechook to remember that nothing was
to be ever said or hinted on that point.
"My dear young friend," said Mr. Pumblechook, "if you
will allow me to call you so—"
I murmured " Certainly ;" and Mr. Pumblechook took me
by both hands again, and communicated a movement to his
waistcoat that had an emotional appearance, though it was

"AND MAY I-MAY I— I"

GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 179
rather low down—" My dear young friend, rely upon my
doing my little all in your absence, by keeping the fact before
the mind of Joseph. Joseph !" said Mr. Pumblechook, in
the way of a compassionate adjuration. " Joseph 1 Joseph!"
Thereupon he shook his head and tapped it, expressing his
sense of deficiency in Joseph.
"But my dear young friend," said Mr. Pumblechook, "you
must be hungry, you must be exhausted. Be seated. Here is
a chicken had round from the Boar, here is a tongue had round
from the Boar, here's one or two little things that I hope you
may not despise. But do I," said Mr. Pumblechook, getting
up again the moment after he had sat down, " see afore me,
him as I ever sported with in his times of happy infancy ?
And may I—may I—?"
This May I meant, might he shake hands ? I consented,
and he was fervent, and then sat down again.
"Here is wine," said Mr. Pumblechook. "Let us drink,
Thanks to Fortune, and may she ever pick out her favorites
with equal judgment ! And yet I can not," said Mr. Pumble
chook, getting up again, "see afore me One—and likeways
drink to One—without again expressing—May I—may I—?"
I said he might, and he shook hands with me again, and
emptied his glass and turned it upside down. I did the same;
and if I had turned myself upside down before drinking, the
wine would not have gone more direct to my head.
Mr. Pumblechook helped me to the liver wing, and to the
best slice of tongue (none of those out-of-the-way No Thorough
fares of Pork now), and took, comparatively speaking, no care
of himself at all. " All 1 poultry, poultry 1 You little thought,"
said Mr. Pumblechook, apostrophizing the fowl in the dish,
" when you was a young fledgeling, what was in store for you.
You little thought you was to be refreshment beneath this
humble roof for one as—call it a weakness, if you will," said
Mr. Pumblechook, getting up again, "but may I ? may I ?"
It began to be unnecessary to repeat the form of saying ho
might, so he did it at once. How he ever did it so often without
mortally wounding himself with my knife, I don't know.
" And your sister," he resumed, after a little steady eating,
" which had the honor of bringing you up by hand 1 It's a
180 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
sad picter, to reflect that she's no longer equal to fully
understanding the honor. May—"
I saw he was about to come at me again, and I stopped
him.
" We'll drink her health," said I.
" Ah 1" cried Mr. Pumblechook, leaning back in his chair,
quite flaccid with admiration, " that's the way you know 'em,
Sir !" (I don't know who Sir was, but he certainly was not
I, and there was no third person present) ; " that's the way
you know the noble minded, Sir 1 Ever forgiving and ever
affable. It might," said the servile Pumblechook, putting
down his untasted glass in a hurry and getting up again, " to a
common person, have the appearance of repeating—but may
I—?"
When he had done it he resumed his seat and drank to my
sister. "Let us never be blind," said Mr. Pumblechook, "to
her faults of temper, but it is to be hoped she meant well."
At about this time I began to observe that he was getting
flushed in the face ; as to myself, I felt all face, steeped in wine
and smarting.
I mentioned to Mr. Pumblechook that I wished to have my
clothes sent to his house, and he was ecstatic on my so distin
guishing him. I mentioned my reason for desiring to avoid
observation in the village, and he landed it to the skies. There
was nobody but himself, he intimated, worthy of my confidence,
and—in short, might he ? Then he asked me tenderly if I re
membered our boyish games at sums, and how we had gone to
gether to have me bound apprentice, and, in effect, how he had
ever been my favorite fancy and my chosen friend ? If I had
taken ten times as many glasses of wine as I had, I should have
known that he never had stood in that relation toward me, and
should in my heart of hearts have repudiated the idea. Yet for
all that, I remember feeling convinced that I had been much
mistaken in him, and that he was a sensible, practical, goodhearted,
prime fellow.
By degrees he fell to reposing such great confidence in me,
as to ask my advice in reference to his own affairs. He men
tioned that there was an opportunity for a great amalgamation
and monopoly of the corn and seed trade on those premises,
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 181
if enlarged, such as had never occurred before in that, or any
other neighborhood. What alone was wanting to the realiza
tion of a vast fortune he considered to be More Capital. Those
were the two little words, more capital. Now it appeared to
him (Pumblechook) that if that capital were got into the busi
ness through a sleeping partner, Sir : which sleeping partner
would have nothing to do but walk in, by self or deputy, when
ever he pleased, and examine the books—and walk in twice a
year and take his profits away in his pocket, to the tune of fifty
per cent. —it appeared to him that that might be an opening
for a young gentleman of spirit combined with property, which
would be worthy of attention. But what did I think ? He had
great confidence in my opinion, and what did I think ? I gave
it as my opinion, " Wait a bit !" The united vastness and dis
tinctness of this view so struck him that he no longer asked if he
might shake hands with me, but said he really must—and did.
We drank all the wine, and Mr. Pumblechook pledged him
self over and over again to keep Joseph up to the mark (I don't
know what mark), and to render me efficient and constant ser
vice (I don't know what service). He also made known to me
for the first time in my life, and certainly after having kept his
secret wonderfully well, that he had always said of me, " That
boy is no common boy, and mark me, his fortun' will be no com
mon fortun'." He said with a tearful smile that it was a sin
gular thing to think of now, and I said so too. Finally, I went
out into the air with a dim perception that there was something
unwonted in the conduct of the sunshine, and found that I had
slumberously got to the turnpike without having taken any
account of the road.
There I was roused by Mr. Pumblechook's hailing me. He
was a long way down the sunny street, and was making ex
pressive gestures for me to stop. I stopped, and he came up
breathless.
" No, my dear friend," said he, when he had recovered wind
for speech. " Not if I can help it. This occasion shall not entirely pass without that affability on your part. —May I, as
an old friend and well-wisher 1 May I "
We shook hands for the hundredth time at least, and he
ordered a young carter out of my way with the greatest indig
182 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
nation. Then he blessed me, and stood waving his hand to me
until I had passed the crook in the road ; and then I turned into
a held and had a long nap under a hedge before I pursued my
way home.
I had scant luggage to take with me to London, for little of
the little I possessed was adapted to my new station. But I
began packing that same afternoon, and wildly packed up things
that I knew I should want next morning, in a fiction that there
was not a moment to be lost. So Tuesday, Wednesday, and Thursday passed, and on
Friday morning I went to Mr. Pumblechook's to put on my
new clothes and pay my visit to Miss Havisham. Mr. Pumble
chook's own room was given up to me to dress in, and was
decorated with clean towels expressly for the event. My
clothes were rather a disappointment, of course. Probably every
new and eagerly expected garment ever put on since clothes
came in fell a trifle short of the wearer's expectation. But after
I had had my new suit on some half an hour, and had gone
through an immensity of posturing with Mr. Pumblechook's
very limited dressing-glass, in the futile endeavor to see my
legs, it seemed to fit me better. It being market morning at
a neighboring town some ten miles off, Mr. Pumblechook was
not at home. I had not told him exactly when I meant to
leave, and was not likely to shake hands with him again before
departing. This was all as it should be, and I went out in my
new array : fearfully ashamed of having to pass the shopman,
and suspicions after all that I was at a personal disadvantage,
something like Joe in his Sunday suit.
I went circuitously to Miss Havisham's by all the back ways,
and rang at the bell constrainedly, on account of the stiff long
fingers of my gloves. Sarah Pocket came to the gate, and
positively reeled back when she saw me so changed ; her walnutshell
countenance likewise turned from brown to green and
yellow.
" You ?" said she. "You, good gracious? What do you
want ?"
" I am going to London, Miss Pocket," said I, " and want to
say good-by to Miss Havisham."
I was not expected, for she left me locked in the yard while
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 183
she went to ask if I were to be admitted. After a very short
delay she returned and took me up, staring at me all the way.
Miss Havisham was taking exercise in the room with the long
spread table, leaning on her crutched stick. The room was
lighted as of yore, and at the sound of our entrance she stopped
and turned. She was then just abreast of the rotted bride
cake.
" Don't go, Sarah," she said. " Well, Pip ?"
" I start for London, Miss Havisham, to-morrow"—I was
exceedingly careful what I said—" and I thought you would
kindly not mind my taking leave of you."
" This is a gay figure, Pip," said she, making her crutched
stick play round me, as if she, the fairy godmother who had
changed me, were bestowing the finishing gift.
" I have come into such good fortune since I saw you last,
Miss Havisham," I murmured. " And I am so thankful for it,
Miss Havisham 1"
" Ay, ay 1" said she, looking at the discomfited and envious
Sarah with manifest delight. " I have seen Mr. Jaggers. I
have heard about it, Pip. So you go to-morrow."
"Yes, Miss Havisham."
"And you are adopted by a rich person ?"
"Yes, Miss Havisham."
" Not named ?"
" No, Miss Havisham."
" And Mr. Jaggers is made your guardian ?"
" Yes, Miss Havisham."
She quite gloated on these questions and answers, so keen
was her enjoyment of Sarah Pocket's jealous dismay. " Well I"
she went on ; " you have a promising career before you. Be
good—deserve it—and abide by Mr. Jaggers's instructions."
She looked at me, and looked at Sarah, and Sarah's countenance
wrung out of her watchful face a cruel smile. " Good-by, Pip 1
—you will always keep the name of Pip I"
"Yes, Miss Havisham."
" Good-by, Pip 1"
She stretched out her hand, and I went down on my knee
and put it to my lips. I had not considered how I should take
leave of her ; it came naturally to me at the moment to do this.
I SI GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
She looked at Sarah Pocket with triumph in her weird eyes, and
so I left my fairy godmother, with both her hands oh her
crutched stick, standing in the midst of the dimly lighted room
beside the rotten bride-cake that was hidden in cobwebs.
Sarah Pocket conducted me down as if I were a Ghost who
must be seen out. She could not get over my appearance, and
was in the last degree confounded. I said, " Good-by, Miss
Pocket ;" but she merely stared, and did not seem collected
enough to know that I had spoken. Clear of the house, I
made the best of my way back to Pumblechook's, took off my
new clothes, made them into a bundle, and went back home in
my older dress, carrying it — to speak the truth, much more
at my ease too, though I had the bundle to carry.
And now those six days which were to have run out so
slowly, had run out fast and were gone ; and to-morrow looked
me in the face more steadily than I could look at it. As
the six evenings had dwindled away to five, to four, to three,
to two, I had become more and more appreciative of the
society of Joe and Biddy. On this last evening I dressed
myself out in my new clothes for their delight, and sat in my
splendor until bed-time. We had a hot supper on the occasion,
graced by the inevitable roast fowl, and some flip to finish
with. We were all very low and none the higher for pretending
to be in spirits.
I was to leave our village at five in the morning, carrying
my little hand-portmanteau, and I had told Joe that I wished
to walk away all alone. I am afraid —I am sore afraid—that
this purpose originated in my sense of the contrast there would
be between me and Joe if we went to the coach together. I
had pretended with myself that there was nothing of this taint
in the arrangement ; but when I went up to my little room on
this last night I felt compelled to admit that it might be so,
and had an impulse upon me to go down again and entreat
Joe to walk with me in the morning after all. I did not.
All night there were coaches in my broken sleep, going to
wrong places instead of to London, and having in the traces,
now dogs, now cats, now pigs, now men—never horses. Fan
tastic failures of journeys occupied me until the day dawned
and the birds were singing. Then, I got up and partly dressed,
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 1S5
and sat at the window to take a last look out, and in taking
it fell asleep.
Biddy was astir so early to get my breakfast that, although
I did not sleep an hour, I smelled the smoke of the kitchen
fire when I started up with a terrible idea that it must be late
in the afternoon. But long after that, and long after I had
heard the clinking of the tea-cups and was quite ready, I
wanted the resolution to go down stairs. After all, I remained
up there, trying to cheat myself by repeatedly unlocking and
unstrapping my small portmanteau and locking and strapping
it up again, until Biddy called to me that I was late.
It was a hurried breakfast with no taste in it. I got up
from the meal, saying with a sort of briskness, as if it had only
just occurred to me, "Weill I suppose I must be off!" and
then I kissed my sister, who was laughing and nodding and
shaking in her usual chair, and kissed Biddy, and threw my
arms around Joe's neck. Then I took up my little port
manteau and walked out. The last I saw of them was when
I presently heard a scuffle behind me, and looking back, saw
Joe throwing an old shoe after me and Biddy throwing another
old shoe. I stopped then to wave my hat, and dear old Joe
waved his strong right arm above his head, crying huskily,
"Hooroar!" and Biddy put her apron to her face.
I walked away at a good pace, thinking it was easier to go
than I had supposed it would be, and reflecting that it would
never have done to have an old shoe thrown after the coach,
in sight of all the High Street. I whistled and made nothing
of it. But the village was very peaceful and quiet, and the
light mists were solemnly rising, as if to show me the world, and
I had been so innocent and little there, and all beyond was so
unknown and great, that all in a moment with a strong heave
and sob I broke into tears. It was by the finger-post at the
end of the village, and I laid my hand upon it, and said,
"Good-by my dear, dear friend!"
Heaven knows we need never be ashamed of shedding tears,
for they are rain upon the blinding dust of earth, overlying our
hard hearts. I was better after I had cried than before—more
sorry, more aware of my own ingratitude, more gentle
186 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
altogether. If I had cried before, I should have had Joe with
me then.
So subdued I was by those tears. and by their breaking out
again more than once in the course of the quiet walk, that when
I was on the coach, and it was clear of the town, I deliberated
with an aching heart whether I would not get down when we
changed horses, and walk back, and have another evening at
home, and a better parting. We changed, and I had not made
up my mind, and still considered for my comfort that it would
be quite practicable for me to get down and walk back, when we
changed again. And while I was occupied with these delibera
tions, I would fancy an exact resemblance to Joe in some
man coming along the road toward us, and my heart would beat
high. As if he could possibly be there !
We changed again, and yet again, and it was now too late
and too far to go back, and I went on. And the mists had all
solemnly risen now, and the world was before me.
This is the end of the first stage of Pip's expectations.
CHAPTER XX.
The journey from our town to the metropolis was a journey
of about five hours. It was a little past mid-day when the
four-horse stage-coach by which I was a passenger got into
the ravel of traffic frayed out about the Cross-Keys, Wood
Street, Cheapside, London.
We Britons had at that time particularly settled that it was
treasonable to doubt our having and our being the best of
every thing ; otherwise, while I was scared by the immensity of
London, I think I might have had some faint doubts whether
it was not rather ugly, crooked, narrow, and smoky.
Mr. Jaggers had duly sent me his address; it was Little
Britain, and he had written after it on his card, "just out of
Smithfield, and close by the coach office." Nevertheless,
a hackney-coachman, who seemed to have as many capes to his
greasy great-coat as he was years old, packed me up in his
coach and hemmed me in with a folding and jingling barrier
of steps, as if he were going to take me fifty miles. His getting
on his box, which I remember to have been decorated with an
old weather-stained pea-green hammer-cloth, moth-eaten into
rags, was quite a work of time. Altogether, it was a wonderful
equipage, with six great coronets outside, and ragged things
behind for I don't know how many footmen to hold on by, and
a harrow below them, to prevent amateur footmen from yielding
to the temptation.
I had scarcely had time to enjoy the coach and to think
how like a damp straw-yard it was, and yet how like a rag-shop,
and to wonder why the horses' nose-bags were kept inside, when
I observed the coachman beginning to get down, as if he were
going to stop presently. And stop we presently did, in a
gloomy street, at certain offices with an open door, whereon
was painted Mr. Jaggers. (137)
18R GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
"How much?" I asked the coachman.
The coachman answered, "A shilling—unless you wish to
make it more.''
I naturally said I had no wish to make it more.
" Then it must be a shilling," observed the coachman.
"I don't want to get into trouble, I know him!" He
darkly closed an eye at Mr. Jaggers's name, and shook his
head.
When he had got his shilling, and had in course of time
completed the ascent to his box, and had got away (which
appeared to relieve his mind), I went into the front office
with my portmanteau in my hand, and asked, Was Mr. Jaggers
at home ?
" He is not," returned the clerk. " He is in Court at present.
Am I addressing Mr. Pip?"
I signified that he was addressing Mr. Pip.
" Mr. Jaggers left word would you wait in his room. He
couldn't say how long he might be, having a case on. But
it stands to reason, his time being valuable, that he won't be
longer than he can help."
With those words the clerk opened a door, and ushered me
into an inner chamber at the back. Here we found a gentle
man with one eye, in a velveteen suit and knee-breeches, who
wiped his nose with his sleeve on being interrupted in the
perusal of the newspaper. " Go and wait outside, Mike,"
said the clerk.
I began to say that I hoped I was not interrupting—when the
clerk shoved this gentleman out with as little ceremony as I
ever saw used, and tossing his fur cap out after him, left me
alone.
Mr. Jaggers's room was lighted by a skylight only, and was
a most dismal place; the skylight eccentrically patched, like a
broken head, and the distorted adjoining houses looking as if
they had twisted themselves to peep down at me through it.
There were not so many papers about as I should have expected
to see ; and there were some odd objects about that I should not
have expected to see—such as an old rusty pistol, a sword in
a scabbard, several strange looking boxes and packages, and
two dreadful casts on a shelf of faces peculiarly swollen, and
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 189
twitchy about the nose. Mr. Jaggers's own high-backed chair
was of deadly black horse-hair, with rows of brass nails round
it like a coffin ; and I fancied I could see how he leaned back
in it, and bit his forefmger at the clients. The room was but
small, and the clients seemed to have had a habit of backing
up against the wall : for the wall, especially opposite to Mr.
Jaggers'.s chair, was greasy with shoulders. I recalled, too, that
the one-eyed gentleman had shuffled forth against the wall when
I was the innocent cause of his being turned out.
I sat down in the cliental chair placed over against Mr. Jaggers's
chair, and became fascinated by the dismal atmosphere
of the place. I called to mind that the clerk had the same air
of knowing something to every body else's disadvantage as his
master had. I wondered how many other clerks there were up
stairs, and whether they all claimed to have the same detrimen
tal mastery of their fellow-creatures. I wondered what was the
history of all the odd litter about the room, and how it came
there. I wondered whether the two swollen faces were of Mr.
Jaggers's family, and, if he were so unfortunate as to have had a
pair of such ill-looking relations, why he stuck them on that
dusty perch for the blacks and flies to settle on, instead of giving
them a place at home. Of course I had no experience of a
London summer day, and my spirits may have been oppressed
by the hot exhausted air, and by the dust and grit that lay
thick on every thing. But I sat wondering and waiting in Mr.
Jaggers's close room, until I really could not bear the two
casts on the shelf above Mr. Jaggers's chair, and got up and
went out. When I told the clerk that I would take a turn in the air
while I waited, he advised me to go round the corner and I
should come into Smithfield. So I came into Smithfield, and the
shameful place, being all asmear with filth and fat and blood and
foam, seemed to stick to me. So I rubbed it off with all possible
speed by turning into a street where I saw the great black dome
of Saint Paul's bulging at me from behind a grim stone building
which a by-stander said was Newgate Prison. Following
the wall of the jail, I found the roadway covered with straw to
deaden the noise of passing vehicles; and from this, and from
190 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
the quantity of people standing about, smelling strongly of
spirits and beer, I inferred that the trials were on
While I looked about me here, an exceedingly dirty and
partially drunk minister of justice asked me if I would like to
step in and hear a trial or so : informing me that he could give
me a front place for half a crown, whence I should command a
full view of the Lord Chief Justice in his wig and robes—men
tioning that awful personage like wax-work, and presently offer
ing him at the reduced price of eighteen pence. As I declined
the proposal on the plea of an appointment, he was so good as to
take me into a yard and show me where the gallows was kept,
and also where people were publicly whipped, and then he
showed me the Debtors' Door, out of which culprits came to
be hanged : heightening the interest of that dreadful portal by
giving me to understand that "four on 'em" would come out
at that door the day after to-morrow at eight in the morning,
to be killed in a row. This was horrible, and gave me rather a
sickening idea of London : the more so as the Lord Chief
Justice's proprietor wore (from his hat down to his boots, and
up again to his pocket-handkerchief inclusive) mildewed clothes,
which had evidently not belonged to him originally, and which,
I took it into my head, he had bought cheap of the executioner.
Under these circumstances I thought myself well rid of him for
a shilling.
I dropped into the office to ask if Mr. Jaggers had come in
yet, and I found he had not, and I strolled out again. This
time I made the tour of Little Britain, and turned into
Bartholomew Close ; and now I became aware that other people
were waiting about for Mr. Jaggers as well as I. There were
two men of secret appearance lounging in Bartholomew Close,
and thoughtfully fitting their feet into the cracks of the pavement
as they talked together, one of whom said to the other when
they first passed me, that " Mr. Jaggers could do it if it was to
be done." There was a knot of three men and two women
standing at a corner, and one of the women was crying on her
dirty shawl, and the other comforted her by saying, as she pulled
her own shawl over her shoulders, "Jaggers is for him, 'Melia,
and what more could you have ?" There was a red-eyed little
Jew who came into the Close while I was loitering there, in com
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 191
pany with a second little Jew whom he sent upon an errand ;
and while the messenger was gone, I remarked this Jew, who
was of a highly excitable temperament, performing a jig of
anxiety under a lamp-post, and accompanying himself, in a kind
of frenzy, with the words, " Oh Jaggerth, Jaggerth, Jag
gerth! all otherth ith Cag-Maggerth, give me Jaggerth!"
These testimonies to the popularity of my guardian made a deep
impression on me, and I admired and wondered more than
ever.
At length, as I was looking out at the iron gate of Barthol
omew Close into Little Britain, I saw Mr. Jaggers coming
across the road toward me. All the others who were waiting saw
him at the same time, and there was quite a rush at him. Mr.
Jaggers, putting a hand on my shoulder and walking me on
at his side without saying any thing to me, addressed himself
to his followers.
First, he took the two secret men.
"Now, I have nothing to say to you," said Mr. Jaggers,
throwing his finger at them. "I want to know no more than
I know. As to the result, it's a toss-up. I told you from
the first it was a toss-up. Have you paid Wemmick?"
"We made the money up this morning, Sir," said one of the
men, submissively, while the other perused Mr. Jaggers's face.
" I don't ask you when you made it up, or where, or whether
you made it up at all. Has Wemmick got it?"
" Yes, Sir," said both the men together.
" Very well ; then you may go. Now, I won't have it!" said
Mr. Jaggers, waving his hand at them to put them behind
him. "If you say a word to me I'll throw up the case."
" We thought, Mr. Jaggers—" one of the men began, pulling
off his hat.
"That's what I told you not to do," said Mr. Jaggers
" You thought ! I think for you ; that's enough for you. If
I want you, I know where to find you ; I don't want you to
find me. Now, I won't have it. I won't hear a word."
The two men looked at one another as Mr. Jaggers waved
them behind again, and humbly fell back and were heard no
more.
"And now you!" said Mr. Jaggers, suddenly stopping, and
193 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
turning; on the two women with the shawls, from whom the three
men had meekly separated. —"Oh 1 Amelia, is it?"
" Yes, Mr. Jaggers."
"And do you remember," retorted Mr. Jaggers, "that but
for me you wouldn't be here and couldn't be here?"
"Oh yes, Sir!" exclaimed both women together. "Lord
bless you, Sir, well we knows that!"
"Then why," said Mr. Jaggers, "do you come here?"
" My Bill, Sir 1" the crying woman pleaded.
" jSow, I tell you what !" said Mr. Jaggers. " Once for all.
If you don't know that your Bill's in good hands, I know it.
And if you come here, bothering about your Bill, I'll make an
example of both your Bill and you, and let him slip through
my fingers. Have you paid Wemmick ?"
"Oh yes, Sir! Every farden."
" Very well. Then you have done all you have got to do.
Say another word—one single word—and Wemmick shall give
you your money back."
This terrible threat caused the two women to fall off
immediately. No one remained now but the excitable Jew,
who had already raised the skirts of Mr. Jaggers's coat to his
Hps several times.
" I don't know this man 1" said Mr. Jaggers, in the same
devastating strain. " What does this fellow want ?"
" Ma thear Mithter Jaggerth. Hown brother to Habraham
Latharuth 1"
' Who's he ?" said Mr. Jaggers. " Let go of my coat."
The suitor, kissing the hem of the garment again before
relinquishing it, replied, " Habraham Latharuth, on thuthpithion
of plate."
" You're too late," said Mr. Jaggers. " I am over the way."
" Holy father, Mithter Jaggerth 1" cried my excitable
acquaintance, turning white, "don't thay you're again Habraham
Latharuth 1"
"I am," said Mr. Jaggers, "and there's an end of it.
Get out of the way."
" Mithter Jaggerth 1 Half a moment 1 My hown cuthen'th
gone to Mithter Wemmick at thith prethent minute, to hoffer
him hany termth. Mithter Jaggerth 1 Half a quarter of a
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 193
moment ! If you'd have the condethenthun to be bought off
from the t'other thide—at hany thuperior prithe —money no
object ! —Mithter Jaggerth—Mithter—!"
My guardian threw his supplicant off with supreme indifference,
and left him dancing on the pavement as if it were red-hot.
Without further interruption we reached the front office,
where we found the clerk and the man in velveteen with the
fur cap.
" Here's Mike," said the clerk, getting down from his stool,
and approaching Mr. Jaggers confidentially.
"Oh!" said Mr. Jaggers, turning to the man, who was
pulling a lock of hair in the middle of his forehead, like the
Bull in Cock Robin pulling at the bell-rope; "your man
comes o'.i this afternoon. Well ?"
" Well, Mas'r Jaggers," returned Mike, in the voice of a
sufferer from a constitutional cold; "arter a deal o' trouble
I've found one, Sir, as might do."
" What is he prepared to swear ?"
" Well, Mas'r Jaggers," said Mike, wiping his nose on his
fur cap this time, "in a general way, any think."
Mr. Jaggers suddenly became most irate. " Now I warned
you before," said he, throwing his forefinger at the terrified
client, "that if you ever presumed to talk in that way here
I'd make an example of you. You infernal scoundrel, how
dare you tell me that ?"
The client looked seared, but bewildered too, as if he were
unconscious what he had done.
" Spooney 1" said the clerk, in a low voice, giving him a stir
with his elbow. " Soft head 1 Need you say it face to face ?"
" Now, I ask you, you blundering booby," said my guardian,
very sternly, " once more, and for the lust time, what the man
you have brought here is prepared to swear?"
Mike looked hard at my guardian, as if he were trying to
learn a lesson from his face, and slowly replied, "Ayther to
character, or to having been in his company and never left him
all the night in question."
" Now, be careful. In what station of life is this man ?"
Mike looked at his cap, and looked at the door, and looked
at the ceiling, and looked at the clerk, and even looked at me, 12
194 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
before beginning to reply, in a nervous manner, " We've dressed
him up like—'' when my guardian blustered out:
"What? You will, will you?"
("Spooney!" added the clerk again, with another stir.)
After some helpless casting about, Mike brightened and
began again :
" He is dressed like a 'spectable pieman. A sort of pastry
cook."
" Is he here ?" asked my guardian.
"I left him," said Mike, "a settin on some door-steps round
the corner.
" Take him past that window, and let me see him."
The window indicated was the office-window. We all three
went to it, behind the wire blind, and presently saw the client
go by in an accidental manner, with a murderous-looking
tall individual, in a short suit of white linen and a paper cap.
This guileless confectioner was not by any means sober, and
had a black eye in the green stage of recovery, which was
painted over.
" Tell him to take his witness away directly," said my
guardian to the clerk, in extreme disgust, "and ask him what
he means by bringing such a fellow as that."
My guardian then took me into his own room, and while he
lunched, standing, from a sandwich-box and a pocket-flask of
sherry (he seemed to bully his very sandwich as he ate it),
informed me what arrangements he had made for me. I was
to go to "Barnard's Inn," to young Mr. Pocket's room, where
a bed had been sent in for my accommodation; I was to remain
with young Mr. Pocket until Monday; on Monday I was to
go with him to his father's house on a visit, that I might try
how I liked it. Also I was told what my allowance was to
be—it was a very liberal one—and had handed to me from one
of my guardian's drawers the cards of certain tradesmen with
whom I was to deal for all kinds of clothes, and such other
things as I could in reason want. "You will find your credit
good, Mr. Pip," said my guardian, whose flask of sherry smelted
like a whole caskful, as he hastily refreshed himself ; " but I
shall by this means be able to check your bills, and to pull
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 195
you up if I find you outrunning the constable. Of course
you'll go wrong somehow, but that's no fault of mine."
After I had pondered a little over this encouraging senti
ment, I asked Mr. Japrgers if I could send for a coach ? He
said it was not worth while, I was so near my destination ;
"Wemmick should walk round with me, if I pleased.
I then found that Wemmick was the clerk in the next room.
Another clerk was rung down from up stairs to take his place
while he was out, and I accompanied him into the street,
after shaking hands with my guardian. We found a new set
of people lingering outside, but Wemmick made a way among
them by saying coolly yet decisively, " I tell you it's no use ;
he won't have a word to say to one of you j" and we soon got
clear of them, and went on side by side.
CHAPTER XXI.
Casting my eyes on Mr. Wemmick as we went along, to
see what he was like in the light of day, I found him to be a
dry man, rather short in stature, with a square wooden face,
whose expression seemed to have been imperfectly chipped
out with a dull-edged chisel. There were some marks in it
that might have been dimples, if the material had been softer
and the instrument finer, but which, as it was, were only dints.
The chisel had made three or four of these attempts at embellish
ment over his nose, but had given them up without an effort to
smooth them off. I judged him to be a bachelor from the
frayed condition of his linen, and he appeared to have sustained
a good many bereavements ; for he wore at least four mourning
rings, besides a brooch representing a lady and a weeping willow
at a tomb with an urn on it. I noticed, too, that several rings
and seals hung at his watch-chain, as if he were quite laden
with remembrances of departed friends. He had glittering
eyes—small, keen, and black—and thin white mottled lips.
He had had them, to the best of my belief, from forty to fifty
years.
" So you were never in London before ?" said Mr. Wemmick
to me.
"No," said I.
"I was new here once," said Mr. Wemmick. "Rum to
think of now !"
"You are well acquainted with it now ?"
"Why, yes," said Mr. Wemmick. "I know the moves of it. "
" Is it a very wicked place ?" I asked, more for the sake of
saying something than for information.
" You may get cheated, robbed, and murdered in London.
But there are plenty of people any where who'll do that for
you. "
(19G)
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 197
"If then is bad blood between you and them," said I, to
soften it off a little.
"Oh! I don't know about bad blood," returned Mr.
Wemmick ; " there's not much bad blood about. If there's any
thing to be got by it."
"That makes it worse."
" You think so ?" returned Mr. Wemmick, " Much about the
same, I should say."
He wore his hat on the back of his head and looked straight
before him : walking in a self-contained way as if there were
nothing in the streets to claim his attention. His mouth was
such a post-office of a mouth that he had a mechanical ap
pearance of smiling. We had got to the top of Holborn Hill
before I knew that it was merely a mechanical appearance, and
that he was not smiling at all.
"Do you know where Mr. Matthew Pocket lives?" I asked
Mr. Wemmick.
"Yes," said he, nodding in the direction. "At Hornsey,
north of London."
" Is that far ?"
" Well ! Say five miles."
" Do you know him ?"
" Why, you are a regular examiner I" said Mr. Wemmick,
looking at me with an approving air. "Yes, I know him. I
know him 1"
There was an air of toleration or depreciation about his ut
terance of these words that rather depressed me ; and I was still
looking sideways at his block of a face in search of any encour
aging note to the text when he said here we were at Barnard's
Inn. My depression was not alleviated by the announcement,
for I had supposed that establishment to be a hotel kept by one
Barnard, to which the Blue Boar in our town was a mere publichouse.
Whereas I now found Barnard to be a ghost, and his
inn the dingiest collection of shabby buildings ever squeezed
together in a rank corner as a club for Tom-cats.
We entered this haven through a wicket-gate, and were dis
gorged by an introductory passage into a melancholy little
square that looked to me like a very confined burying-ground.
I thought it had the most dismal trees in it, and the most dismal
198 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
sparrows, ai d the most dismal cats, and the most dismal houses
(in number half a dozen or so), that I had ever seen. I thought
the windows of the sets of chambers into which these houses were
divided were in every stage of dilapidated blind and curtain,
crippled flower-pot, cracked glass, dusty decay and miserable
make-shift; while To Let To Let To Let glared at me from
empty rooms, as if no new wretches ever came there, and the
vengeance of the soul of Barnard were being slowly appeased
by the gradual suicide of the present occupants and their unholy
interment under the gravel. A frouzy mourning of soot and
smoke (I thought) attired this forlorn creation of Barnard, and
it had strewn ashes on its head and on all its members, and
was undergoing penance and humiliation as a mere dust-hole.
Thus far the sense of sight; while dry-rot and wet-rot and all
the silent rots that rot in neglected roof and cellar, rot of rat
and mouse and bug and coaching-stables near at hand besides,
addressed themselves faintly to my sense of smell, and moaned,
" Try Barnard's Mixture."
So imperfect was this realization of the first of my great ex
pectations, that I looked in dismay at Mr. Wemmick. " Ah 1"
said he, mistaking me ; " the retirement reminds you of the
country. So it does me."
He led me into a corner and conducted me up a flight of
stairs—which appeared to me to be slowly collapsing into saw
dust, so that one of these days the upper lodgers would look out
at their doors and find themselves without the means of coming
down—to a set of chambers on the top floor. Mii. Pocket,
Jun., was painted on the door, and there was a label on the letter
box, " Return shortly."
"He hardly thought you'd come so soon," Mr. Wemmick
explained. " You don't want me any more ?"
"No, thank you," said I.
"As I keep the cash," Mr. Wemmick observed, "we shall
most likely meet pretty often. Good-day."
" Good-day."
I put out my hand, and Mr. Wemmick at first looked at it
as if he thought I wanted something. Then he looked at ine,
and said, correcting himself,
" To be sure 1 Yes. You're in the habit of shaking hands?''
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 199
I was rather confused, thinking it must be out of the London
fashion, but said yes.
" I have got so out of it 1" said Mr. Wemmick — "except at
last. Very glad, I'm sure, to make your acquaintance. Goodday
1"
When we had shaken hands and he was gone, I opened the
staircase window, and had nearly beheaded myself, for the lines
had rotted away, and it came down like the guillotine. Hap
pily it was so quick that I had not put my head out. After
this escape I was content to take a foggy view of the Inn
through the window's incrusting dirt, and to stand dolefully
looking out, saying to myself that London was decidedly over
rated.
Mr. Pocket, Junior's, idea of Shortly was not mine, for I had
nearly maddened myself with looking out for half an hour, and
had written my name with my finger several times in the dirt
of every pane in the window, before I heard footsteps on the
stairs. Gradually there arose before me the hat, head, neck
cloth, waistcoat, trowsers, boots, of a member of society of about
my own standing. He had a paper-bag under each arm, and
a pottle of strawberries in one hand, and was out of breath.
" Mr. Pip ?" said he.
"Mr. Pocket?" said I. .
" Dear me 1" he exclaimed. " I am extremely sorry ; but I
knew there was a coach from your part of the country at mid
day, and I thought you would come by that one. The fact is,
I have been out on your account—not that that is any excuse—
for I thought, coming from the country, you might like a little
fruit after dinner, and I went to Covent Garden Market to get
it good." For a reason that I had I felt as if my eyes would start out
of my head. I acknowledged his attention incoherently, and
began to think this was a dream.
" Dear me 1" said Mr. Pocket, Junior. " This door sticks so 1"
As he was fast making jam of his fruit by wrestling with
the door while the paper-bags were under his arms, I begged
him to allow me to hold them. He relinquished them with an
agreeable smile, and combated with the door as if it were a wild
beast. It yielded so suddenly at last that he staggered back
200 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
upon me, and I staggered back upon the opposite door, and
we both laughed. But still I felt as if my eyes must start out
of my head, and as if this must be a dream.
"Pray come in," said Mr. Pocket, Junior. "Allow me to
lead the way. I am rather bare here, but I hope you'll be able
to make out tolerably well till Monday. My father thought
you would get on more agreeably through to-morrow with me
than with him, and might like to take a walk about London.
I am sure I shall be very happy to show London to you. As
to our table, you won't find that bad, I hope, for it will be sup
plied from our coffee-house here, and (it is only right I should
add) at your expense, such being Mr. Jaggers's directions. As
to our lodging, it's not by any means splendid, because I have
my own bread to earn, and my father hasn't any thing to give
me, and I shouldn't be willing to take it if he had. This is our
sitting-room—just such chairs and tables and carpet and so
forth, you see, as they could spare from home. You mustn't
give me credit for the table-cloth and spoons and castors, they
come for you from the coffee-house. This is my little bedroom
—rather musty ; but Barnard's is- musty. This is your bedroom ;
the furniture's hired for the occasion, but I trust it will answer
the purpose ; if you should want any thing, I'll go and fetch
it. The chambers are retired, and we shall be alone together;
but we shaVi fight, I dare say. But, dear me, I beg your
pardon, you're holding the fruit all this time. Pray let me take
these bags from you. I am quite ashamed."
As I stood opposite to Mr. Pocket, Junior, delivering him
the bags, One, Two, I saw the starting appearance come into
his own eyes that I knew to be in mine, and he said, falling
back :
" Lord bless me, you're the prowling boy 1"
" And you," said I, " are the pale young gentlemuu 1"
CHAPTER XXII.
The pale young gentleman and I stood contemplating one
another in Barnard's Inn until we both burst out laughing. li The idea of its being you 1" said he. " The idea of its being
you!" said I. And then we contemplated one another afresh,
and laughed again. "Well!" said the pale young gentleman,
reaching out his hand good-humoredly, "it's all over now, I
hope, and it will he magnanimous in you if you'll forgive me
for having knocked you about so."
I derived from this speech that Mr. Herbert Pocket (for Her
bert was the pale young gentleman's name) still rather con
founded his intention with his execution. But I made a modest
reply, and we shook hands warmly.
" You hadn't come into your good fortune at that time ?"
said Herbert Pocket.
" No," said I.
" No," he acquiesced : "I heard it had happened very lately.
I was rather on the look-out for good fortune then."
"Indeed ?"
" Yes. Miss Havisham had sent for me, to see if she could
take a fancy to me. But she couldn't—at all events, she
didn't."
I thought it polite to remark that I was surprised to hear
that.
"Bad taste," said Herbert, laughing, " but a fact. Yes, she
had sent for me on a trial visit, and if I had come out of it
successfully, I suppose I should have been provided for; per
haps I should have been what-you-may-called it to Estella."
" What's that ?" I asked, with sudden gravity.
He was arranging his fruit in plates while we talked, which
divided his attention, and was the cause of his making this lapse
of a word. "Affianced," he explained, still busy with the
(201)
202 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
fruit. " Betrothed. Engaged. What's-his-named. Any word
of that sort. "
"How did you bear your disappointment?" I asked.
"Pooh!" said he, "I didn't care much for it. She's a
Tartar."
" Miss Havisham ?" I suggested.
" I don't say no to that, but I mean Estella. That girl's
hard and haughty and capricious to the last degree, and has
been brought up by Miss Havisham to wreak vengeance on all
the male sex."
" What relation is she to Miss Havisham ?"
" None," said he. " Only adopted."
"Why should she wreak revenge on all the male sex 7
What revenge f"
" Lord, Mr. Pip 1" said he. " Don't you know ?"
" No," said I.
" Dear me 1 It's quite a story, and shall be saved till dinner
time. And now let me take the liberty of asking you a question.
How did you come there that day ?"
I told him, and he was attentive until I had finished, and then
burst out laughing again, and asked me if I was sore after
ward ? I didn't ask him if he was, for my conviction on that
point was perfectly established.
" Mr. Jaggers is your guardian, I understand ?" he went on.
"Yes."
"You know he is Miss Havisham's man of business and soli
citor, and has her confidence when nobody else has?"
This was bringing me (I felt) toward dangerous ground. I
answered with a constraint I made no attempt to disguise, that
I had seen Mr. Jaggers in Miss Havisham's house on the very
day of our combat, but never at any other time, and that I be
lieved he had no recollection of having ever seen me there.
" He was so obliging as to suggest my father for your tutor,
and he called on my father to propose it. Of course he knew
about my father from his connection with Miss Havisham. My
father is Miss Havisham's nephew ; not that that implies fami
liar intercourse between them, for he is a bad courtier and will
not propitiate her "
Herbert Pocket had a frank and easy way with him that was
GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
very taking. I had never seen any one then, and I have never
seen any one since, who so strongly expressed to me, in every
look and tone, a natural incapacity to do any thing secret or
mean. There was something wonderfully hopeful about his
general air, and something that at the same time whispered to
me that he would never be very successful or rich. I don't
know how this was. I became imbued with the notion on that
fim occasion before we sat down to dinner, but I cannot define
by what means.
He was still a pale young gentleman, and had a certain con
quered languor about him in the midst of his spirits and brisk
ness that did not seem indicative of natural strength. He had
not a handsome face, but it was better than handsome: being
extremely amiable and cheerful. His figure was a little un
gainly, as in the days when my knuckles had taken such liberties
with it ; but it looked as if it would always be light and young.
Whether Mr. Trabb's local work would have sat more grace
fully on him than on me, may be a question; but I am con
scious that he carried off his rather old clothes much better
than I carried off my new suit
As he was so communicative, I felt that reserve on my part
would be a bad return, unsuited to our years. I therefore told
him my small story, and laid stress on my being forbidden to
inquire who my benefactor was. I further mentioned that as I
had been brought up a blacksmith in a country place, and knew
very little of the ways of politeness, I would take it as a great
kindness in him if he would give me a hint whenever he saw me
at a loss or going wrong.
"With pleasure," said he, "though I venture to prophecy
that you'll want very few hints. I dare say we shall be often
together, and I should like to banish any needless restraint
between us. Will you do me the favor to begin at once to
call me by my Christian name, Herbert ?"
I thanked him, and said I would. I informed him in exchange
th(it my Christian name was Philip.
"I don't take to Philip," said he, smiling, "for it sounds
like a moral boy out of the spelling-book, who was so lazy that
he fell into a pond, or so fat that he couldn't see out of his
eyes, or so avaricious that he locked up his cake till the mice
GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
ate it, or so determined to go birds'-nesting that he got himself
eaten by bears who lived handy in the neighborhood. I tell
you what I should like. We are so harmonious, and you have
been a blacksmith—would you mind it ?"
" I shouldn't mind any thing that you propose," I answered ;
"but I don'tunderstand you."
"Would you mind Handel for a familiar name ? There's a
charming piece of music by Handel, called the Harmonious
Blacksmith."
"I should like it very much."
" Then, my dear Handel," said he, turning round as the door
opened, "here is the dinner, and I must beg of you to take the
top of the table, because the dinner is of your providing."
This I would not hear of, so he took the top, and I faced
him. It was a nice little dinner—seemed to me then a very
Lord Mayor's Feast—and it acquired additional relish from
being eaten under those independent circumstances, with no old
people by, and with London all around us. This again was
heightened by a certain gipsy character that set the banquet off ;
for while the table was, as Mr. Pumblechook might have said,
the lap of luxury —being entirely furnished forth from the coffee
house—the circumjacent region of sitting-room was of a com
paratively pastureless and shifty character : imposing on the
waiter the wandering habits of putting the covers on the floor
(where he fell over them), the melted butter in the arm-chair,
the bread on the book-shelves, the cheese in the coal-scuttle,
and the boiled fowl into my bed in the next room—where
I found much of its parsley and butter in a state of con
gelation when I retired for the night. All this made the feast
delightful, and when the waiter was not there to watch me my
pleasure was without alloy.
When we had made some progress in the dinner I reminded
Herbert of his promise to tell me about Miss Havisham.
"True," he replied. "I'll redeem it at once. Let me
introduce the topic, Handel, by mentioning that in London it
is not the custom to put the knife in the mouth—for fear of
accidents—and that while the fork is reserved for that use, it
is not put further in than is necessary. It is scarcely worth
mentioning, only it's as well to do as other people do. Also,
GEEAT EXPECTATIONS. 205
the spoon is not generally used over-hand, but under. This has
two advantages. You jret at your month better (which after
all is the object), and you save a good deal of the attitude of
opening oysters, on the part of the rijrht elbow."
He offered these friendly suggestions in such a lively way
that we both laughed, and I scarcely blushed.
"Now," he pursued," concerning Miss Havisham. Miss
Havisham, you must know, was a spoiled child. Her mother
died when she was a baby, and her father denied her nothing.
Her father was a country gentleman down in your part of the
world, and was a brewer. I don't know why it should be a
crack thing to be a brewer; but it is indisputable that while
you can not possibly be genteel and bake, you may be as
genteel as never was and brew. You see it every day."
" Yet a gentleman may not keep a public-house ; may he ?"
said I.
"Not on any account," returned Herbert; "but a publichouse
may keep a gentleman. Well 1 Mr. Havisham was very
rich and very proud. So was his daughter."
"Miss Havisham was an only child ?" I hazarded.
" Stop a moment, I am coming to that. No, she was not
an only child; she had a half-brother. Her father privately
married again—his cook, I rather think."
"I thought he was proud," said I.
" My good Handel, so he was. He married his second wife
privately, because he was proud, and in course of time she
died. When she was dead, I apprehend he first told his
daughter what he had done, and then the son became a part
of the family, residing in the house you are acquainted with.
As the son grew a young man he turned out riotous, extravagant,
undutiful—altogether bad. At last his father disinherited
him ; but he softened when he was dying, and left him well off,
though not nearly so well off as Miss Havisham. Take another
glass of wine, and excuse my mentioning that society as a body
does not expect one to be so strictly conscientious in emptying
one's glass as to turn it bottom upward with the rim on one's
nose."
I had been doing this, in an excess of attention to his re
206 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
cital. I thanked him and apologized. He said, " Not at all,"
and resumed.
" Miss IIuYisham was now an heiress, and you may suppose
was looked after as a great match. Her half-brother had now
ample means again, but what with debts and what with new
madness wasted them most fearfully again. There were stronger
differences between him and her than there had been between
him and his father, and it is suspected that he cherished a
deep and mortal grudge against her, as having influenced the
father's anger. Now I come to the cruel part of the story—
merely breaking off, my dear Handel, to remark that a dinnernapkin
will not go into a tumbler."
Why I was trying to pack mine into my tumbler I am wholly
unable to say. I only know that I found myself, with a per
severance worthy of a much better cause, making the most
strenuous exertions to compress it within those limits. Again I
thanked him and apologized, and again he said, in the cheerfulest
manner, " Not at all, I am sure 1" and resumed.
"There appeared upon the scene—say at the races, or the
public balls, or any where else you like—a certain man, who
made love to Miss Havisham. I never saw him, for this hap
pened five-and-twenty years ago, before you and I were, Handel,
but I have heard my father mention that he was a showy man,
and the kind of man for the purpose. But that he was not to
be, without ignorance or prejudice, mistaken for a gentleman,
my father most strongly asseverates ; because it is a principle
of his that no man who was not a true gentleman at heart ever
was, since the world began, a true gentleman in manner. He
says no varnish can hide the grain of the wood ; and the more
varnish you put on the more the grain will express itself. Well !
This man pursued Miss Havisham closely, and professed to be
devoted to her. I believe she had not shown much suscepti
bility up to that time ; but all she possessed certainly came out
then, and she passionately loved him. There is no doubt that
she perfectly idolized him. He practiced on her affection in that
systematic way, that he got great sums of money from her, and
he induced her to buy her brother out of a share in the
brewery (which had been weakly left him by his father) at an
immense price, on the plea that when he was her husband he
GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
mast hold and manage it all. Your guardian was not at that
time in Miss Havisham's councils, and she was too haughty and
too much in love to be advised by any one. Her relations
were poor and scheming, with the exception of my father ; he
was poor enough, but not time-serving or jealous. The only
independent one among them, he warned her that the was doing
too much for this man, and was placing herself too unreservedly
in his power. She took the first opportunity of angrily ordering
my father out of the house, in his presence, and my father has
never seen her since."
I thought of her having said, " Matthew will come and see
me at last when I am laid dead upon that table ;" and I asked
Herbert whether his father was so inveterate against her ?
"It's not that," said he, "but she charged him before her
intended husband with being disappointed in the hope of fawn
ing upon her for his own advancement, and, if he were to go
to her now, it would look true—even to him—and even to her
after all. To return to the man, and make an end of him. The
marriage day was fixed, the wedding dresses were bought, the
wedding tour was planned out, the wedding guests were in
vited. The day came, but not the bridegroom. He wrote her
a letter—"
"Which she received," I struck in, "when she was dressing
for her marriage? At twenty minutes to nine?"
" At the hour and minute," said Herbert, nodding, " at which
she afterward stopped all the clocks. What was in it, further
than that it most heartlessly broke the marriage off, I can't tell
you. because I don't know. When she recovered from a bad
illness that she had, she laid the whole place waste, as you have
seen it, and she has never since looked upon the light of day."
"Is that all the story?" I asked, after considering it.
" All I know of it ; and indeed I only know so much through
piecing it out for myself; for my father always avoids it, ar.d,
even when Miss Havisham invited me to go there, told me no
more of it than it was absolutely requisite I should understand.
But I have forgotten one thing. It has been supposed that
the man to whom she gave her misplaced confidence acted
throughout in concert with her half-brother; that it was a con
spiracy between them; and that they shared the profits."
GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
" I wonder he didn't marry her and get all the property,"
said I.
" He may have been married already, and her cruel mortifi
cation may have been a part of her half-brother's scheme," said
Herbert. " Mind 1 I don't know that."
" What became of the two men ?" I asked, after again con
sidering the subject.
" They fell into deeper shame and degradation—if there can
be deeper—and ruin."
" Are they alive now ?"
" I don't know."
"You said just now that Estella was not related to Miss
Havisham, but adopted. When adopted ?"
Herbert shrugged his shoulders. " There has always been
an Estella since I have heard of a Miss Havisham. I know no
more. And now, Handel," said he, finally throwing off the
story, as it were, " there is a perfectly open understanding
between us. All that I know about Miss Havisham you know."
"And all that I know," I returned, "you know."
" I fully believe it. So there can be no competition or per
plexity between you and me. And as to the condition on which
you hold your advancement in life—namely, that you are not
to inquire or discuss to whom you owe it—you may be very
sure that it will never be encroached upon, or even approached
by me, or by any one belonging to me."
In truth, he said this with so much delicacy, that I felt the
subject done with, even though I should be under his father's
roof for years and years to come. Yet he said it with so
much meaning, too, that I felt he as perfectly understood Miss
Havisham to be my benefactress as I understood the fact
myself.
It had not occurred to me before that he hod led up to the
theme for the purpose of clearing it out of our way ; but we
were so much the lighter and easier for having broached it, that
I now perceived this to be the case. We were very gay and
sociable, and I asked him, in the course of conversation, what
he was ? He replied, "A capitalist—an Insurer of Ships."
I suppose he saw me glancing about the room in search of some
tokens of Shipping, or capital, for he added, " In the City."
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 203
I had grand ideas of the wealth and importance of Insurers
of Ships in the City, and I began to think with awe of having
laid a young Insurer on his back, blackened his enterprising
eye, and cut his responsible head open. But, again, there
came upon me, for my relief, that odd impression that Herbert
Pocket would never be very successful or rich.
" I shall not rest satisfied with merely employing my capital in
insuring ships. I shall buy up some good Life Assurance
shares, and cut into the Direction. I shall also do a little in
the mining way. None of these things will interfere with my
chartering a few thousand tons on my own account. I think
I shall trade," said he, leaning back in his chair, " to the East
Indies, for silks, shawls, spices, dyes, drugs, and precious woods.
It's an interesting trade."
" And the profits are large ?" said I.
"Tremendous 1" said he.
I wavered again, and began to think here were greater ex
pectations than my own.
"I think I shall trade, also," said he, putting his thumbs in
his waistcoat pockets, " to the West Indies, for sugar, tobacco,
and rum. Also to Ceylon, specially for elephants' tusks."
"You will want a good many ships," said I.
"A perfect fleet," said he.
Quite overpowered by the magnificence of these transactions,
I asked him where the ships he insured mostly traded to at pre
sent ?
" I haven't begun insuring yet," he replied. " I am looking
about me."
Somehow, that pursuit seemed more in keeping with Bar
nard's Inn. I said (in a tone of conviction), " Ah-h 1"
"Yes. I am in a counting-house, and looking about me."
" Is a counting-house profitable ?" I asked.
" To—do you mean to the young fellow who's in it ?" he
asked, in reply.
"Yes; to you."
" Why, n-no : not to me." He said this with the air of one
carefully reckoning up and striking a balance. " Not directly
profitable. That is, it doesn't pay me any thing, and I have to
—keep myself." 13
GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
This certainly had not a profitable appearance, and I shook
my head as if I would imply that it would be difficult to lay by
much accumulative capital from such a source of income.
" But the thing is," said Herbert Pocket, " that you look
about you. That's the grand thing. You are in a countinghouse,
you know, and you look about you."
It struck me as a singular implication that you couldn't be
out of a counting-house, you know, and look about you; but
I silently deferred to his experience.
" Then the time comes," said Herbert, " when you see your
opening. And you go in and you swoop upon it, and you
make your capital, and then there you are 1 When you have
once made your capital, you have nothing to do but employ it 1"
This was very like his way of conducting that encounter in
the garden ; very like. His manner of bearing his poverty,
too, exactly corresponded to his manner of bearing that defeat.
It seemed to me that he took all blows and buffets now with just
the same air as he had taken mine then. It was evident that
he had nothing around him but the simplest necessaries, for every
thing that I remarked upon turned out to have been sent in on
my account from the coffee-house or somewhere else.
Yet, having already made his fortune in his own mind, he was
so unassuming with it that I felt quite grateful to him for not
being puffed up. It was a pleasant addition to his naturally
pleasant ways, and we got on famously. In the evening we went
out for a walk in the streets, and went half-price to the Theater;
and next day we went to church at Westminster Abbey, and in
the afternoon we walked in the Parks; and I wondered who
shod all the horses there, and wished Joe did.
On a moderate computation, it was many months, that
Sunday, since I had left Joe and Biddy. The space interposed
between myself and them partook of that expansion, and our
marshes were any distance off. That I could have been at our
old church in my old church-going clothes, on the very last
Sunday that ever was, seemed a combination of impossibilities,
geographical and social, solar and lunar. Yet in the London
streets, so crowded with people and so brilliantly lighted in
the dusk of evening, there were depressing hints of reproaches
for that I had put the poor old kitchen at home so far away ;
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 211
and in the dead of night, the footsteps of some incapable im
postor of a porter mooning about Barnard's Inn, under pretense
of watching it, fell hollow on my heart.
On the Monday morning at a quarter before nine, Herbert
wen to the counting-house to report himself—to look about
him, too, I suppose—and I bore him company. He was to
come away in an hour or two to attend me to Hammersmith,
and I was to wait about for him. It appeared to me that the
eggs from which young Insurers were hatched were incubated
in dust and heat, like the eggs of ostriches, judging from the
places to which those incipient giants repaired on a Monday
morning. Nor did the counting-house where Herbert assisted
show in my eyes as at all a good Observatory; being a back
second floor up a yard, of a grimy presence in all particulars,
and with a look into another back second floor rather than a
look out.
I waited about until it was noon, and I went upon 'Change,
and I saw fluey men sitting there under the bills about shipping,
whom I took to be great merchants, though I couldn't under
stand why they should all be out of spirits. When Herbert
came, we went and had lunch at a celebrated house which I
then quite venerated, but now believe to have been the most
abject superstition in Europe, and where I could not help no
ticing, even then, that there was much more gravy on the table
cloths and knives and waiters' clothes than in the steaks. This
collation disposed of at a moderate price (considering the
grease, which was not charged for), we went back to Barnard's
Inn and got my little portmanteau, and then took coach for
Hammersmith. We arrived there at two or three o'clock in the
afternoon, and had very little way to walk to Mr. Pocket's
house. Lifting the latch of a gate, we passed direct into a
little garden overlooking the river, where Mr. Pocket's children
were playing about. And unless I deceive myself on a point
where my interests or prepossessions are certainly not concerned,
I saw at once that Mr. and Mrs. Pocket's children were not
growing up or being brought up, but were tumbling up.
Mrs. Pocket was sitting on a garden chair under a tree,
reading, with her legs upon another garden chair; and Mrs.
Pocket's two nursemaids were looking about them while the
212 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
children played. " Mamma," said Herbert, "this is young
Mr. Pip." Upon which Mrs. Pocket received me with an ap
pearance of amiable dignity, and I thought her a sweet woman.
" Master Alick and Miss Jane," cried one of the nurses to two
of the children, " if you go a bouncing up against them bushes
you'll fall over into the river and be drownded, and what'll your
pa say then 1"
At the same time this nurse picked up Mrs. Pocket's handkerchief,
and said, " If that don't make six times you've dropped
it, Mum 1" Upon which Mrs. Pocket laughed, and said,
"Thank you, Flopson ;" and settling herself in one chair only,
resumed her book. Her countenance immediately assumed
a knitted and intent expression, as if she had been reading for
a week ; but before she could have read half a dozen lines she
fixed her eyes upon me, and said, " I hope your mamma is
quite well ?" This unexpected inquiry put me into such a
difficulty that I began saying in the absurdest way that if there
had been any such person I had no doubt she would have
been quite well, and would have been very much obliged, and
would have sent her compliments, when the nurse came to my
rescue.
"Well !" she cried, picking up the pocket-handkerchief, "if
that don't make seven times ! What are you a doing of this
afternoon, Mum ?" Mrs. Pocket received her property at first
with a look of unutterable surprise, as if she had never seen it
before, and then with a laugh of recognition, and said, "Thank
you, Flopson," and forgot me, and went on reading.
I found, now I had leisure to count them, that there were
no fewer than six little Pockets present in various stages of
tumbling up. I had scarcely arrived at the total when a seventh
was heard, as in the region of air, wailing dolefully.
"If there ain't Baby!" said Flopson, appearing to think
It most surprising. " Make haste up, Millers 1"
Millers, who was the other nurse, retired into the house, and
by degrees the child's wailinar was hushed and stopped, as if
it were a young ventriloquist with something in its mouth.
Mrs. Pocket read all the time, and I was curious to know what
the book could be.
We were waiting, I supposed, for Mr. Pocket to come out
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 213
to us ; at any rate we waited there, and so I had an opportunity
of observing the remarkable family phenomenon that whenever
any of the children strayed near Mrs. Pocket in their play, they
always tripped themselves up and tumbled over her—always
very much to her momentary astonishment and their own
more enduring lamentation. I was at a loss to account for
this surprising circumstance, and could not help giving my
mind to speculations about it, until by-and-by Millers came
down with the baby, which baby was handed to Flopson,
which Flopson was handing to Mrs. Pocket, when she too went
fairly head-foremost over Mrs. Pocket, baby and all, and was
caught by Herbert and myself.
" Gracious me, Flopson 1" said Mrs. Pocket, " every body's
tumbling 1"
" Gracious you, indeed, Mum 1" returned Flopson, very red
in the face ; " what have you got there ?"
"I got here, Flopson ?" asked Mrs. Pocket.
" Why, if it ain't your footstool !" cried Flopson. " And
if you keep it under your skirts like that, who's to help tumbling !
Here! Take the baby, Mum, and give me your book."
Mrs. Pocket acted on the advice, and danced the infant a
little in her lap, while the other children played about it prettily.
This had lasted but a very short time, when Mrs. Pocket issued
summary orders that they were all to be taken into the house
for a nap. Thus I made the second discovery on that first
occasion, that the nurture of the little Pockets consisted of
alternately tumbling up and lying down.
Under these circumstances, when Flopson and Millers had
got the children into the house like a little flock of sheep, and
Mr. Pocket came out of it to make my acquaintance, I was
not much surprised to find that Mr. Pocket was a gentleman
with a rather perplexed expression of face, and with his hair
disordered on his head, as if he didn't quite see his way to
putting any thing straight.
CHAPTER XXIII.
Mr. Pocket said he was glad to see me, and he hoped I was
not sorry to see him. " For I really am not," he added,
with his son's smile, "an alarming personage." He was a
young looking man, in spite of his perplexities, and his manner
seemed quite natural. I use the word natural in the sense of
its being unaffected ; there was something comic in his distraught
way, as though it would have been downright ludicrous but
for his own perception that it was very near being so. When
he had talked with me a little he said to Mrs. Pocket, rather
anxiously, "Belinda, I hope you have welcomed Mr. Pip?"
And she looked up from her book, and said, "Yes." She then
smiled upon me in an absent state of mind, and asked me if I
liked the taste of orange-flower water ? As the question had
no bearing, near or remote, on any foregone or subsequent
transaction, I consider it to have been thrown out, like her
previous approaches, in general conversational hospitality.
I found out within a few hours, and may mention it at once,
that Mrs. Pocket was the only daughter of a certain quite
accidental deceased Knight, who had invented for himself a
conviction that his deceased father would have been made a
Baronet but for somebody's determined opposition, arising out
of entirely personal motives—I forget whose, if I ever knew
—the Sovereign's, the Prime Minister's, the Lord Chancellor's,
the Archbishop of Canterbury's, any body's—and had tacked
himself on the nobles of the earth in right of this quite sup
posititious fact. I believe he had been knighted himself for
storming the English grammar at the point of a pen in a des
perate address engrossed on vellum, on the occasion of the laying
of the first stone of some building or other, and handing some
Royal Personage either the trowel or the mortar. Be that
as it may, he had directed Mrs. Pocket to be brought up from (210
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 215
her cradle as one who in the nature of things must marry a title,
and who was to be guarded from the acquisition of plebeian
domestic knowledge. So successful a watch and ward had
been established over the young lady by this judicious parent
that she had grown up highly ornamental, but perfectly helpless
and useless. With her character thus happily formed, in the
first bloom of her youth she had encountered Mr. Pocket, who
was also in the first bloom of youth, and not quite decided
whether to mount to the Woolsack, or to roof himself in with a
Mitre. As his doing the one or the other was a mere question
of time, he and Mrs. Pocket had taken Time by the forelock
(at a season when, to judge from its length, it would seem
to have wanted cutting), and had married without the knowl
edge of the judicious parent. The judicious parent having
nothing to bestow or withhold but his blessing, had handsomely
settled that dower upon them after a short struggle, and had
informed Mr. Pocket that his wife was "a treasure for a Prince."
Mr. Pocket had invested the Prince's treasure in the ways of the
world ever since, and it was supposed to have brought in but
indifferent interest. Still Mrs. Pocket was in general the object
of a queer sort of respectful pity, because she had not married
a title; while Mr. Pocket was the object of a queer sort of for
giving reproach because he had never got one.
Mr. Pocket took me into the house and showed me my
room, which was a pleasant one, and so furnished as that I
could use it with comfort for my own private sitting-room.
He then knocked at the doors of two other similar rooms, and
introduced me to their occupants, by name Drummle and
Startop. Drummle, an old-looking young man of a heavy
order of architecture, was whistling. Startop, younger in
years and appearance, was reading and holding his head, as if
he thought himself in danger of exploding it with too strong
a charge of knowledge.
Both Mr. and Mrs. Pocket had such a noticeable air of being
in somebody else's hands, that I wondered who really was in
possession of the house and let them live there, until I found
this unknown power to be the servants. It was a smooth
way of going on, perhaps, in respect of saving trouble ; but it
bad the appearance of being expensive, for the servants felt it
216 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
a duty they owed to themselves to be nice in their eating and
drinking, and to keep a deal of company down stairs. They
allowed a very liberal table to Mr. and Mrs. Pocket; yet it
always appeared to me that by far the best part of the house to
have boarded in would have been the kitchen—always suppos
ing the boarder capable of self-defense, for, before I had been
there a week a neighboring lady, with whom the family were
personally unacquainted, wrote in to say that she had seen
Millers slapping the baby. This greatly distressed Mrs.
Pocket, who burst into tears on receiving the note, and said
it was an extraordinary thing that the neighbors couldn't mind
their own business.
By degrees I learned, and chiefly from Herbert, that Mr.
Pocket had been educated at Harrow and at Cambridge, where
he had distinguished himself; but that when he had had the
happiness of marrying Mrs. Pocket, very early in life, he had
impaired his prospects and taken up the calling of a Grinder.
After grinding a number of dull blades—of whom it was
remarkable that their fathers, when influential, were always
going to help him to preferment, but always forgot to do it
when the blades had left the Grindstone—he had wearied of
that poor work and come to London. Here, after gradually
failing in loftier hopes, he had " read" with divers who had
lacked opportunities or neglected them, and had refurbished
divers others for special occasions, and had turned his acquire
ments to the account of literary compilation and correction,
and on such means, added to some very moderate private
resources, still maintained the house I saw.
Mr. and Mrs. Pocket had a toady neighbor—a widow lady
of that highly sympathetic nature that she agreed with every
body, blessed every body, and shed smiles and tears on every
body according to circumstances. This lady's name was Mrs.
Coiler, and I had the honor of taking her down to dinner on
the day of my installation. She gave me to understand on
the stairs that it was a blow to dear Mrs. Pocket that dear
Mr. Pocket should be under the necessity of receiving gentlemen
to read with him. That did not extend to Me, she told me in
a gush of love and confidence (at that time I had known her
GBEAT EXPECTATIONS. 217
something less than five minutes) ; if they were all like Me,
it would be quite another thing.
"But dear Mrs. Pocket," said Mrs. Coiler, "after his early
disappintment (not that dear Mr. Pocket was to blame in that),
requires so much luxury and elegance—"
" Yes, Ma'am," said I, to stop her, for I was afraid she was
going to cry.
" And she is of so aristocratic a disposition—"
"Yes, Ma'am," I said again with the same object as before.
" —that it is hard," said Mrs. Coiler," to have dear Mr.
Pocket's time and attention diverted from dear Mrs. Pocket."
I could not help thinking that it might be harder if the
butcher's time and attention were diverted from dear Mrs.
Pocket; but I said nothing, and indeed had enough to do in
keeping a bashful watch upon my company-manners.
It came to my knowledge through what passed between Mrs.
Pocket and Drummle while I was attentive to my knife and
fork, spoon, glasses, and other instruments of self-destruction,
that Drummle, whose Christian name was Bentley, was actually
the next heir but two to a baronetcy. It further appeared that
the book I had seen Mrs. Pocket reading in the garden was all
about titles, and that she knew the date at which her grandpapa
would have come into the book, if he ever had come at all.
Drummle didn't say much, but in his limited way (he struck me
as a sulky kind of a fellow) he spoke as one of the elect, and re
cognized Mrs. Pocket as a woman and a sister. No one but
themselves and Mrs. Coiler, the toady neighbor, showed any
interest in this part of the conversation, and it appeared to me
that it was painful to Herbert ; but it promised to last a long
time, when the page came in with the announcement of a domes
tic affliction. It was, in effect, that the cook had "mislaid"
the beef. To my unutterable amazement, I now, for the first
time, saw Mr. Pocket relieve his mind by going through a per
formance that struck me as very extraordinary, but which made
no effect on anybody else, and with which I soon became as
familiar as the rest. He laid down the carving-knife and fork
—being engaged in carving at the moment—put his two hands
into his disturbed hair, and appeared to make an extraordinary
effort to lift himself up by it. When he had done this, and
218 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
bad not lifted himself up at all, he quietly went on with what he
was about. Mrs. Coiler then changed the subject, and began to flatter me.
I liked it for a few moments, but she flattered me so very grossly
that the pleasure was soon over. She had a serpentine way of
coming close at me when she pretended to be vitally interested
in the friends and localities I had left, which was altogether
snaky and fork-tongued ; and when she made an occasional
bounce upon Startop (who said very little), or upon Drummle
(who said less), I rather envied them for being on the opposite
side of the table.
After dinner the children were introduced, and Mrs. Coiler
made admiring comments on their eyes, noses, and legs—a saga
cious way of improving their minds. There were four little girls,
and two little boys, besides the baby who might have been
either, and the baby's next successor who was as yet neither.
They were brought in by Flopson and Millers, much as though
those two non-commissioned officers had been recruiting some
where for children and had enlisted these; while Mrs. Pocket
looked at the young Nobles that ought to have been, as if she
rather thought she had had the pleasure of inspecting them
before, but didn't quite know what to make of them.
" Here 1 Give me your fork, Mum, and take the baby," said
Flopson. " Don't take it that way, or you'll get its head under
the table."
Thus advised, Mrs. Pocket took it the other way, and got
its head upon the table ; which was announced to all present
by a prodigious concussion.
" Dear, dear ! Give it me back, Mum," said Flopson ; " and
Miss Jane come and dance to baby, do 1"
One of the little girls—a mere mite, who seemed to have pre
maturely taken upon herself some charge of the others—stepped
out of her place by me, and danced to and from the baby until
it left off crying, and laughed. Then all the children laughed,
and . Mr. Pocket (w ho in the mean time had twice endeavored
to lift himself up by the hair) laughed, and we all laughed and
were glad.
Flopson, by dint of doubling the baby at the joints like a
Dutch doll, then got it safely into Mrs. Pocket's lap, and gave
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 219
It the nut-crackers to play with ; at the same time recommending
Mrs. Pocket to take notice that the handles of that instrument
were not likely to agree with its eyes, and sharply charging
Miss Jane to look after the same. Then the two nurses left the
room, and had a lively scuffle on the staircase with a dissipated
page who had waited at dinner, and who had clearly lost half
his buttons at the gaming-table.
I was made very uneasy in my mind by Mrs. Pocket's fulling
into a discussion with Drummle respecting the dates of two bar
onetcies while she ate a sliced orange steeped in sugar and wine,
and forgetting all about the baby on her lap, who did most
appalling things with the nut-crackers. At length little Jane,
perceiving its young brains to be imperiled, softly left her place,
and with many small artifices coaxed the dangerous weapon
away. Mrs. Pocket finishing her orange at about the same
time, and not approving of this, said to Jane:
" You naughty child, how dare you ? Go and sit down this
instant!"
" Mamma dear," lisped the little girl," baby ood have put
hith eyeth out."
" How dare you tell me so 1" retorted Mrs. Pocket. " Go
and sit down in your chair this moment 1"
Mrs. Pocket's dignity was so crushing that I felt quite
abashed, as if I myself had done something to rouse it.
" Belinda," remonstrated Mr. Pocket from the other end of
the table, " how can you be so unreasonable ? Jane only inter
fered for the protection of baby."
" I will not allow any body to interfere, " said Mrs. Pocket.
" I am surprised, Matthew, that you should expose me to the
affront of interference."
"Good God 1" cried Mr. Pocket, in an outbreak of desper
ation. " Are infants to be nut-crackered into their tombs, and
is nobody to save them ?"
" I will not be interfered with by Jane," said Mrs. Pocket,
with a majestic glance at that innocent little offender. " I hope
I know my poor grand-papa's position. Jane, indeed 1"
Mr. Pocket got his hands in his hair again, and this time
really did lift himself some inches out of his chair. " Hear
this !" he helplessly exclaimed to the elements. " Babies are to
OEKAT EXPECTATIONS.
be nutcrackered dead, for people's poor grand-papa's positions 1"
Then he let himself down again, and became silent.
We all looked awkwardly at the table-cloth while this was
going on. A pause succeeded, during which the honest and
irrepressible baby made a series of leaps and crows at little Jane,
who appeared to me to be the only member of the family (irre
spective of servants) with whom it had any decided acquaintance.
"Mr. Drummle," said Mrs. Pocket, " will you ring for FlopBon
? Jane, you undutiful little thing, go and lie down. Now,
baby-darling, come with ma 1"
The baby was the soul of honor, and protested with all its
might. It doubled itself up the wrong way over Mrs. Pocket's
arm, exhibited a pair of knitted shoes and dimpled ankles to
the company in lieu of its soft face, and was carried out in the
highest state of mutiny. And it gained its point after all, for
I saw it through the window within a few minutes, being nursed
by little Jane.
It happened that the other five children were left behind at
the dinner table, through Flopson's having some private engage
ment and their not being any body else's business. I thus be
came aware of the mutual relations between them and Mr.
Pocket, which were exemplified in the following manner. Mr.
Pocket, with the normal perplexity of his face heightened and
his hair rumpled, looked at them for some minutes as if he
couldn't make out how they came to be boarding and lodging
in that establishment, and why they hadn't been billeted by
Nature on somebody else. Then, in a distant Missionary way,
he asked them certain questions—as why little Joe had that hole
in his frill : who said, Pa, Flopson was going to mend it when
she had time—and how little Fanny came by that whitlow : who
saiil, Pa, Millers was going to poultice it when she didn't forget.
Then, he melted into parental tenderness, and gave them a shil
ling apiece and told them to go and play ; and then as they
went out, with one very strong effort to lift himself up by
the hair, he dismissed the hopeless subject.
In the evening there was rowing on the river. As Drummle
and Startop had each a boat I resolved to set up mine, and to
cut them both out. I was pretty good at most exercises in
which country-boys are adepts, but as I was conscious of want
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 221
ing elegance of style for the Thames—not to say for other
waters—I at once engaged to place myself under the tuition
of the winner of a prize-wherry who plied at our stairs, and to
whom I was introduced by my new allies. This practical au
thority confused me very much by saying I had the arm of a
blacksiuith. If he could have known how nearly the compli
ment lost him his pupil I doubt if he would have paid it.
There was a supper-tray after we got home at night, and I
think we should all have enjoyed ourselves but for a rather dis
agreeable domestic occurrence. Mrs. Pocket was extremely
sweet, and Mr. Pocket was in good spirits, when a housemaid
came in, and said, " If you please, Sir, I should wish to speak
to you."
" Speak to your master?" said Mrs. Pocket, whose dignity
was roused again. " How can you think of such a thing 1 Go
and speak to Flopson. Or speak to me at some other time."
"Begging your pardon, Ma'am," returned the housemaid,
"I should wish to speak at once, and to speak to master."
Hereupon Mr. Pocket went out of the room, and we made
the best of ourselves until he came back.
" This is a pretty thing, Belinda 1" said Mr. Pocket, return
ing with a countenance expressive of grief and despair.
" Here's the cook lying insensibly drunk on the kitchen-floor,
with a large bundle of fresh butler made up in the cupboard
ready to sell for grease I"
Mrs. Pocket instantly showed much amiable emotion, and
said, "This is that odious Mary Anne's doing!"
" What do you mean, Belinda ?" demanded Mr. Pocket.
" Mary Anne has told you," said Mrs. Pocket. " Did I not
see her with my own eyes and hear her with my own ears, come
into the room just now and ask to speak to you ?"
" But has she not taken me down stairs, Belinda," returned
Mr. Pocket, " and shown me the woman, and the bundle
too I ''
"And do you defend her, Matthew," said Mrs. Pocket, "for
making mischief?"
Mr. Pocket uttered a dismal groan.
" Am I, grandpapa's grand-daughter, to be nothing in the
house ?" said Mrs. Pocket " Besides, the cook has always been
222 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
a very nice respectful woman, and said, in the most natural
manner, when she came to look after the situation, she felt I
was born to be a Duchess."
There was a sofa where Mr. Pocket stood, and he dropped
upon it in the attitude of the Dying Gladiator. Still in that
attitude, he said, with a hollow voice, " Good-night, Mr. Pip,"
when I deemed it advisable to go to bed and leave him.
CHAPTER XXIV.
.After two or three days, when I had established myself in
my room, and had gone backward and forward to London
several times, and had ordered all I wanted of my tradesmen,
Mr. Pocket and I had a long talk together. He knew more
of my intended career than I knew myself, for he referred to
his having been told by Mr. Jaggers that I was not designed
for any profession, and that I should be well enough educated
for my destiny if I could " hold my own" with the average of
young men in prosperous circumstances. I acquiesced, of
course, knowing nothing to the contrary.
He advised my attending certain places in London, for the
acquisition of such mere rudiments as I wanted, and my invest
ing him with the functions of explainer and director of all my
studies. He hoped that with intelligent assistance I should
meet with little to discourage me, and should soon be able to
dispense with any aid but his. Through his way of saying this,
and much more to similar purpose, he placed himself on confi
dential terms with me in an admirable manner ; and I may state
at once that he was always so zealous and honorable in fulfilling
his compact with me, that he made me zealous and honorable
in fulfilling mine with him. If he had shown indifference as a
master, I have no doubt I should have returned the compliment
as a pupil ; he gave me no such excuse, and each of us did the
other justice. Nor did I ever regard him as having any thing
ludicrous about him—or any thing but what was serious, honest,
ud good—in his tutor communication with me.
When these points were settled, and so far carried out as
that I had begun to work in earnest, it occurred to me that if
I could retain my bedroom in Barnard's Inn, my life would be
agreeably varied, while my manners would be none the worse for
(223>
22i GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
Herbert's society. Mr. Pocket did not object to this arrange
ment, but urged that before any step could possibly be taken
in it, it must be submitted to my guardian. I felt that his de
licacy arose out of the consideration that the plan would save
Herbert some expense ; so I went off to Little Britain, and im
parted my wish to Mr. Jaggers.
" If I could buy the furniture now hired for me," said I,
" and one or two other little things, I should be quite at home
there."
" Go it !" said Mr. Jaggers, with a short laugh. " I told
you you'd get on. Well ! How much do you want ?"
I said I didn't know how much.
" Come 1" retorted Mr. Jaggers. " How much ? Fifty
pounds ?"
" Oh, not nearly so much."
" Five pounds ?" said Mr. Jaggers.
This was such a great fall that I said in discomfiture, " Oh 1
more than that."
" More than that, eh ?" retorted Mr. Jaggers, lying in wait
for me, with his hands in his pockets, his head on one side, and
his eyes on the wall behind me; "how much more?"
" It is so difficult to fix a sum," said I, hesitating.
" Come 1" said Mr. Jaggers. " Let's get at it. Twice five ;
will that do ? Three times five ; will that do ? Four times
five; will that do?"
I said I thought that would do handsomely.
"Four times five will do handsomely, will it?" said Mr.
Jaggers, knitting his brows. " Now what do you make of four
times five 1"
" What do I make of it ?"
" Ah 1" said Jaggers ; " how much ?"
"I suppose you make it twenty pounds," said I, smiling.
" Never mind what I make it, my friend," observed Mr
Jaggers, with a knowing and contradictory toss of his head
"I want to know what you make it."
" Twenty pounds, of course."
" Weminick 1" said Mr. Jaggers, opening his office-door.
" Take Mr. Pip's written order, and pay him twenty pounds."
This strongly marked way of doing business made a strongly
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 225
marked impression on me, and that not of an agreeable kind
Mr. Jaggers never laughed ; but he wore great bright creaking
boots, and in poising himself on these boots, with his large
head bent down and his eyebrows joined together, awaiting an
answer, he sometimes caused the boots to creak, as if they
laughed in a dry and suspicious way. As he happened to go
out now, and as Wemmick was brisk and talkative, I said to
Wemmick that I hardly knew what to make of Mr. Jaggers's
manner.
" Tell him that, and he'll take it as a compliment," answered
Wemmick ; " he don't mean that you should know what to
make of it. —Oh 1" for I looked surprised, "it's not personal ;
it's professional : only professional."
Wemmick was at his desk, lunching—and crunching—on a
dry, hard biscuit ; pieces of which he threw from time to time
into his slit of a mouth, as if be were posting them.
" Always seems to me," said Wemmick, "as if he had set a
man-trap and was watching it. Suddenly —click —you're
caught !"
Without remarking that man-traps were not among the
amenities of life, I said I supposed he was very skillful ?
" Deep," said Wemmick, "as Australia." Pointing with his
pen at the office floor, to express that Australia was understood
for the purposes of the figure to be diametrically on the
-opposite spot of the globe. " If there was any thing deeper,"
added Wemmick, bringing his pen to paper, "he'd be it."
Then I said I supposed that he had a fine business, and
Wemmick said " Ca-pi-tal 1" Then I asked if there were
many clerks ? To which he replied :
" We don't run much into clerks, because there's only one
Jaggers, and people won't have him at second-hand. There
are only four of us. Would you like to see 'em ? You are
one of us, as I may say."
I accepted the office. When Mr. Wemmick had put all
his biscuit into the post, and had paid me my money from a
cash-box in a safe, the key of which safe he kept somewhere
down his back, and produced from his coat-collar like an iron
pigtail, we went up stairs. The house was dark and shabby,
and the greasy shoulders that had left their mark in Mr.
14
226 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
Jaggers's room seemed to have been shuffling up and down
the staircase for years. In the front first floor, a clerk who
looked something between a publican and a rat-catcher—a large,
pale, puffed, swollen man—was attentively engaged with three
or four people of shabby appearance, whom he treated as
unceremoniously as every body seemed to be treated who
contributed to Mr. Jaggers's coffers. " Getting evidence
together," said Mr. Wemmick, as we came out, " for the Bailey."
,"n the room over that, a little flabby terrier of a clerk with
dai,&iing hair (his cropping seemed to have been forgotten when
he *ua a puppy) was similarly engaged with a man with
weak eyes, whom Mr. Wemmick presented to me as a smelter
who kept his pot always boiling, and would melt me any thing
( pleased—and who was in an excessive white-perspiration, as
of he had been trying his art on himself. In a back room,
a high-shouldered man, with a face-ache tied up in dirty flannel,
who was dressed in old black clothes that bore the appearance
of having beeii waxed, was stooping over his work of making
fair copies of the notes of the other two gentlemen, for. Mr.
Jaggers's own use.
This was all the establishment. When we went down stairs
again Wemmick led me into my guardian's room, and said,
" This you've seen already."
" Pray," said I, as the two odious casts with the twitchy
leer upon them caught my sight again, "whose likenesses
are those "
" These " said Wemmick, getting upon a chair, and blow
ing the dust off the horrible heads before bringing them down.
"These are two celebrated ones. Famous clients of ours that
got us a wond of credit. This chap, (why you must have come
down in the night and been peeping into the inkstand, to get
this blot upon your eyebrow, you old rascal !) murdered his
master, and, considering that he wasn't brought up to evidence,
didn't plan it badly."
" Is it like him I asked, recoiling from the brute, as Wem
mick spat upon his eyebrow and gave it a rub with his sleeve.
" Like him ? It's himself, you know. The cast was made
in Newgate, directly alter he was taken down. You had a
particular fancy for me, hadn't you, Old Artful ?" said Wem-

'THIS CHAP MURDERED HIS MASTER."

GEEAT EXPECTATIONS. 227
mick. He then explained this affectionate apostrophe, by
touching his brooch representing the lady and the weeping willow
at the tomb with the urn upon it, and saying, " Had it made
for me, express 1"
" Is the lady anybody ?" said I.
"No," returned Wemmick. " Only his game. (You liked
your bit of game, didn't you f) No ; deuce a bit of a lady in
the case, Mr. Pip, except one—and she wasn't of this slender, ladylike sort, and you wouldn't have caught her looking after
this urn—unless there was something to drink in it. Wemmick's
attention being thus directed to his brooch, he put down the
cast and polished the brooch with his pocket-handkerchief.
" Did that other creature come to the same end ?" I asked.
" He has the same look."
"You're right," said Wemmick, "it's the genuine look.
Much as if one nostril was caught up with a horse-hair and
a little fish-hook. Yes, he came to the same end ; quite the
natural end here, I assure you. He forged wills, this blade
did, if he didn't also put the supposed testators to sleep—and
it looked precious like it. You were a gentlemanly Cove,
too" (Mr. Wemmick was again apostrophizing), "and you
said you could write Greek. Yah, Bounceable 1 What a liar
you were 1 I never met such a liar as you 1" Before putting
his late friend on his shelf again, Wemmick touched the largest
of his mourning rings, and said, "Sent out to buy it for me
only the day before."
While he was putting up the other cast and coming down
from the chair, the thought crossed my mind that all his
personal jewelry was derived from like sources. As he had
shown no diffidence on the subject, I ventured on the liberty
of asking him the question, when he stood before me, dusting
him hands
" Oh yes," he returned, " these are all gifts of that kind. One
brings another, you see ; that's the way of it. I always take
'em. They're curiosities. And they're property. They may
not be worth much, but, after all, they're property and portable.
It don't signify to you with your brilliant look-out, but as to
myself, my guiding-star always is, "Get hold of portable
property. '.
GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
When I had rendered homage to this light, he went on to
say, in a friendly mann. i :
" If at any odd time, when you have nothing better to do,
you wouldn't mind coming over to see me at Walworth, I
could offer you a bed, and I should consider it an honor. I
have not much to show you ; but such two or three curiosities
as I have got you might like to look over ; and I am fond of
a bit of garden and a summer-house.''
I said I should be delighted to accept his hospitality.
" Thank'ee," said he ; " then we'll consider that it's to come
off, when convenient to you. Have you dined with Mr. Jaggers
yet ?"
" Not yet." "Well," said Wemmick, "he'll give you wine, and good
wine. I'll give you punch, and not bad punch. And now
I'll tell you something. When you go to dine with Mr.
Jaggers, look at his housekeeper."
" Shall I see something very uncommon ?"
" Well," said Wemmick, " You'll see a wild beast tamed.
Not so very uncommon, you'll tell me. I reply, that depends
on the original wildness of the beast, and the amount of taming.
It won't lower your opinion of Mr. Jaggers's powers. Keep
your eye on it."
I told him I would do so with all the interest and curiosity
that his preparation awakened. As I was taking my departure,
he asked me if I would like to devote five minutes to seeing
Mr. Jaggers " at it ?" For several reasons, and not least because I didn't clearly
know what Mr. Jaggers would be found to be "at," I replied
in the affirmative. We dived into the City, and came up in a
crowded police-court, where a blood-relation (in the murderous
sense) of the deceased with the fanciful taste in brooches was
standing at the bar, uncomfortably chewing something; while
my guardian had a woman under examination or cross-examina
tion—I don't know which—and was striking her, and the
bench, and every body present with awe. If any body, of
whatsoever degree, said a word that he didn't approve of, he
instantly required to have it "taken down." If any body
wouldn't make an admission, he said, " I'll have it out of you 1"
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 229
and if any body made an admission, he said, "Now I have got
yon 1" The magistrates shivered under a single bite of his
finger. Thieves and thieftakers hung in dread rapture on his
words, and shrank when a hair of his eyebrows turned in their
direction. Which side he was on I couldn't make out, for he
seemed to me to be grinding the whole place in a mill ; I only
know that when I stole out on tip-toe he was not on the side
of the bench, for he was making the legs of the old gentleman
who presided quite convulsive under the table, by his denuncia
tions of his conduct as the representative of British law and
justice in that chair that day.
CHAPTER XXV.
Bentley Drummle, who was so .sulky a fellow that he even
took up a book as if its writer had done him an injury, did not
take up an acquaintance in a more agreeable spirit. Heavy
in figure, movement, and comprehension—in the sluggish com
plexion of his face, and in the large, awkward tongue that
seemed to loll about in his mouth as he himself lolled about in
a room—he was idle, proud, niggardly, reserved, and suspicious.
He came of rich people down in Somersetshire who had nursed
this combination of qualities until they made the discovery that
it was just of age and a blockhead. Thus Bentley Drummle
had come to Mr. Pocket when he was a head taller than that
gentleman, and half a dozen heads thicker than most gentlemen.
Startop had been spoiled by a weak mother and kept at
home when he ought to have been at school ; but he was de
votedly attached to her, and admired her beyond measure.
He had a woman's delicacy of feature, and was—" as you may
see, though you never saw her," said Herbert to me—exactly
like his mother. It was but natural that I should take to him
much more kindly than to Drummle, and that even in the
earliest evening of our boating he and I should pull homeward
abreast of one another, conversing from boat to boat, while
Bentley Drummle came up in our wake alone, under the over
hanging banks and among rushes. He would always creep in
shore like some uncomfortable amphibious creature, even when
the tide would have sent him fast upon his way, and I always
think of him as coming after us in the dark or by the back-water,
when our own two boats were breaking the sunset or the moon
light in mid-stream.
Herbert was my most intimate companion and friend. I
presented him with a half-share in my boat, which was the oc
casion of his often coming down to Hammersmith ; and my (230)
GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
possession of a half-share in his chambers often took me up to
London. We used to walk between the two places at all hours,
and I have an affection for the road yet (though it is not so
pleasant a road as it was then), formed in the impressibility of
untried youth and hope.
When I had been in Mr. Pocket's family a month or two
Mr. and Mrs. Camilla turned up. Camilla was Mr. Pocket's
sister. Georgiana, whom I had seen at Miss Ilavisham's on the
same occasion, also turned up. She was a cousin —an indiges
tive single woman, who called her rigidity religion, and her
liver love. These people hated me with the hatred of cupidity
and disappointment. As a matter of course, they fawned
upon me in my prosperity with the basest meanness. Toward
Mr. Pocket, as a sort of grown-up infant with no notion of his
own interests, they showed the complacent forbearance I had
heard them express. Mrs. Pocket they held in contempt ; but
they allowed the poor dear soul to have been heavily disap
pointed in life, because that shed a full reflected light upon
themselves.
These were the surroundings among which I settled down,
and applied myself to my education. I soon contracted expen
sive habits, and began to spend an amount of money that within
a few short months I should have thought almost fabulous ; but,
through good and evil, I stuck to my books. There was no
other merit in this than my having sense enough to feel my de
ficiencies. Between Mr. Pocket and Herbert I got on fast, and
with one or the other always at my elbow to give me the direc
tions I wanted, and clear obstructions out of my road, I must
have been as great a dolt as Drummle if I had done less.
I had not seen Mr. Wemmick for some weeks, when I
thought I would write him a note and propose to go home
with him on a certain evening. He replied that it would give
him much pleasure, and that he would expect me at the office at
six o'clock. Thither I went, and there I found him putti ig the
key of his safe down his back as the clock struck.
" Did you think of walking down to Walworth?" said he.
"Certainly," said I, "if you approve."
" Very much," was Wemmick's reply," for I have had my legs
under the desk all day, and shall be glad to stretch 'em. Nov/
aREAT EXPECTATIONS.
I'll tell you what I have got for supper, Mr. Pip. I have got
a stewed steak—which is of home preparation—and a cold
roast fowl—which is from the cook-shop. I think it's tender,
because the master of the shop was a juryman in some casts of
ours the other day, and we let him down easy. I reminded him
of that when I bought the fowl, and I said, 'Pick us out a
good one, old fellow, because if we had chosen to keep you in
the box another day or two we could easily have done it.' He
said to that ' Let me make you a present of the best fowl in the
shop.' I let him, of course. As far as it goes, it's property and
portable. You don't object to an aged parent, I hope ?"
I really thought he was still speaking of the fowl, until he
added, " Because I have got an aged parent at my place." I
then said what politeness required.
" So you haven't dined with Mr. Jaggers yet ?" he pursued,
as he walked along.
"Not yet."
" He told me so this afternoon when he heard you were
coming to see me. I expect you'll have an invitation to-mor
row. He's going to ask your pals, too. Three of 'em, ain't
there ?"
Although I was not in the habit of counting Drummle as
one of my intimate associates, I said "Yes."
" Well, he's going to ask the whole gang"—I hardly felt
complimented by the word—"and whatever he gives you, he'll
give you good. Don't look forward to variety, but you'll
have excellence. And there's another rum thing in his house,"
proceeded Wemmick, after a moment's pause, as if the remark
bestowed on the housekeeper was understood; "he never lets
a door or window be fastened at night."
" Is he never robbed ?"
" That's it," returned Wemmick. " He says, and gives it out
publicly, ' I want to see the man who'll rob me.' Lord bless
you, I have heard him a hundred times if I have heard him
once, say to regular cracksmen in our front office, ' You know
where I live; now no bolt is ever drawn there; why don't you
do a stroke of business with me ? Come, can't I tempt you '
Not a man of 'em, Sir, would be bold enough to try it on for
love or money."
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 233
"They dread him so much," said I.
" Dread him ?" said Wemmick. "Ah 1 I believe you, they
dread him. Not but what he's artful, even in his defiance of 'em.
No silver, Sir. Britannia metal, every spoon."
" So they wouldn't have much," I observed, " even if they—"
"Ah 1 but he would have much," said Wemmick, cutting me
short, "and they know it. He'd have their lives, and the lives
of scores of 'em. He'd have all he could get. And it's impos
sible to say what he couldn't get, if he gave his mind to it."
I was falling into meditation on my guardian's greatness,
when Wemmick remarked :
"As to the absence of plate, that's only his natural depth.
A river's its natural depth, and he's his natural depth. Look
at his watch-chain. That's real enough."
" 'Tis very massive," said I.
"Massive?" repeated Wemmick. "I think so. And his
watch is a gold repeater, and worth a hundred pounds if it's
worth a penny, Mr. Pip 1 There are about five hundred thieves
in this town who know all about that watch : there's not a man,
a woman, or a child among 'em who wouldn't identify the
smallest link in that chain, and drop it as if it was red-hot if
inveigled into touching it."
At first with such discourse, and afterward with conversa
tion of a more general nature, did Mr. Wemmick and I beguile
the time and the road until he gave me to understand that we
had arrived in the district of Walworth.
It appeared to be a collection of back lanes, ditches, and
little gardens, and to present the aspect of a mighty dull retire
ment. Wemmick's house was a little wooden cottage in the
midst of plots of garden, and the top of it was cut out and
painted like a battery mounted with guns.
" My own doing " said Wemmick. " Looks pretty, don't it ?'
I highly commended it. I think it was the smallest house I
ever saw ; with the queerest Gothic windows (by far the greater
part of them sham), and a Gothic door, almost too small to get
in at.
"There's a real flag-staff, you see," said Wemmick, "and on
Sundays I run up a real flag. Then look here After I have
234 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
crossed this bridge, I hoist it up—so—and cut off the communi
cation."
The bridge was a plank, and it crossed a chasm about
four feet wide and two deep. But it was very pleasant to see
the pride with which he hoisted it up and made it fast; smiling
as he did so with a relish, and not merely mechanically.
"At nine o'clock every night, Greenwich time," said Wemmick,
"the gun fires. There he is, you see; and when you
hear him go, I think you'll say he's a Stinger."
The piece of ordnance referred to was mounted into a
separate fortress, lightly constructed of lattice-work. It was
protected from the weather by an ingenious little tarpaulin
contrivance in the nature of an umbrella.
" Then, at the back," said Wemmick, " out of sight, so as not
to impede the idea of fortifications—for it's a principle with
me, if you have an idea, carry it out and keep it up. I don't
know whether that's your opinion—"
I said, decidedly.
"At the back, there's a pig, and there are fowls and rabbits;
then I knock together my own little farm, you see, and grow
cucumbers ; and you'll judge at supper what sort of a salad
I can raise. So, Sir," said Wemmick, smiling again, but rather
seriously too, "if you can suppose the little place beseiged,
it would hold out a devil of a time in point of provisions.
Then he conducted me to a bower about a dozen yards off,
but which was approached by such ingenious twists of path
that it took quite a long time to get at ; and in this retreat
our glasses were already set forth. Our punch was cooling in
an ornamental lake, on whose margin the bower was raised.
This piece of water (with an island in the middle which might
have been the salad for supper) was of a circular form, and he
had constructed a fountain in it, which, when you set a little
mill going and took a cork out of a pipe, played to that pow
erful extent that it made the back of your hand quite wet.
" I am my own engineer, and my own carpenter, and my own
plumber, and my own gardener, and my own Jack of all
Trades," said Wemmick, in acknowledging my compliments.
"Well, it's a good thing, you know. It brushes the Newgate
cobwebs away, and pleases the Aged. You wouldn't mind
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 235
being at once introduced to the Aged, would you ? It wouldn't
put you out ?" I expressed the readiness I felt, and we went into the
Castle. There we found, sitting by a fire, a very old man in a
flannel coat: clean, cheerful, comfortable, and well cared for,
but intensely deaf. "Well, aged parent," said Wemmick, shaking hands with
him in a cordial and jocose way, "how are you ?"
"All right, John; all right;" replied the old man.
" Here's Mr. Pip, aged parent," said Wemmick, "and I wish
you could hear his name. Nod away at him, Mr. Pip ; that's
what he likes. Nod away at him, like winking 1"
"This is a fine place of my son's, Sir," piped the old man,
while I nodded as hard as I possibly could. "This is a pretty
pleasure-ground, Sir. This spot and these beautiful works upon
it ought to be kept together by the Nation after my son's
time, for the people's enjoyment."
" You're as proud of it as Punch ; ain't you, aged parent ?"
said Wemmick, contemplating the old man with his hard face
really softened ; " there's a nod for you," giving him a tremen
dous one ; " there's another for you," giving him a still more
tremendous one ; " you like that, don't you ? If you're not
tired, Mr. Pip—though I know it's tiring to strangers—tip
him one more. You can't think how it pleases him."
I tipped him several more, and he was in great spirits.
We left him bestirring himself to feed the fowls, and sat down
to our punch in the arbor; where Wemmick told me as he
smoked a pipe that it had taken him a good many years to
bring the property up to its present point of perfection.
" Is it your own," Mr. Wemmick?"
" Oh yes," said Wemmick ; " I have got hold of it, a bit
at a time. It's a freehold, by George 1"
" Is it, indeed ? I hope Mr. Jaggers admires it?"
"Never seen it," said Wemmick. "Never heard of it.
Never seen the Aged. Never heard of him. No; the office
is one thing, and private life is another. When I go into
the office I leave the Castle behind me, and when I come into
the Castle I leave the office behind me. If it's not in any way
236 GKEAT EXPECTATIONS
disagreeable to you, you'll oblige me by doing the same. I
don't wish it professionally spoken about."
Of course I felt my good faith to be involved in the observance
of his request. The punch being very nice, we sat there
drinking it and talking until it was almost nine o'clock.
" Getting near gun-fire," said Wemmick then, as he laid down
his pipe ; "it's the Aged's treat."
Proceeding into the Castle again, we found the Aged heating
the poker, with expectant eyes, as a preliminary to the
performance of this great nightly ceremony. Wemmick stood
with his watch in his hand, until the moment was come for him
to take the red-hot poker from the Aged, and repair to the
outworks. He took it and went out, and presently the Stinger
went off with a Bang that shook the crazy little box of a
cottage as if it must fall to pieces, and made every glass and
tea-cup in it ring. Upon which the Aged—who I believe would
have been blown out of his arm-chair but for holding on by
the elbows—cried out, exultingly, " He's fired 1 I heerd him 1"
and I nodded at the old gentleman until it is no figure of
speech to declare that I absolutely could not see him.
The interval between that time and supper Wemmick devoted
to showing me his collection of curiosities. They were mostly
of a felonious character; comprising the pen with which a
celebrated forgery had been committed, a distinguished razor
or two, some locks of hair, and several manuscript confessions
written under condemnation—upon which Mr. Wemmick set
a particular value us being, to use his own words, "every
one of 'em lies, Sir." These were agreeably dispersed among
small specimens of china and glass, various neat trifles made
by the proprietor of the museum, and some tobacco-stoppers
carved by the Aged. They were all displayed in that chamber
of the Castle into which I had been first inducted, and which
served not only us the general sitting-room but as the kitchen
too, if I might judge from a sauce-pan on the hob, and a
brazen bijou over the fire-place designed for the suspension
of a roasting-jack.
There was a neat little girl in attendance, who looked after
the Aged in the day. When she had laid the supper cloth the
bridge was lowered to give her means of egress, and she
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 237
withdrew for the night. The supper was excellent ; and though
the Castle was rather subject to dry-rot, insomuch that it tasted
like a bad nut, and though the pig might have been farther
ofif, I was heartily pleased with my whole entertainment. Nor
was there any drawback on my little turret bedroom beyond
there being such a thin ceiling between me and the flag-staff
that when I lay down on my back in bed it seemed as if I
had to balance that pole on my forehead all night.
Wemmick was up betimes in the morning, and I am afraid I
heard him cleaning my boots. After that he fell to garden
ing, and I saw him from my Gothic window pretending to
employ the Aged, and nodding at him in a most devoted
manner. Our breakfast was as good as the supper, and at
half past eight precisely we started for Little Britain. By
degrees Wemmick got dryer and harder as we went along, and
li is mouth tightened into a post-office again. When we got
to his place of business, and he pulled out his key from his
coat-collar, he looked as unconscious of his Walworth property
as if the Castle and' the drawbridge and the arbor and the lake and the fountain and the Aged had all been blown into
space together by the last discharge of the Stinger.
CHAPTER XXVI.
It fell out, as Wemmick had told me it would, that I had an
early opportunity of comparing my guardian's establishment
with that of his cashier and clerk. My guardian was in his
room washing his hands with his scented soap when I went into
the office from Walworth, and he called me to him, and gave
me the invitation for myself and friends which Wemmick had
prepared me to receive. "No ceremony," he stipulated, "and
no dinner dress, and say to-morrow." I asked him where we
should come to (for I had no idea where he lived, and I
believe it was in his general objection to make any thing like
an objection), and he replied, "Come here, and I'll take you
home with me." I embraced this opportunity of remarking that
he washed his clients off as if he were a surgeon or a dentist.
He had a closet in his room, fitted up for the purpose, which
smelled of the scented soap like a perfumer's shop. It had an
unusually large jack-towel on a roller inside the door, and he
would wash his hands, and wipe them and dry them all over
this towel, whenever he came in from a police-court or dis
missed a client from his room. When I and my friends
repaired to him at six o'clock next day, he seemed to have
been engaged on a case of a darker complexion than usual, for
we found him with his head butted into this closet, not only
washing his hands, but laving his face and gurgling his throat.
And even when he had done all that, and had gone all round
the jack-towel, he took out his penknife and scraped the case
out of his .nails before he put his coat on.
There were some people slinking about as usual when we
passed out into the street, who were evidently very anxious to
speak with him ; but there was something conclusive in the
halo of scented soap that encircled his presence, and they gave
it up for that day. As we walked along westward he was re (238)
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 239
cognized ever and again by some face in the crowd of the
streets, and whenever that happened he talked louder; but he
never otherwise recognized any body, or took notice that any
body recognized him.
He conducted us to Gerrard Street, Soho, to a house on the
south side of that street. Rather a stately house of its kind,
but doleful for want of painting, and with dirty windows. He
took out his key and opened the door, and we all went into a
stone hall, bare, gloomy, and little used. So, up a dark brown
staircase into a series of three dark brown rooms on the first
floor. There were carved garlands on the paneled walls, and
as he stood among them giving us welcome, I know what kind
of loops I thought they looked like.
Dinner was laid in the best of these rooms; the second was
his dressing-room ; the third his bedroom. He told us that he
held the whole house, but rarely used more of it than we saw.
The table was comfortably laid —no silver in the service, of
course—and at the side of his chair was a capacious dumb
waiter, with a variety of bottles on it, and four dishes of fruit
for dessert. I noticed then, and throughout, that he kept every
thing under his own hand, distributed every thing himself.
There was a book-case in the room, and I saw, from the
backs of the books, that they were about evidence, criminal
law, criminal biography, trials, acts of parliament, and such
things. The furniture was all very solid and good like his
watch-chain. It had an official look, however, and there was
nothing merely ornamental to be seen. In a corner was a little
table of papers with a shaded lamp, so that he seemed to bring
the office home with him in that respect too, and to wheel it out
of an evening and full to work.
As he had scarcely seen my three companions until now—for
he and I had walked together—he stood on the hearth-rug,
after ringing the bell, and took a searching look at them. To
my surprise, he seemed at once to be principally if hot solely
interested in Drummle.
"Pip," said he, putting his large hand on my shoulder and
moving me to the window, " I don't know one from the other.
Who's the spider "
" The spider " said L
240 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
"The blotchy, spanky, sulky fellow."
" That's Bentley Drummle," I replied ; " the one with the
delicate face is Startop."
Not making the least account of "the one with the delicate
face," he returned. "Bentley Drummle is his name, is it?
Ah 1 I like the look of that fellow."
He immediately began to talk to Drummle ; not at all de
terred by his replying in his heavy reticent way, but apparently
led or by it to screw discourse forcibly out of him. I was look
ing at the two when there came between me and them the house
keeper, with the first dish for the table.
She was a woman of about forty, I supposed—but I may
have thought her older than she was, as it is the manner of
youth to do. Rather tall, of a lithe, nimble figure, extremely
pale, with large blue eyes, and a quantity of streaming light hair.
I can not say whether any diseased affection of the heart
caused her lips to be parted as if she were panting, and her face
to bear a curious expression of suddenness and flutter ; but I
know that I had been to see Macbeth at the theatre a night or
two before, and that her face looked to me as if it were all dis
turbed by fiery air, like the faces I had seen rise out of the
caldron. She set the dish on, touched me quietly on the arm with a
finger to notify that dinner was ready, and vanished. We took
our seats at the round table, and my guardian kept Drummle
on one side of him, while Startop sat on the other. It was a
noble dish of fish that the housekeeper had put on the table, and
we had a joint of equally choice mutton afterward, and then some
equally choice birds. Sauces, wines, all the accessories we
wanted, and all of the best, were given out by our host from
his dumb-waiter, and when they had made the circuit of the
table he always put them back again. Similarly, he dealt us
clean plates, and knives and forks, for each course, and dropped
those just disused into two baskets, on the ground, by his chair.
No other attendant than the housekeeper appeared. She set
on every dish, and I always saw in her face a face rising out of
the caldron. Years afterward I made a dreadful likeness of that
woman by causing a face that had no other natural resemblance
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 841
to it than it derived from flowing light hair, to pass behind a
bowl of flaming spirits in a dark room.
Induced to take particular notice of the housekeeper, both
by her own striking appearance and by Wemmick's preparation,
I observed that whenever she was in the room, she kept her eyes
attentively on my guardian, and that she would quite remove
her hands from any dish she put before him, watching as if she
dreaded his calling her back, and wanted him to speak when
she was nigh, as if he had any thing to say. I fancied that I
could detect in his manner a consciousness of this, and a pur
pose of holding her in suspense.
Dinner went off gayly, and although my guardian seemed
to follow rather than originate subjects, I knew that he somehow
wrenched the weakest part of our dispositions out of us. For
myself, I found that I was expressing my tendency to lavish
expenditure, and to patronize Herbert, and to boast of my
great prospects, before I quite knew that I had opened my eyes.
It was so with all of us, but with no one more than Drummle :
the development of whose inclination to gird in a grudging and
suspicious way at the rest, was screwed out of him before the
fish was taken off.
It was not then, but when we had got to the cheese, that our
conversation turned upon our rowing feats, and that Drummle
was rallied for coming up behind of a night in that slow am
phibious way of his. Drummle upon this informed our host
that he much preferred our room to our company, and that as
to skill he was more than our master, and that as to strength
he could scatter us like chaff. By some invisible agency my
guardian—it could have been no one else—wound him up to a
pitch little short of ferocity about this trifle ; and he fell to
baring and spanning his arm to show how muscular it was, and
we all fell to baring and spanning our arms in a ridiculous
manner.
Now the housekeeper was at that time clearing the table, and
my guardian, taking no heed of her, but with the side of his
face turned from her, was leaning back in his chair biting the
side of his forefinger, and showing an interest in Drummle that,
to me, was quite inexplicable. Suddenly he clapped his large
hand on the housekeeper's as she stretched it across the table,
15
GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
like a trap. So suddenly and smartly, that we all stopped in
our foolish contention.
"If you talk of strength," said Mr. Jaggers, "I'll show you
a wrist. Molly, let them see your wrist."
Her entrapped hand was on the table, but she had already
put her other hand behind her waist. " Master," she said, in
a low voice, with her eyes attentively and timidly fixed upon
him. " Don't !"
" I'll show you a wrist," repeated Mr. Jaggers, with an im
movable determination to show it. "Molly, let them see your
wrist."
" Master," she again murmured. " Please 1"
" Molly," said Mr. Jaggers, not looking at her, but ob
stinately compressing his lips, and looking at the opposite side
of the room, "let them see both your wrists. Show them
Come 1"
He roughly took his hands from hers, and turned that wrist
up on the table. She brought her other hand from behind her,
and held the two out side by side. The last wrist was much
disfigured—deeply scarred, and scarred across and across.
When she held her hands out she took her eyes from Mr. Jag
gers, and turned them watchfully on every one of the rest of us
in succession.
"There's power here," said Mr. Jaggers, tracing out the
sinews with his fore-finger without touching them. "Very few
men have the power of wrist that this woman has. It's re
markable what mere force of grip there is in these hands. I
have had occasion to notice many hands, but I never saw
stronger in that respect, man's or woman's, than these."
While he said these words in a leisurely, critical way, she
continued to look at every one of us in regular succession as
we sat. The moment he ceased she looked at him again.
"That'll do, Molly," said Mr. Jaggers, giving her a slight nod;
"you have been admired, and can go." She withdrew her
hands and went quietly out of the room, and Mr. Jaggers, put
ting the decanters on from his dumb-waiter, filled his glass, and
passed round the wine.
"At half past nine, gentlemen," said he, " we must break up.
GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
Pray make the best use of your time. I am glad to see you
all. Mr. Drummle, I drink to you."
If his object in singling out Drummle were to bring him out
still more, it perfectly succeeded. In a sulky triumph, Drum
mle showed his morose depreciation of the rest of us in a
more and more offensive degree, until he became downright
intolerable. Through all his stages Mr. Jaggers followed him
with the same inexplicable interest. He actually seemed to
serve as a zest to Mr. Jaggers's wine.
In our boyish want of discretion I dare say we took too
much to drink, and I know we talked too much and too noisily.
We became particularly hot upon some boyish sneer of Drummle's,
to the effect that we were too free with our money. It
led to my remarking, with more zeal than politeness, that it
came with a bad grace from him, to whom Startop had lent
money in my presence but a week or so before.
"Well," retorted Drummle, " he'll be paid."
" I don't mean to imply that he won't," said I ; " but it might
make you hold your tongue about us and our money, I should
think." ' "
" You should think 1" retorted Drummle. " O Lord 1"
"I dare say," I went on, meaning to be very severe, "that
you wouldn't lend money to any of us if we wanted it."
"You do me justice," said Drummle. "I wouldn't lend
one of you a sixpence. I wouldn't lend any body a sixpence "
" Rather mean to borrow under those circumstances, I should
say."
" You should say 1" repeated Drummle. " Oh Lord 1"
This was so very aggravating—the more especially as I found
myself makinjr no way against his surly obtuseness—that I said,
disregarding Herbert's efforts to check me :
" Come, Mr. Drummle, since we are on the subject, I'll tell
you what passed between Herbert here and me when you bor
rowed that money."
" I don't want to know what passed between Herbert there
and you," growled Drummle. And I think he added, in a
lower growl, that -ve might go to the devil and shake our
selves.
" I'll tell you, however," said I, " whether you want to know
GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
or not. We said that as you put it in your pocket, you seemed
to be immensely amused at his being such an ass as to lend it."
Drummle laughed outright, and sat laughing in our faces,
with his hands in his pockets and his round shoulders raised,
plainly signifying that it was quite true, and that he despised
us as asses all.
Hereupon Startop took him in hand, though with a much
better grace than I had shown, and exhorted him to be a little
more agreeable. Startop being a lively, bright young fellow, and
Drummle being the exact opposite, the latter was always dis
posed to resent him as a direct personal affront. He now retorted
in a coarse, lumpish way, and Startop tried to turn the discus
sion aside with some small pleasantry that made us all laugh.
Resenting this little success more than any thing, Drummle,
without any threat or warning, pulled his hands out of his
pockets, dropped his round shoulders, swore an oath, took up
a large glass, and would infallibly have flung it at his adver
sary's head, but for our entertainer's dexterously seizing it at
the instant when it was raised for that purpose.
"Gentlemen," said Mr. Jaggers, very deliberately putting
down the glass, and hauling out his gold repeater by its massive
chain, " I am sorry to announce that it's half past nine."
On this hint we all rose to depart. Before we got to the
street-door Startop was cheerily calling Drummle " old fellow,"
as if nothing had happened. I>ut the old fellow was so far from
responding that he would not even walk to Hammersmith
on the same side of the way ; so Herbert and I, who remained
in town, saw them going down the street on opposite sides ;
Startop leading, and Drummle lagging on behind in the shadow
of the houses, much as he was wont to follow in his boat.
As the door was not yet shut I thought I would leave Herbert
there for a moment and run up stairs again to say a word of
apology to my guardian. I found him in his dressing-room, sur
rounded by his boots, already hard at it washing his hands of us.
I told him that I had come up again to say how sorry I was
that any thing disagreeable should have occurred, and that I
hoped he would not blame me very much.
"Pooh!" said he, sluicing his face, and speaking through the water-drops ; " it's nothing, Pip. I like that Spider though. r
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 245
Ho had turned toward me now, and was shaking his head,
and blowing, and toweling himself.
" I am glad you like him, Sir," said I ; "but I don't."
" No, no," my guardian assented ; " don't have too much to
do with him. Keep as clear of him as may be. But I like
the fellow, Pip; he is one of the true sort; I have not been
disappointed in him. Why, if I were a fortune-teller—"
Looking out of the towel he caught my eye.
" But I am not a fortune-teller," he said, letting his head drop
into a festoon of towel, and toweling away at his two ears. " You
know what I am. Good-night, Pip."
" Good-night, Sir."
In about a month after that the Spider's time with Mr.
Pocket was up for good, and, to the great relief of all the house
but Mrs. Pocket, he went home to the family hole. He called
me Blacksmith when he went away, qualified to be an indifferent
hostler or a bad game-keeper.
CHAPTER XXVII.
" My Dear Mr. Pn\—I write this by request of Mr. Gargery
for to let you know that he is going to London in company
with Mr. Wopsle, and would be glad if agreeable to be allowed
to see you. He would call at Barnard's Hotel Tuesday morning
9 o'clock, when if not agreeable please leave word. Your poor
sister is much the same as when you left. We talk of you in
the kitchen every night, and wonder what you are saying and
doing. If now considered in the light of a liberty, excuse it,
for the love of poor old days. No more, dear Mr. Pip, from
your ever obliged and affectionate Servant,
Biddy.
" P. S. —He wishes me most particular to write what larks.
He says you will understand I hope and do not doubt it will
be agreeable to see him even though a gentleman, for you had
ever a good heart and he is a worthy worthy man. I have read
him all, excepting only the last little sentence, and he wishes
me most particular to write again what larks."
I received this letter by the post on Monday morning, and
therefore its appointment was for next day. Let me confess
exactly with what feelings I looked forward to Joe's coming.
Not with pleasure, though I was bound to him by so
many ties ; no ; with considerable disturbance, some mortifica
tion, and a keen sense of incongruity. If I could have kept him
away by paying money, I certainly would have paid money.
My greatest reassurance was that he was coming to Barnard's
Inn, not to Hammersmith, and consequently would not fall in
Bentley Drummle's way. I had little objection to his being
seen by Herbert or his father, for both of whom I had respect ;
but I had the sharpest sensitiveness as to his being seen by
Drummle, whom I held in contempt. So, throughout life, our
worst weaknesses and meannesses are usually committed for the
sake of the people whom we most despise. (2-16)
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 247
I had began to be always decorating the chambers in some
quite unnecessary and inappropriate way or other, and very
expensive those wrestles with Barnard proved to be. By this
time the rooms were vastly different from what I had found
them, and I enjoyed the honor of occupying a few prominent
pages in the books of a neighboring upholsterer. I got on so
fast of late that I had even started a boy in boots—top boots
—in bondage and slavery to whom I might have been said to
pass my days. For after I had made my monster (out of the
refuse of my washerwoman's family), and had clothed him
with a blue coat, canary waistcoat, white cravat, creamy
breeches, and the boots already mentioned, I had to find him
a little to do and a great deal to eat ; and with both of those
horrible requirements he haunted my existence.
This avenging phantom was ordered to be on duty at eight
on Tuesday morning in the hall (it was two feet square, as
charged for floor-cloth), and Herbert suggested certain things
for breakfast that he thought Joe would like. While I felt
sincerely obliged to him for being so interested and considerate,
I had an odd, half-provoked sense of suspicion upon me that if
Joe had been coming to see him he wouldn't have been quite
so brisk.
However, I came into town on the Monday night to be ready
for Joe, and I got up early in the morning, and caused the
sitting-room and breakfast-table to assume their most splendid
appearance. Unfortunately the morning was foggy, and an
angel could not have concealed the fact that Barnard was
shedding sooty tears outside the window, like some weak giant
of a Sweep.
As the time approached I should have liked to run away, but
the Avenger, pursuant to orders, was in the hall, and presently
I heard Joe on the staircase. I knew it was Joe by his clumsy
manner of coming up stairs—his state boots being always too
big for him—and by the time it took him to read the names
on the other floors in the course of his ascent. When at last
he stopped outside our door, I could hear his finger tracing
over the painted letters of my name, and I afterward heard hina
breathing in at the key-hole. Finally he gave a faint single rap,
and Pepper—such was the name of the avenging boy—
248 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
announced "Mr. Gargery!" I thought he never would have
done wiping his feet, and that I must have gone out to lift him
off the mat, but at last he came in.
' Joe, how are you, Joe "
" Pip, how ARE you, Pip ?"
With his good honest face all glowing and shining, and his
hat put down on the floor between us, he caught both my hands
and worked them straight up and down, as if I had been the
last patented Pump.
" I am delighted to see you, Joe. Give me your hat."
But Joe, taking it up with both hands like a birdsnest with
eggs in it, wouldn't hear of parting with that piece of propertyand
persisted in standing talking over it in a most uncomfort
able way.
" Which you have that growed," said Joe, " and that swelled
out, and that gentlefolked ;" Joe considered a little before he
discovered this word ; " as to be sure you are a honor to your
king and country."
"And you, Joe, look wonderfully well."
"Thank God," said Joe, " I'm ekerval to most. And your
sister, she's no worse than she were. And Biddy, she's ever
right and ready. And all friends is no backerder, if not no
forarder. 'Ceptin' Wopsle; he's had a drop."
All this time (still with both hands taking great care of the
birdsnest) Joe was rolling his eyes round and round the room,
and round and round the flowered pattern of my dressing-gown.
" Had a drop, Joe ?"
" Why, yes," said Joe, lowering his voice, " he's left the
Church, and went into the play-acting. Which the play acting
have likeways brought him to London along with me. And
his wish were," said Joe, getting the birdsnest under his left
arm for the moment and groping in it for an egg with his right;
"if no offense, as I would 'and you that."
I took what Joe gave me, and found it to be the crumpled
play-bill of a small metropolitan theatre, announcing the first
appearance on the ensuing Monday of "the celebrated Pro
vincial Amateur of lloscian renown, whose unique performance
in the highest tragic walk of our National Bard has lately
occasioned so great a sensation in local dramatic circles."
GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
" Were you at his performance, Joe ?" I inquired.
" I were," said Joe, with solemnity.
" Was there a great sensation ?"
"Why," said Joe, "yes, there certainly were a peck of
orange-peel. Partickler, where he see the ghost. Though
I put it to yourself, Sir, whether it were calc'lated to keep
a man up to his work with a good hart, to be continiwally
cutting in betwixt him and the Ghost with ' Amen 1' A man
may have had a misfortun' and been in the Church," said Joe,
lowering his voice to an argumentative and feeling tone, "but
that is no reason why you should put him out at such a time.
Which I meantersay, if the ghost of a man's own father can
not be allowed to ockipy his attention, what can, Sir ? Still
more, when his mourning 'at is unfortunately made so small
as that the weight of the black feathers brings it off, try to
keep it on how you may."
A ghost-seeing effect in Joe's own countenance informed me
that Herbert had entered the room. So I presented Joe to
Herbert, who held out his hand ; but Joe backed from it, and
held on by the birdsnest.
"Your servant, Sir,"said Joe, "which I hope as you and Pip"
—here his eye fell on the Avenger, who was putting some
eggs on the table, and so plainly denoted an intention to make
that young gentleman one of the family, that I frowned it
down and confused him—" I meantersay, you two gentlemen
.—which I hope as you get your elths in this close spot ?
For the present may be a werry good inn, according to London
opinions," said Joe, persuasively, "and I believe its character
do stand i ; but I wouldn't keep a pig in it myself—not in the
case that I wished him to fatten wholesome and to eat short
with a meller flavor on him."
Having borne this flattering testimony to the merits of our
dwelling-place, and having incidentally shown this tendency to
call me " Sir," Joe, being invited to sit down to table, looked
all round the room for a suitable spot on which to deposit his
hat—as if it were only on some very few rare substances in
nature that it could find a resting-place—and ultimately stood
it on an extreme corner of the chimney-piece, from which it ever
afterward fell off at intervals.
GEEAT EXPECTATIONS.
"Do you take tea, or coffee, Mr. Gargery ?" asked Herbert,
who always presided of a morning.
" Thankee, Sir," said Joe, stiff from head to foot, " I'll
take whichever is most agreeable to yourself."
" What do you say to coffee ?"
"Thankee, Sir," returned Joe, evidently dispirited by the
proposal, "since you are so kind as put that name to it, I will
not run contrairy to your own opinions. But don't you never
find it a little 'eating ?"
"Say tea, then," said Herbert, pouring it out.
Here Joe's hat tumbled off the mantle-piece, and he started
and picked it up, and fitted it to the same exact spot. As if it
were an absolute point of good-breeding that it should tumble
off again soon.
" When did you come to town, Mr. Gargery?"
" Were it yesterday afternoon ?" said Joe, after coughing, as
if he had caught the whooping-cough since he came. "No it
were not. Yes it were. Yes. It were yesterday afternoon"
(with an appearance of mingled wisdom, relief and strict
impartiality).
'' Have you seen any thing of London yet ?"
" Why, yes, Sir," said Joe, " me and Wopsle went off to look
at the Blacking Ware'us. But we didn't find that it come up
to its likeness in the red picters at the shop-doors ; which I meantersay,"
added Joe, in an explanatory manner, " as it's drawd
too architectooralooral."
I really believe Joe would have prolonged this word (might
ily expressive to my mind of some architecture that I know)
into a perfect Chorus, but for his attention being providentially
attracted by his hat, which was toppling. Indeed it demanded
from him a constant attention and a quickness of eye and hand
very like that exacted by wicket-keeping. He made the most
extraordinary play with it, and showed the greatest skill ; now,
rushing at it and catching it neatly as it dropped ; now, merely
stopping it midway, beating it up, and humoring it in various
parts of the room and against a good deal of the pattern of the
paper on the wall, before he felt it safe to close with it ; finally
splashing it into the slop-basin, where I took the liberty of
laying hands upon it.
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 251
As to his shirt-collar and his coat-collar, they were per
plexing to reflect upon—insoluble mysteries. Why should a
man scrape himself to that extent before he could consider him
self full dressed ? Why should he suppose it necessary to be
purified by suffering for his holiday clothes ? Then be fell into
such unaccountable fits of meditation, with his fork midway be
tween his plate and his mouth; had his eyes attracted in such
strange directions; was afflicted with such remarkable coughs;
sat so far from the table, and dropped so much more than he
ate, and pretended that he hadn't dropped it; that I was
heartily glad when Herbert left us for the City.
I had neither the good sense nor the good feeling to know
that this was all my fault, and that if I had been easier with
Joe, Joe would have been easier with me. I felt impatient
of him and out of temper with him ; in which condition he
heaped coals of fire on my head.
"Us two being now alone, Sir"—began Joe.
"Joe," I interrupted, pettishly, "how can you call me Sir?"
Joe looked at me for a single instant with something faintly
like reproach. Utterly preposterous as his cravat was, and as
his collars were, I was conscious of a sort of dignity in the look too.
" Us two being now alone," resumed Joe, " and me having
the intentions and abilities to stay not many minutes more, I
will now conclude—leastways begin—to mention what have
led to my having had the present honor. For was it not," said
Joe, with his old air of lucid exposition, " that my only wish
were to be useful to you, I should not have had the honor of
breaking wittles in the company and abode of gentlemen."
I was so unwilling to see the look again that I made no
remonstrance against this tone.
" Well, Sir," pursued Joe, this is how it were. I were at the
Bargemen t'other night, Pip ;" whenever he subsided into
affection, he called me Pip, and whenever he relapsed into
politeness he called me Sir ; "when there come up in his shaycart
Pumblechook. Which that same identical," said Joe,
going down a new track, " do comb my 'air the wrong way somotimes,
by giving out up and down town as it were hi<n which
ever had your infant companionation and were looked upon as
ft playfeller by yourself."
252 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
"Nonsense. It was you, Joe."
"Which I fully believed it were, Pip," said Joe, slightly
tossing his head, "though it signify little now, Sir. Well, Pip;
this same identical, which his manners is given to blusterous,
come to me at the Bargemen (wot a pipe and a pint of beer do
give refreshment to the working man, Sir, and do not overstimilate),
and his word were, 'Joseph, Miss Havisham she wish to
speak to you.' "
" Miss Havisham, Joe ?"
"'She wish,' were Pumblechook's word, 'to speak to you.' "
Joe sat and rolled his eyes at the ceiling.
"Yes, Joe? Go on, please."
" Next day, Sir," said Joe, looking at me as if I were a long
way off, " having cleaned myself, I go and I see Miss A."
"Miss A., Joe ? Miss Havisham ?"
"Which I say, Sir," replied Joe, "Miss A., or Havisham.
Her expression air then as follering: 'Mr. Gargery. You
air in correspondence with Mr. Pip ' Having had a letter from
you, I were able to say 'I am.' (When I married your sister,
Sir, I said ' I will ;' and when I answered your friend, Pip, I
said 'I am.') 'Would you tell him, then,' said she, 'that
which Estella has come home and would be glad to see him ?' "
I felt my face fire up as I looked at Joe. I hope one remote
cause of its firing may have been my consciousness that if I had
known his errand I should have given him more encouragement.
" Biddy," pursued Joe, " when I got home and asked her for
to write the message to you, a little hung back. Biddy says,
' I know he will be very glad to have it by word of mouth, it
is holiday-time, you want to see him, go 1' I have now con
cluded, Sir," said Joe, rising from his chair, "and, Pip, I wish
you ever well and ever prospering to a greater and greater
heighth."
" But you are not going now, Joe ?"
" Yes I am," said Joe.
" But you are coming back to dinner, Joe ?"
" No, I am not," said Joe.
" Our eyes met, and all the " Sir" melted out of that honest
open heart as he gave me his hand.
" Pip, dear old chap, life is made of ever so many partings
QREAT EXPECTATIONS.
welded together, as I may say, and one man's a blacksmith,
and one's a whitesmith, and one's a goldsmith, and one's a cop
persmith. Diwisions among such must come, and must be met
as they come. If there's been any fault at all to-day, it's mine.
You and me is not two figures to be together in London ; nor
yet any wheres else hut what is private, and beknown, and un
derstood among friends. It ain't that I am proud, but that I
want to be right, as you shall never see me no more in these
clothes I'm wrong in these clothes. I'm wrong out of the
forge, the kitchen, or off th' meshes. You won't find half so
much fault in me if you think of me in my forge-dress, with
my hammer in my hand, or even my pipe. You won't find half
so much fault in me if, supposing as you should ever wish to see
me, you come and put your head in at the forge-window and
see Joe the blacksmith there at the old anvil, in the old burned
apron, at the old work, as he used to be when he first carried you
about. I'm awful dull, but I hope I've beat out something nigh
the rights of this at last. And so God bless you, dear old Pip ;
old chap, God bless you 1"
I had not been mistaken in my fancy that there was a simple
dignity in him. The fashion of his dress could no more come in
its way when he spoke these words than it could come in its
way in heaven. He touched me gently on the forehead and went
out. As soon as I could recover myself sufficiently I ran out
after him and looked for him in the neighboring streets ; but he
was gone.
CHAPTER XXVIII.
It was clear that I must repair to our town next day, and
in the first flow of my repentance it was equally clear that I
must stay at Joe's. But when I had secured my box-place by
to-morrow's coach and had been down to Mr. Pocket's and
back, I was not by any means convinced on the last point, and
began to invent reasons and make excuses for putting up at
the Blue Boar. I should be an inconvenience at Joe's; I was
not expected, and my bed would not be ready ; I should be too
far from Miss Havisham's, and she was exacting and mightn't
like it. All other swindlers upon earth are nothing to the selfswindlers,
and with such pretenses did I cheat myself. Surely
a curious thing. That I should innocently take a bad halfcrown
of somebody else's manufacture is reasonable enough ;
but that I should knowingly reckon the spurious coin of my
own make as good money 1 An obliging stranger, under pre
tense of compactly folding up my bank-notes for security's sake,
abstracts the notes and gives me nut-shells ; but what is his
sleight of hand to mine, when I fold up my own nut-shells and
pass them on myself as notes !
Having settled that I must go to the Blue Boar, my mind
was much disturbed by indecision whether or no to take the
Avenger. It was tempting to think of that expensive Mer
cenary airing his boots in the arch-way of the Blue Boar's
posting-yard ; it was almost solemn to imagine him casually
produced in the tailor's shop and confounding the disrespectful
senses of Trabb's boy. On the other hand, Trabb's boy might
worm himself into his intimacy and tell him things ; or, reckless
and desperate wretch as I knew he could be, might hoot him
in the High Street. My patroness, too, might hear of him, and
not approve. On the whole, I resolved to leave the Avenger
behind.(254)
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 255
It was the afternoon coach by which I, had taken my place,
and, as winter had now come round, I should not arrive at my
destination until two or three hours after dark. Our time of
starting from the Cross Keys was two o'clock. I arrived on
the ground with a quarter of an hour to spare, attended by the
Avenger—if I may connect that expression with one who never
attended on me if he could possibly help it.
At that time it was customary to carry Convicts down to the
dock-yard by stage-coach. As I had often heard of them in
the capacity of outside-passengers, and had more than once seen
them on the high-road dangling their ironed legs over the coach
roof, I h d no cause to be surprised when Herbert, meeting me
in the yard, came up and told me there were two convicts go
ing down with me. Ilut I had a reason that was an old reason
now, for constitutionally faltering whenever I heard the word
convict.
" You don't mind them, Handel ?" said Herbert.
" Oh no !"
" I thought you seemed as if you didn't like them ?"
'-I can't pretend that I do like them, and I suppose you don't
particularly. But I don't mind them."
" See 1 'I here they are," said Herbert, " coming out of the
Tap. What a degraded and vile sight it is!"
They had been treating their guard, I suppose, for they had
a jailer with them, and all three came out wiping their mouths
on their hands. The two convicts were handcuffed together,
and had irons on their legs—irons of a pattern that I knew very
well. They wore the dress that I likewise knew very well.
Their keeper had a brace of pistols, and carried a thickknobbed
bludgeon under his arm; but he was on terms of good
understanding with them, and stood, with them beside him,
looking on at the putting-to of the horses, rather with an air
as if they were an interesting Exhibition not formally open at
the moment, and he the Curator One was a taller and stouter
man than the other, and appeared, as a matter of course, ac
cording to the mysterious ways of the world both convict and
free, to have had allotted to him the smallest suit of clothes. His arms and legs were like great pin-cushions of those shapes,
and his attire disguised him absurdly ; but I knew his half
256 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
closed eye at one glance. There stood the man whom I had
seen on the settle at the Three Jolly Bargemen on n Saturday
night, and who had brought me down with his invisible gun 1
It was easy to make sure that as yet he knew me no more
than if he had never seen me in his life. He looked across at
me, and his eye appraised my watch-chain, and then he inci
dentally spat and said something to the other convict, and they
laughed, and slued themselves round with a clink of their coup
ling manacle, and looked at something else. The great num
bers on their backs, as if they were street doors ; their coarse,
mangy, ungainly outer surface, as if they were lower animals ;
their ironed legs, apologetically garlanded with pocket-handkerchiefs
; and the way in which all present looked at them and
kept from them, made them (as Herbert had said) a most dis
agreeable and degraded spectacle.
But this was not the worst of it. It came out that the whole
of the back of the coach had been taken by a family removing
from London, and that there were no places for the two prison
ers but on the seat in front behind the coachman. Hereupon a
choleric gentleman, who had taken the fourth place on that
scat, flew into a most violent passion, and said that it was a
breach of contract, to mix him up with such villainous company,
and tiiat it was poucuous, and pernicious, and infamous, and
shameful, and I don't I? now what else. At this time the coach
was ready and the coachman impatient, and we were all pre
paring to get up, and the prisoners had come over with their
keeper—bringing with them that curious flavor of bread-poul
tice, baize, rope-yarn, and hearth-stone which attends the con
vict presence.
" Don't take it so much amiss, Sir," said the keeper to the
angry passenger; " I'll sit next to you myself. I'll put 'em on -
the outside of the row. They won't interfere with you, Sir.
Sfou needn't know they're there."
"And don't blame me," growled the convict I had recog
nized. " I don't want to go. I am quite ready to stay be
hind. As far as I am concerned any one's welcome to my
place."
"Or mine," said the other, gruffly. "I wouldn't have in
commoded none of you, if I'd a had my way." Then they both
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 257
laughed, and began cracking nuts, and spitting the shells about.
—As I really think I should have liked to do myself, if I had
been in their place and so despised.
At length it was voted that there was no help for the angry
gentleman, and that he must either go in his chance company or
remain behind. So he got into his place, still making com
plaints, and the keeper got into the place next to him, and the
convicts hauled themselves up as well as they could, and the
convict I had recognized sat behind me with his breath on the
hair of my head.
" Good-by, Handel 1" Herbert called out, as we started. I
thought what a blessed fortune it was that he had found another
name for me than Pip.
It is impossible to express with what acuteness I felt the con
vict's breathing, not only on the back of my head, but all along
my spine. The sensation was like being touched with some
pungent and searching acid, and it set my very teeth on edge.
He seemed to have more breathing to do than another man, and
to make more noise in doing it ; and I was conscious of growing
high-shouldered on one side in my shrinking endeavors to fend
hini off.
The weather was miserably raw, and the two cursed the cold.
It made us all lethargic before we had gone far, and when we
had left the Half-way House behind, we habitually dozed and
shivered and were silent. I dozed off myself in considering
the question whether I ought to restore a couple of pounds to
this creature before losing sight of him, and how it could best
be done. In the act of dipping forward, as if I were going
to bathe among the horses, I woke in a fright and took the
question up again.
But I must have lost it longer than I had thought for, since,
although I could recognize nothing in the darkness and the
fitful lights and shadows of our lamps, I traced marsh country
in the cold damp wind that blew at us. Cowering forward for
warmth, and to make me a screen against the wind, the convicts
were closer to me than before. The very first words I heard »
them interchange as I became conscious were the words of my
own thoughts, " Two One-Pound notes."
16
GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
" How did he get 'em ?" said the convict I had never
seen." How should I know ?" returned the other. " He had 'em
stowed away somehows. (jiv him by friends, I expect."
" I wish," said the other, with a bitter curse upon the cold,
"that I had 'em here."
"Two one-pound notes or friends ?"
"Two one-pound notes. I'd sell all the friends I ever had
for one. Well ? So he says— ?"
" So he says," resumed the convict I had recognized—" it
was all said and done i half a minute behind the pile of timber
in the yard—'you're going to be discharged?' Yes, I was.
Would I find out that boy that had fed him and kep' his secret,
and give him them two one-pound notes ? Yes, I would. And
I did."
"More fool you," growled the other. "I'd have spent 'em
on a Man in wittles and drink. He must have been a green
one. Mean to say he knowed nothing of you ?"
"Not a ha'porth. Different gangs and different ships. He
was tried again for prison breaking, and got made a Lifer.
That's what he took by his motion, and that's all I know of
him."
" And was that—Honor 1 —the only time you worked out in
this part of the country ?"
" The only time."
"What might have been your opinion of the place?''
"A most infernal place. Mudbank, mist, swamp, and
work; work, swamp, mist, and mudbank."
They both execrated the place in very strong language, and
gradually growled themselves out and had nothing left to say.
After overhearing this dialogue, I should assuredly have
got down and been left in the solitude and darkness of the
highway, but for feeling certain that the man had no suspicion
of my identity. Indeed, I was not only so changed in the
course of nature, but so differently dressed and so differently
circumstanced, that it was not at all likely he could have known
me without accidental help. Still, the coincidence of our being
together on the coach was sufficiently strange to fill me with a
dread that some other coincidence might at any moment con
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 259
nect me, in his hearing, with my name. For this reason I
resolved to alight as soon as we touched the town, and put
myself beyond his hearing. This device I executed success
fully. My little portmanteau was in the boot under my feet;
I had but to turn a hinge to get it out; I threw it down before
me, got down after it, and was left at the first lamp on the
first stones of the town pavement. As to the convicts, they went
their way with the coach, and I knew at what point they would
be spirited off to the river. In my fancy I saw the boat with
its convict crew waiting for them at the slime-washed stairs—
again heard the gruff " Give way, you 1" like an order to dogs
—again saw the wicked Noah's Ark lying out in the black
water.
I could not have said what I was afraid of, for my fear was
altogether undefined and vague, but there was fear upon me.
As I walked on to the hotel, I felt that a dread, exceeding the
mere apprehension of a painful or disagreeable recognition,
made me tremble. I am confident that it took no distinctness
of shape, and that it was the revival for a few minutes of the
terror of childhood.
The coffee-room at the Blue Boar was empty, and I had
not only ordered my dinner there, but had sat down to it,
before the waiter knew me. As soon as ever he had apologized
for the remissness of his memory, he asked me if he should
send Boots for Mr. Pumblechook 1
"No," said I, "certainly not."
The waiter (it was he who had brought up the Great
Remonstrance from the Commercials on the day when I was
bound) appeared surprised, and took the earliest opportunity
of putting a dirty old copy of a local newspaper so directly in
my way, that I took it up and read this paragraph :
" Our readers will learn, not altogether without interest,
in reference to the recent romantic rise in fortune of a young
artificer in iron of this neighborhood (what a theme, by-the-way,
for the magic pen of our as yet not universally acknowledged
townsman Tooby, the poet of our columns !), that the youth's
earliest patron, companion, and friend, was a highly-respected
individual not entirely unconnected with the corn and seed
trade, and whose eminently convenient and commodious business
200 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
premises are situate within a hundred miles of the High Street.
It is not wholly irrespective of our personal feelings that we
record Him as the Mentor of our young Telemachus, for it is
good to know that our town produced the founder of the
latter's fortunes. Does the though contracted brow of the
local Sage or the lustrous eye of local Beauty inquire whose
fortunes ? We believe that Quentin Matsys was the Black
smith of Antwerp. Verb. Sap."
I entertain a conviction, based upon large experience, that
if in the days of my prosperity I had gone to the North Pole,
I should have met somebody there, either wandering Esquimaux
or civilized man, who would have told me that Pumblechook
was my earliest patron and the founder of my fortunes.
CHAPTER XXIX.
Betimes in the morning I was up and out. It was too
early yet to go to Miss Havisham's, so I loitered into the
country on Miss Havisham's side of town—which was not
Joe's side; I could go there to-morrow—thinking about my
patroness, and painting brilliant pictures of her plans for me.
She had adopted Estella, she had as good as adopted me
and it could not fail to be her intention to bring us together.
She reserved it for me to restore the desolate house, admit the
sunshine into the dark rooms, set the clocks a going and the
cold hearths a blazing, tear down the cobwebs, destroy the
vermin—in short, do all the shining deeds of the young Knight
of romance, and marry the Princess. I had stopped to look at
the house as I passed; and its seared red brick walls, blocked
windows, and strong green ivy clasping even the stacks of
chimneys with its twigs and tendons, as if with sinewy old
arms, had made up a rich attractive mystery, of which I was the
hero. Estella was the inspiration of it, and the heart of it, of
course. But though she had taken such strong possession of
me, though my fancy and my hope were so set upon her,
though her influence on my boyish life and character had been
all-powerful, I did not, even that romantic morning, invest
her with any attributes save those she possessed. I mention
this in this place, of a fixed purpose, because it is the clew by
which I am to be followed into my poor labyrinth, such as it
is. According to my experience, the conventional notion of a
lover can not be always true. The unqualified truth is, that
when I loved Estella with the love of a man, I loved her because
I found her irresistible. Once for all ; I knew to my sorrow,
often and often, if not always, that I loved her against reason,
against promise, against peace, against hope, against happiness,
against all discouragement that could be. Once for all j I
(261)
2U2 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
loved her none the less because I knew it, and it had no more influence in restraining me than if I had devoutly and conven
tionally believed her to be human perfection.
I so shaped out my walk as to arrive at the gate at my old
time. When I had rung at the bell with an unsteady hand I
turned my back upon the gate, while I tried to get my breath
and keep the beating of my heart moderately quiet. I heard
the side-door open and steps come across the court-yard ; but
I pretended not to hear, even when the gate swung on its rusty
hinges.
Being at last touched on the shoulder, I started and turned.
I started much more naturally then to find myself confronted
by a man in a sober gray dress. The last man I should have
expected to see in that place of porter at Miss Havisham's
door.
" Orlick !"
" Ah, young master, there's more changes than yours. But
come in, come in. It's opposed to my orders to hold the gate
open." I entered and he swung it, and locked it, and took the key
out. " Yes 1" said he, facing round, after doggedly preceding
me a few steps toward the house. " Here I am 1"
" How did you come here ?"
" I come here," he retorted, " on my legs. I had my box
brought alongside me m a barrow."
"Are you here for good ?"
" I ain't here for harm, young master, I suppose ?"
I was not so sure of that. I had leisure to entertain the
retort in my mind, while he slowly lifted his heavy glance
from the pavement, up my legs and arms, to my face.
" Then you have left the forge ?" I said.
"Do this look like a forge?" replied Orlick, sending his
glance all around him with an air of injury. "Now, do it look
like it ?" I asked him how long he had left Gargery's forge ?
" One day is so like another here," he replied, "that I don't
know without casting it up. However, I come here some time
since you left."
" I could have told you that, Orlick."
GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
" Ah 1" said he, dryly. " But then you've got to be a
scholar." By this time we had come to the house, where I found his
room to be one just within the side-door, with a little window
in it looking on the court-yard. In its small proportions it was
not unlike the kind of place usually assigned to a gate-porter
in Paris. Curtain keys were hanging on the wall, to which he
now added the gate key, and his patchwork-covered bed was
in a little inner division or recess. The whole had a slovenly,
confined, and sleepy look, like a cage for a human dormouse :
while he, looming dark and heavy in the shadow of a corner by
the window, looked like the human dormouse for whom it was
fitted up—as indeed he was.
" I never saw this room before," I remarked ; " but there
used to be no porter here."
"No," said he; " not till it got about that there was no pro
tection on the premises, and it come to be considered dangerous,
with convicts and Tug and Rag and Bobtail going up and
down. And then I was recommended to the place as a man
who could give another man as good as he brought, and I took
it. It's easier than bellowsing and hammering. —That's loaded,
that is."
My eye had been caught by a gun with a brass-bound stock
over the chimney-piece, and his eye had followed mine.
" Well," said I, not desirous of more conversation, " shall I
go up to Miss Havisham ?" "Burn me if I know!" he retorted, first stretching himself
and then shaking himself ; " my orders ends here, young master.
I give this here bell a rap with this here hammer, and you go
on along tfce passage till you meet somebody."
" I am expected, I believe ?"
" Burn me twice over if I can say !" said he.
Upon that I turned down tfie long passage which I had
first trodden in my thick boots, and he made his bell sound.
At the end of the passsge, while the bell was still reverberating,
I found Sarah Pocket, who appeared to have now become con
stitutionally green and yellow by reason of me.
" Oh 1" said she. " You, is it, Mr. Pip ?"
264 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
" It is, Miss Pocket. I am glad to tell you that Mr. Pocket
and family are all well."
" Are they any wiser ?" said Sarah, with a dismal shake of the
head ; " they had better be wiser than well. Ah, Matthew, Mat
thew 1 You know your way, Sir ?"
" Tolerably, for I had gone up the staircase in the dark many
a time. I ascended it now, in lighter boots than of yore, and
tapped in my old way at the door of Havisham's room. " Pip's
rap, I heard her say, immediately; "come in, Pip."
She was in her chair near the old table, in the old dress,
with her two hands crossed on her stick, her chin resting on
them, and her eyes on the fire. Sitting near her, with the
white shoe that had never been worn in her hand, and her
head bent as she looked at it, was an elegant lady whom I had
never seen.
"Come in, Pip," Miss Havisham continued to mutter, with
out looking round or up; " come in, Pip ; how do you do, Pip?
So you kiss my hand as if I were a queen, eh ?—Well ?"
She looked up at me suddenly, only moving her eyes, and
repeated, in a grimly playful manner,
"Well?"
"I heard, Miss Havisham," said I, rather at a loss, "that
you were so kind as to wish me to come and see you, and I came
directly."
" Well ?"
The lady whom I had never seen before lifted up her eyes and
looked archly at me, and then I saw that the eyes were Estella's
eyes. But she was so much changed, was so much more beau
tiful, so much more womanly, in all things winning admiration
had made such wonderful advance that I seemed to have made
none. I fancied, as I looked at her, that I slipped hopelessly
back into the coarse and common boy again. Oh the sense
of distance and disparity that came upon me, and the inacces
sibility that came about her 1
She gave me her hand. I stammered something about the
pleasure I felt in seeing her again, and my having looked for
ward to it for a long, long time.
" Do you find her much changed, Pip ?" asked Miss Havi
sham with her greedy look, and striking her stick upon a
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 265
ehair that stood between them, as a sign to me to sit down
there.
" When I came in, Miss Havisham, I thought there was no
thing of Estella in the face or figure ; but now it all settles
down so curiously into the old—"
"What? You are not going to say, into the old Estella?"
Miss Havisham interrupted. " She was proud and insulting,
and you wanted to go away from her. Don't you remember ?"
I said, confusedly, that that was long ago, and that I knew
no better then, and the like. Estella smiled with perfect com
posure, and said she had no doubt of my having been quite
right, and of her having been very disagreeable.
" Is he changed ?" Miss Havisham asked her.
"Very much," said Estella, looking at me.
" Less coarse and common ?" said Miss Havisham, playing
with Estella's hair.
Estella laughed, and looked at the shoe in her hand, and
laughed again, and looked at me, and put the shoe down. She
treated me as a boy still, but she lured me on.
We sat in the dreamy room among the old strange influences
which had so wrought upon me, and I learned that she had
but just come home from France, and that she was going to
London. Proud and willful as of old, she had brought those
qualities into such subjection to her beauty that it was impossi
ble and out of nature—or I thought so—to separate them
from her beauty. Truly it was impossible to dissociate her
presence from all those wretched hankerings after money and
gentlity that had disturbed my boyhood—from - all those illregulated
aspirations that had first made me ashamed of home
and Joe—from all those visions that had raised her face in the
glowing fire, struck it out of the iron on the anvil, extracted i
from the darkness of night to look in at the wooden window of
the forge and flit away. In a word, it was impossible for me to
separate her, in the past or in the present, from the innermost
life of my life.
It was settled that I should stay there all the rest of the day,
and return to the hotel at night, and to London to-morrow.
When we had conversed for a while, Miss Havisham sent us
two out to walk in the neglected garden ; on our coming in by
GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
and-by, she said I should wheel her about a little as in times
of yore.
So Estella and I went out into the garden by the gate
through which I had strayed to my encounter with the pale
young gentleman, now Herbert; I, trembling in spirit and wor shiping the very hem of her dress ; she, quite composed and
most decidedly not worshiping the hem of mine. As we drew
near the place of encounter she stopped and said :
" I must have been a singular little creature to hide and see
that fight that day ; but I did, and I enjoyed it very much."
" You rewarded me very much."
" Did I ?" she replied, in an incidental and forgetful way.
" I remember I entertained a great objection to your adversary,
because I took it ill that he should be brought here to pester me
with his company."
" We are great friends now," said I.
"Are you ? I think I recollect though, that you read with
his father "
"Yes."
I made the admission with reluctance, for it seemed to have a
boyish look, and she already treated me more than enough like a
boy.
" Since your change of fortune and prospects you have
changed your companions," said Estella.
" Naturally," said I.
" And necessarily," she added, in a haughty tone ; " what
was fit company for you once would be quite unfit company for
you now."
In my conscience I doubt very much whether I had any
lingering intention left of going to see Joe ; but if I had, this
observation put it to flight.
" You had no idea of your impending good fortune in those
times ?" said Estella, with a slight wave of her hand, signifying
ii. the fighting times.
" Not the least."
The air of completeness and superiority with which she
walked at my side, and the air of youthfulness and deference
with which I walked at hers, made a contrast that I strongly felt.
It would have rankled in me more than it did, if I bad not re
QREAT EXPECTATIONS. 267
garded myself as eliciting it by being so set apart for her and
assigned to her.
The garden was too overgrown and rank for walking in with
ease, and after we had made the round of it twice or thrice we
came out again into the brewery-yard. I showed her to a
nicety where I had seen her walking on the casks, that first old
day, and she said, with a cold and careless look in that direc
tion, "Did I?" I reminded her where she had come out of
the house, and given me my meat and drink, and she said, "I
don't remember." "Not remember that you made me cry ?"
said I. "No," said she, and shook her head and looked about
her. I verily believe that her not remembering, and not mind
ing it in the least, made me cry again inwardly—and that is
the sharpest crying of all.
" You must know," said Estella, condescending to me as a
brilliant and beautiful woman might, " that I have no heart—
if that has any thing to do with my memory."
I got through some jargon to the effect that I took the lib
erty of doubting that. That I knew better. That there could
be no such beauty without it.
" Oh 1 I have a heart to be stabbed in or shot in, I have
no doubt," said Estella, "and, of course, if it ceased to beat I
should cease to be. But you know what I mean. I have no
softness there, no—sympathy—sentiment—nonsense."
What was it that was borne in upon my mind when she stood
still and looked attentively at me? Any thing that I had seen
in Miss Havisham ? No. In some of her looks and gestures
there was that tinge of resemblance to Miss Havisham which
may often be noticed to have been acquired by children from
grown persons with whom they have been much associated and
secluded, and which, when childhood is past, will produce a re
markable occasional likeness of expression between faces that
are otherwise quite different. And yet I could not trace this
to Miss Havisham. I looked again, and though she was still
looking at me, the suggestion was gone.
What was it ?
"I am serious," said Estella, not so much with a frown (for
her b'ow was smooth) as with a darkening of her face; "if we
are to be thrown much together, you had better believe it at
288 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
once. No 1" imperiously stopping me as I opened my lips. "I
have not bestowed my tenderness any where. I have never had
any such thing."
In another moment we were in the brewery so long disused,
and she pointed to the high gallery where I had seen her going
out on that same first day, and told me she remembered to
have been up there, and to have seen me standing scared below.
As my eyes followed her white hand, again the same dim sugges
tion that I could not possibly grasp crossed me. My involuntary
start occasioned her to lay her hand upon my arm. Instantly
the ghost passed once more, for the last time, and was gone.
What was il f
" What is the matter ?" said Estella ; " are you scared again ?"
. " I should be, if I believed what you said just now," I replied,
to turn it off.
" Then you don't ? Very well. It is said, at any rate. Miss
Havisham will soon be expecting you at your old post, though
I think that might be laid aside now, with other old belong
ings. Let us make one more round of the garden, and then
go in. Come ! You shall not shed tears for my cruelty to
day ; you shall be my Page, and give me your shoulder."
Her handsome dress had trailed upon the ground. She held
it in one hand now, and with the other lightly touched my shoul
der as we walked. We walked round the ruined garden twice
or thrice more, and it was all in bloom for me. If the green and
yellow growth of weed in the chinks of the old wall had been
the most precious flowers that ever blew, it could not have been
more cherished in my remembrance.
There was no discrepancy of years between us to remove
her far from me ; we were of nearly the same age, though of
course the age told for more in her case than in mine ; but the
air of inaccessibility which her beauty and her manner gave
her, tormented me in the midst of my delight, and at the height
of the assurance I felt that our patroness had chosen us for one
another. Wretched boy 1
At last we went back into the house, and there I heard, with
surprise, that my guardian had come down to see Miss Havisham
on business and would come back to dinner. The old wintry
branches of chandel iers in the room where the mouldering t&blo
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 26',)
was spread, had been lighted while we were out, and Miss
Havisham was in her chair waiting for me.
It was like pushing the chair itself back into the past, when
we began the old slow circuit round about the ashes of the
bridal feast. But in the funereal room, with that figure of the
grave fallen back in the chair fixing its eyes upon her, Estella
looked more bright and beautiful than before. I was under
stronger enchantment.
The time so melted away that our early dinner-hour drew
close at hand, and Estella left us to prepare herself. We had
stopped near the centre of the long table, and Miss Havisham,
with one of her withered arms stretched out of the chair, rested
that clenched hand upon the yellow cloth. As Estella looked
back over her shoulder before going out at the door, Miss
Havisham kissed that hand to her, with a ravenous intensity that
was, of its kind, quite dreadful.
Then Estella being gone and we two left alone, she turned to
me, and said, in a whisper,
"Is she beautiful, graceful, well-grown ? Do you admire her?"
"Every body must who sees her, Miss Havisham."
She drew an arm round my neck, and drew my head close
down to hers as she sat in the chair. " Love her, love her, love
her ! How does she use you "
Before I could answer (if I could have answered such a diffi
cult question at all) she repeated, " Love her, love her, love
her ! If she favors you, love her. If she wounds you, love her.
If she tears your heart to pieces —and as it gets older and
stronger it will tear deeper—love her, love her, love her!"
Never had I seen such passionate eagerness as was joined to
her utterance of these words. I could feel the muscles of tlie
thin arm round my neck swell with the vehemence that pos
sessed her.
"Hear me, Pip! I adopted her, to be loved. I bred her
and educated her, to be loved. I developed her into what she
is, that she might be loved. Love her !"
She said the word often enough, and there could be no doubt
that she meant to say it; but if the often repeated word had
been hate instead of love—despair—revenge—dire death—it
could not have sounded from her lips more like a curse.
270 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
" I'll tell you," slid she, in the same hurried passionate whis
per, " what real love is. It is blind devotion, unquestioning
self-humiliation, utter submission, trust and belief against your
self and against the world, giving up your whole heart and
soul to the smiter—as I did I"
When she came to that, and to a desperate cry that followed
that, I caught her round the waist. For she rose up in the
chair, in her shroud of a dress, and wildly struck at the air as
if she would as soon have struck herself against the wall and
fallen dead.
All this passed in a few seconds. As I drew her down into
her chair, I was conscious of a scent that I knew, and turning,
saw my guardian in the room.
He always carried (I have not yet mentioned it, I think)
a pocket-handkerchief of rich silk and of imposing proportions,
which was of great value to him in his profession. I have seen
him so terrify a client or a witness by ceremoniously unfolding
his pocket-handkerchief as if he were immediately going to blow
his nose, and then pausing, as if he knew he should not have
time to do it before such client or witness committed himself,
that the self-committal has followed directly, quite as a matter
of course. When I saw him in the room, he had this expressive
pocket-handkerchief in both hands, and was looking at us. On
meeting my eye, he said plainly by a momentary and silent pause
in that attitude, " Indeed ? Singular 1" and then put the hand
kerchief to its right use with wonderful effect.
Miss Havisham had seen him as soon as I, and was (like every
body else) afraid of him. She made a strong attempt to com
pose herself, and stammered that he was as punctual as ever.
"As punctual as ever," he repeated, coming up to us.
" (How do you do, Pip ? Shall I give you a ride, Miss Havi
sham ? Once round ?) And so you are here, Pip ?"
I told him when I had arrived, and how Miss Havisham
had wished me to come and see Estella. To which he replied,
" Ah 1 Very fine young lady 1" Then he pushed Miss HaviBham
in her chair before him with one of his large bands, and
put the other in his trowsers- pocket as if the pocket were full
of secrets.
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. .271
" Well, Pip 1 How often have you seen Miss Estella
before ?" said he, when he came to a stop.
" How often ?"
"Ah! How many times ? Ten thousand times 1"
"Oh! Certainly not so many."
" Twice ?"
" .Taggers," interposed Miss Havisham, much to my relief ;
"leave my Pip alone, and go with him to your dinner."
He complied, and we groped our way down the dark stairs
together. While we were still on our way to those detached
apartments across the paved yard at the back, he asked me how
often I had seen Miss Havisham eat and drink ; offering me
a breadth of choice, as usual, between a hundred times and
once.
I considered, and said " Never."
"And never will, Pip," he retorted, with a frowning smile.
"She has never allowed herself to be seen doing either since
she lived this present life of hers. She wanders about in the
night, and lays hands on such food as she takes."
" Pray, Sir," said I, " may I ask you a question ?"
"You may," said he, "and I may decline to answer it
Put your question."
" Estella's name. Is it Havisham, or ?" I had nothing
to add.
" Or what ?" said he.
" Is it Havisham ?"
" It is Havisham."
This brought us to the dinner-table, where she and Sarah
Pocket awaited us. Mr. Jaggers presided, Estella sat opposite
to him, I faced my green and yellow friend. We dined very
well, and were waited on by a maid-servant whom I had never
seen in all my comings and goings, but who, for any thing I
know, had been in that mysterious house the whole time.
After dinner a bottle of choice old port was placed before
my guardian (he was evidently well acquainted with the
vintage), and the two ladies left us.
Any thing to equal the determined reticence of Mr. Jaggers
under that roof I never saw elsewhere, even in him. He kept
his very looks to himself, and scarcely directed his eyes to
27'2 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
Estella's face once during dinner. When she spoke to him,
he listened, and in due course answered, but never looked
at her that I could see. On the other hand, she often looked
at him, with interest and curiosity, if not distrust, but his
face never showed the least consciousness. Throughout dinner
he took a dry delight in making Sarah Pocket greener and
yellower, by often referring in conversation with me to my
expectations; but here, again, he showed no consciousness,
and even made it appear that he extorted—and even did extort,
though I don't know how—those references out of my innocent
self.
And when he and I were left alone together, he sat with
an air upon him of general lying by in consequence of informa
tion he possessed, that really was too much for me. He crossexamined
his very wine when he had nothing else in hand.
He held it between himself and the candle, tasted the port,
rolled it in his mouth, swallowed it, looked at the port again,
smelled it, tried it, drank it, filled again, and cross-examined
the glass again, until I was as nervous as if I had known the
wine to be telling him something to my disadvantage. Three
or four times I feebly thought I would start conversation ; but
whenever he saw me going to ask him any thing he looked at
me with his glass in his hand, and rolling his wine about in his
mouth, as if requesting me to take notice that it was of no use,
for he couldn't answer. I think Miss Pocket was conscious
that the sight of me involved her in the danger of being
goaded to madness, and perhaps tearing off her cap—which was
a very hideous one, in the nature of a muslin mop—and strew
ing the ground with her hair—which assuredly had never grown
on her head. She did not appear when we afterward went up
to Miss Havisham's room, and we four played at whist. In
the interval, Miss Havisham, in a wild way, had put some of
the most beautiful jewels from her dressing-table into Estella's
hair, and about her bosom and waist; and I saw even my
guardian look at her from under his thick eyebrows, and raise
them a little, when her loveliness was before him, with those
rich flushes of glitter and color in it.
Of the manner and extent to which he took our trumps into
custody, and came out with mean little cards at the ends of
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 273
hands, before which the glory of our Kings and Queens was
utterly abased, I say nothing ; nor of the feeling that I had,
respecting his looking upon us personally in the light of three
very obvious and poor riddles that he had found out long ago.
What I suffered from, was the incompatibility between his cold
presence and my feelings toward Estella. It was not that I
knew I could never bear to speak to him about her, that I
knew I could never bear to hear him creak his boots at her, that
I knew I could never bear to see him wash his hands of her;
it was, that my admiration should be within a foot or two of
him—it was, that my feelings should be in the same place with
him—that, was the agonizing circumstance.
We played until nine o'clock, and then it was arranged
that when Estella came to London I should be forewarned of
her coming and should meet her at the coach ; and then I took
leave of her, and touched her and left her.
My guardian lay at the Boar, in the next room to mine.
Far into the night, Miss Havisham's words, "Love her, love
her, love her 1" sounded in my ears. I adapted them for my
own repetition, and said to my pillow, " I love her, I love her,
I love her 1" thousands of times. Then a burst of gratitude
came upon me, that she should be destined for me, once the
blacksmith's boy. Then, I thought, if she were, as I feared, by
no means rapturously grateful for that destiny yet, when would
she begin to be interested in me ? When should I awaken the
heart within her that was mute and sleeping now ?
Ah me 1 I thought those were high and great emotions. But
I never thought there was any thing low and small in my
keeping away from Joe, because I knew she would be con
temptuous of him. It was but a day gone, and Joe had
brought the tears into my eyes ; they had soon dried, God
forgive mo 1 soon dried.
17
CHAPTER XXX.
After well considering the matter while I was dressing at
the Blue Boar in the morning, I resolved to tell my guardian
that I doubted Orlick's being the right sort of a man to fill a
post of trust at Miss Havisham's. " Why, of course he is not
the right sort of a man, Pip," said my guardian, comfortably
satisfied beforehand on the general head, "because the man who
fills the post of trust never is the right sort of man." It
seemed quite to put him into spirits to find that this particular
post was not accidentally and exceptionally held by the right
sort of man, and he listened in a satisfied manner while I told
him what knowledge I had of Orlick. "Very good, Pip," he
observed, when I had concluded, " Pll go round presently, and
pay our friend off." Rather alarmed by this summary action, I
was for a little delay, and even hinted that our friend himself
might be difficult to deal with. "Oh no he won't," said my
guardian, making his pocket-handkerchief point with perfect
confidence ; " I should like to see him argue the question
with me."
As we were going back together to London by the mid-day
coach, and as I breakfasted under such terrors of Pumblechook
that I could scarcely hold my cup, this gave me an opportunity
of saying that I wanted a walk, and that I would go on along
the London Road while Mr. Jaggers was occupied, if he would
let the coachman know that I would get into my place when
overtaken. I was thus enabled to fly from the Blue Boar
immediately after breakfast. By then making a loop of about
a couple of miles into the open country at the back of
Pumblechook's premises, I got round into the High Street
again, a little beyond that pitfall, and felt myself in comparative
security.
It was interesting to be in the quiet old town once more, and (274^)

" HOLD ME I I'M SO FRIGHTENED I"

GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
it was not disagreeable to be here and there suddenly recognized
and stared after. One or two of the tradespeople even darted
out of their shops and went a little way down the street before
me, that they might turn, as if they had forgotten something,
and pass me face to face—on which occasions I don't know
whether they or I made the worse pretense ; they of not
doing it, or I of not seeing it. Still my position was a dis
tinguished one, and I was not at all dissatisfied with it, until
Fate threw me in the way of that unlimited miscreant, Trabb's
boy.
Casting my eyes along the street at a certain point of my
progress, I beheld Trabb's boy approaching, lashing himself
with an empty blue bag Deeming that a serene and uncon
scious contemplation of him would best beseem me, and would
be most likely to quell his evil mind, I advanced with that ex
pression of countenance, and was rather congratulating my
self on my success, when suddenly the knees of Trabb's boy
smote together, his hair uprose, his cap fell off, he trembled
violently in every limb, staggered out in the road, and crying to
the populace, "Hold me! I'm so frightened 1" feigned to be
in a paroxysm of terror and contrition, occasioned by the dig
nity of my appearance. As I passed him his teeth loudly
chattered in his head, and, with every mark of extreme humilia
tion, he prostrated himself in the dust.
This was a hard thing to bear, but this was nothing. I had
not advanced another two hundred yards, when, to my inex
pressible terror, amazement, and indignation, I again beheld
Trabb's boy approaching. He was coming round a narrow
corner. His blue bag was slung over his shoulder, honest in
dustry beamed in his eyes, a determination to proceed to
Trabb's with cheerful briskness was indicated in his gait. With
a shock he became aware of me, and was severely visited as
before; but this time his motion was rotatory, and he stag
gered round and round me with knees more afflicted, and with
uplifted hands as if beseeching for mercy. His sufferings were
hailed with the greatest joy by a knot of spectators, and I felt
utterly confounded.
I had not got as much further down the street as the postoffice
when I again beheld Trabb's boy shooting round by a
276 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
back way. This time he was entirely changed. He wore the
blue bag in the manner of my great-coat, and was strutting along
the pavement toward me on the opposite side of the street,
attended by a company of delighted young friends to whom he
from time to time exclaimed, with a wave of his hand, "don't
know yah 1" Words can not state the amount of aggravation
and injury wreaked upon me by Trabb's boy, when, passing
abreast of me, he pulled up his shirt-collar, twined his side hair,
stuck an arm akimbo, and smirked extravagantly by, wriggling
his elbows and body, and drawling to his attendants, "Don't
know yah, don't know yah, 'pon my soul don't know yah 1"
The disgrace attendant on his immediately afterward taking to
crowing and pursuing me across the bridge with crows as from
an exceedingly dejected fowl who had known me when I was a
blacksmith, culminated the disgrace with which I left the town,
and was, so to speak, ejected by it into the open country.
But unless I had taken the life of Trabb's boy on that oc
casion, I really do not even now see what I could have done
save endure. To have struggled with him in the street, or to
have exacted any lower recompense from him than his heart's
best blood would have been futile and degrading. Moreover,
he was a boy whom no man could hurt; an invulnerable and
dodging serpent who, when chased into a corner, flew out againbetween
his captor's legs, scornfully yelping. I wrote, how
ever, to Mr. Trabb by next day's post, to say that Mr. Pip must
decline to deal further with one who could so far forget what
he owed to the best interests of society, as to employ a boy
who excited Loathing in every respectable mind.
The coach, with Mr. Jaggers inside, came up in due time,
and I took my box-seat again, and arrived in London safe
.—but not sound, for my heart was gone. As soon as I ar
rived I sent a penitential codfish and barrel of oysters to Joe
(as reparation for not having gone myself), and then went on to
Barnard's Inn.
I found Herbert dining on cold meat, and delighted to wel
come me back. Having dispatched the Avenger to the coffee
house for an addition to the dinner, I felt that I must open my
breast that very evening to my friend and chum. As confidence
was out of the question with the Avenger in the hall, which
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 277
could merely be regarded in the light of an ante-chamber to
the keyhole, I sent him to the Play. A better proof of the
severity of my bondage to that task-master could scarcely be
afforded than the degrading shifts to which I was constantly
driven to find him employment. So mean is extremity that I
sometimes sent him to Hyde Park comer to see what o'clock it
was.
Dinner done and we sitting with our feet upon the fender, I
said to Herbert, "My dear Herbert, I have something very
particular to tell you."
"My dear Handel," he returned, "I shall esteem and respect
your confidence."
, " It concerns myself, Herbert," said I, " and one other per
son." Herbert crossed his feet, looked at the fire with his head on
one side, and having looked at it in vain for some time, looked
at me because I didn't go on.
" Herbert," said I, laying my hand upon his knee. " I love
—I adore—Estella."
Instead of being transfixed, Herbert replied in an easy, mat
ter-of-course way, " Exactly. Well ?"
" Well, Herbert ? Is that all you say ? Well ?"
"What next, I mean?" said Herbert. "Of course I know
that."
" How do you know it 7" said I.
"How do I know it, Handel? Why, from you."
" I never told you."
" Told me 1- You have never told me when you have got
your hair cut, but I have had senses to perceive it. You have
always adored her, ever since I have known you. You brought
your adoration and portmanteau here together. Told me 1
Why you have always told me all day long. When you told
me your own story, you told me plainly that you began adoring
her the first time you saw her, when you were very young
indeed."
" Very well, then," said I, to whom this was a new and not
unwelcome light, " I have never left off adoring her. And
she has come back a most beautiful and most elegant creature.
27H GEEAT EXPECTATIONS.
And I saw her yesterday. And if I adored her before, I now
doubly adore her."
" Lucky for you then, Handel," said Herbert, "that you are
picked out for her and allotted to her. Without encroaching
on forbidden ground, we may venture to say that there can be
no doubt between ourselves of that fact. Have you any idea
yet of Estella's views on the adoration question ?"
I shook my head gloomily. " Oh 1 she is thousands of miles
away from me," said I.
" Patience, my dear Handel : time enough, time enough. But
you have something more to say ?"
" I am ashamed to say it," I returned, " and yet it's no worse
to say it than to think it. You call me a lucky fellow. Of
course, I am. I was a blacksmith's boy but yesterday ; I am
—what shall I say I am—to-day ?"
" Say a good fellow, if you want a phrase," returned Her
bert, smiling, and clapping his hand on the back of mine, "a
good fellow with impetuosity and hesitation, boldness and diffi
dence, action and dreaming, curiously mixed in him."
I stopped for a moment to consider whether there really was
this mixture in my character. On the whole, I by no means
recognized the analysis, but thought it not worth disputing.
"When I ask what I am to call myself to-day, Herbert,"
I went on, " I suggest what I have in my thoughts. You say
I am lucky. I know I have done nothing to raise myself in
life, and that Fortune alone has raised me ; that is being very
lucky. And yet, when I think of Estella—"
(" And when don't you, you know ?" Herbert threw in, with
his eyes on the fire ; which I thought kind and sympathetic of
him.)
" —Then, my dear Herbert, I can not tell you how dependent
and uncertain I feel, and how exposed to hundreds of chances.
Avoiding forbidden ground as you did just now, I may still say
that on the constancy of one person (naming no person) all my
expectations depend. And at the best, how indefinite and un
satisfactory only to know so vaguely what they are 1" In say
ing this, I relieved my mind of what had always been there,
more or less, though no doubt most since yesterday.
"Now, Handel," Herbert replied, in his gay, hopeful way,
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 279
" it seems to me that in the despondency of the tender passion
we are looking into our gift-horse's mouth with a magnifying
glass. Likewise, it seems to me that concentrating our atten
tion on that examination we altogether overlook one of the
best points of the animal. Didn't you tell me that your guar
dian, Mr. Jaggers, told you in the beginning that you were not
endowed with expectations only ? And even if he had not
told you so—though that is a very large If, I grant—could you
believe that, of all men in London, Mr. Jaggers is the man to
hold his present relations toward you unless he were sure of
his ground ?"
I said I could not deny that this was a strong point. I said
it (people often do so, in such cases) like a rather reluctant
concession to truth and justice—as if I wanted to deny it !
" I should think it was a strong point," said Herbert, " and
I should think you would be puzzled to imagine a stronger; as
to the rest, you must bide your guardian's time, and he must
bide his client's time. You'll be one-and-twenty before you
know where you are, and then perhaps you'll get some further
enlightenment. At all events you'll be nearer getting it, for
it must come at last."
" What a hopeful disposition you have 1" said I, gratefully
admiring his cheery ways.
" I ought to have," said Herbert, " for I have not much else.
I must acknowledge, by-the-by, that the good sense of what I
have just said is not my own, but my father's. The only remark
that I ever heard him make on your story was the final one :
' The thing is settled and done, or Mr. Jaggers would not be in
it.' And now before I say any thing more about my father,
or my father's son, and repay confidence with confidence, I want
to make myself seriously disagreeable to you for a moment—
positively repulsive."
" You won't succeed," said I.
"Oh yes I shall 1" said he. "One, two, three, and now I
am in for it. Handel, my good fellow"—though he spoke in
this light tone he was much in earnest—I have been thinking
since we have been talking with our feet on this fender, that
Estella surely can not be a condition of your inheritance, if she
was never referred to by your guardian. Am I right in so under
GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
standing what you have told me, as that he never referred to
her, directly or indirectly, in any way ? Never even hinted, for
instance, that your patron might have views as to your mar
riage ultimately ?"
"Never."
" Now, Handel, I am quite free from the flavor of sour grapes,
upon my soul ! Not being bound to her, can you not detach
yourself from her?—I told you I should be disagreeable."
I turned my head aside, for, with a rush and a sweep, like
the old marsh winds coming up from the sea, a feeling like that
which had subdued me on the morning when I left the forge,
when the mists were solemnly rising, and when I laid my hand
upon the village finger-post, smote upon my heart again. There
was silence between us for a little while.
"Yes, but my dear Handel," Herbert went on, as if we had
been talking instead of silent, "it's having been so strongly
rooted in the breast of a boy whom nature and circumstances
made so romantic renders it very serious. Think of her bringing-up,
and think of Miss Havisham. Think of what she is her
self (now I am repulsive, and you abominate me). This may
lead to miserable things."
" I know it, Herbert," said I, with my head still turned away,
"but I can't help it."
"You can't detach yourself?"
"No. Impossible!"
" You can't try, Handel ?"
"No. Impossible!"
"Well!" said Herbert, getting up with a lively shake as
if he had been asleep, and stirring the fire, "now I'll endeavor
to make myself agreeable again 1"
So he went around the room and shook the curtains out,
put the chairs in their places, tidied the books and so forth that
were lying about, looked into the hall, peeped into the letter-box,
shut the door, and came back to his chair by the fire; where ho
sat down, nursing his left leg in both arms.
"I was going to say a word or two, Handel, concerning my
father and my father's son. I am afraid it is scarcely necessary
for my father's son to remark that my father's establishment is
not particularly brilliant in its housekeeping."
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 281
' " There is always plenty, Herbert," said I : to say something
encouraging.
" Oh yes ! and so the dustman says, I believe, with the strong
est approval, and so does the marine store-shop in the back
street. Gravely, Handel, for the subject is grave enough ; you
know how it is as well as I do. I suppose there was a time
once when my father had not given matters up ; but if there
ever was, the time is gone. May I ask you if you have ever had
an opportunity of remarking down in your part of the country,
that the children of not exactly suitable marriages are always
most particularly anxious to be married ?"
This was such a singular question that I asked him in return,
" Is it so ?"
"I don't know,"8aid Herbert; "that's what I want to know.
Because it is decidedly the case with us. My poor sister Char
lotte, who was next me and died before she was fourteen, was
a striking example. Little Jane is the same. In her desire to
be matrimonially established, you might suppose her to have
passed her short existence in the perpetual contemplation of
domestic bliss. Little Alick, in a frock, has already made ar
rangements for his union with a suitable young person at Kew.
And indeed, I think we are all engaged except the baby."
" Then you are ?" said I.
"I am," said Herbert, " but it's a secret."
I assured him of my keeping the secret, and begged to be
favored with further particulars. He had spoken so sensibly
and feelingly of my weakness, that I wanted to know something
about his strength.
" May I ask the name ?" I said.
" Name of Clara," said Herbert.
" Live in London ?"
" Yes. Perhaps I ought to mention," said Herbert, who had
become curiously crest-fallen and meek since we entered on the
interesting theme, " that she is rather below my mother's non
sensical family notions. Her father had to do with the victual
ing of passenger-ships. I think he was a species of purser."
" What is he now ?" said I.
" He's an invalid now," replied Herbert.
" Living on— ?"
282 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
"Ou the first floor," said Herbert. Which was not at all what
I meant, for I had intended my question to apply to his means.
"I have never seen him, for he has always kept his room over
head since I have known Clara. But I have heard him constantly.
He makes tremendous rows—roars, and pegs at the
door with some frightful instrument." In looking at me, and
then laughing heartily, Herbert for the time recovered his usual
lively manner.
"Don't you expect to see him ?" said I.
" Oh yes, I constantly expect to see him," returned Herbert,
"because I never hear him without expecting him to come
tumbling through the ceiling. But I don't know how long the
rafters may hold."
When he had once more laughed heartily he became meek
again, and told me that the moment he began to realize Capital
it was his intention to marry this young lady. He added, as a
self-evident proposition, engendering low spirits, "But you can't
marry, you know, while you're looking about you."
As we contemplated the fire, and as I thought what a difficult
vision to realize this same Capital sometimes was, I put my
hands in my pockets. A folded piece of paper in one of them
attracting my attention, I opened it, and found it to be the play
bill I had received from Joe, relative to the celebrated provin
cial amateur of Roscian renown. "And, bless my heart 1" I in
voluntarily added aloud, " it's to-night 1"
This changed the subject in an instant, and made us hurriedly
resolve to go to the play. So, when I had pledged myBelf
to comfort and abet Herbert in the affair of his heart by all
practicable and impracticable means, and when Herbert had
told me that his affianced already knew me by reputation, and
that I should shortly be presented to her, and when we had
warmly shaken hands upon our mutual confidence, we blew out
our candles, made up our fire, locked our door, and issued forth,
in quest of Mr. Wopsle and Denmark.
CHAPTER XXXI.
On our arrival in Denmark we found the king and queen of
that country elevated in two arm-chairs on a small kitchen
table, holding a Court. The whole of the Danish nobility
were in attendance ; consisting of a noble boy in the wash
leather boots of a gigantic ancestor, a venerable Peer with a
dirty face, who seemed to have risen from the people late in life,
and the Danish chivalry with a comb in its hair and a pair of
white silk legs, and presenting on the whole a feminine appear
ance. My gifted townsman stood gloomily apart, with folded
arms, and I could have wished that his curls and forehead
had been more probable.
Several curious little circumstances transpired as the action
proceeded. The late king of the country not only appeared
to have been troubled with a cough at the time of his decease,
but to have taken it with him to the tomb and to have brought
it back. The royal phantom also carried a ghostly manuscript
round its truncheon, to which it had the appearance of
occasionally referring, and that, too, with an air of anxiety
and a tendency to lose the place of reference which were
suggestive of a state of mortality. It was this, I conceive,
which led to the Shade's being advised by the gallery to " turn
over 1"—a recommendation which it took extremely ill. It
was likewise to be noted of this majestic spirit that whereas it
always appeared with an air of having been out a long time
and walked an immense distance, it perceptibly came from a
closely contiguous wall. This occasioned its terrors to be
received derisively. The Queen of Denmark, a very buxom
lady, though no doubt historically brazen, was considered by
the public to have too much brass about her ; her chin being
attached to her diadem by a broad band of that metal (as if she
had a gorgeous toothache), her waist being encircled by (283)
284 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
another, and each of her arms by another, so that she was
openly mentioned as "the kettle drum." The noble boy in the
ancestral boots was inconsistent, representing himself, as it were
in one breath, as an able seaman, a strolling actor, a gravedigger,
a clergyman, and a person of the utmost importance
at a Court fencing-match, on the authority of whose practiced
eye and nice discrimination the finest strokes were judged.
This gradually led to a want of toleration for him, and even—
on his being detected in holy orders, and declining to perform
the funeral service—to the general indignation taking the form
of nuts. Lastly, Ophelia was a prey to such slow musical
madness, that when, in course of time she had taken off her
white muslin scarf, folded it up, and buried it, a sulky man who
had been long cooling his impatient nose against an iron bar
in the front row of the gallery, growled, " Now the baby's put
to bed let's have supper!" which, to say the least of it, was
out of keeping.
Upon my unfortunate townsman all these incidents accumu
lated with playful effect. Whenever that undecided Prince had
to ask a question or state a doubt, the public helped him out
with it. As for example : on the question whether 'twas
nobler in the mind to suffer, some roared yes, and some no, and
some inclining to both opinions said, "toss up for it;" and
quite a Debating Society arose. When he asked what should
such fellows as he do crawling between earth and heaven, he
was encouraged with loud cries of "Hear, hear!" When he
appeared with his stocking disordered (its disorder expressed,
according to usage, by one very neat fold in the top, which I
suppose to be always got up with a flat-iron), a conversation
took place in the gallery respecting the paleness of his leg, and
whether it was occasioned by the turn the ghost had given
him. On his taking the recorders—very like a little black flute
that had just been played in the orchestra and handed out at
the door—he was called upon unanimously for Rule Britannia.
When he recommended the player not to saw the air thus, the
sulky man said, "And don't you do it, neither; you're a deal
worse than him!" And I grieve to add that peals of laughter
greeted Mr. Wopsle on every one of these occasions.
But his greatest trials were in the church-yard, which had
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 285
the appearance of a primeval forest, with a kind of small ecclesi
astical wash-house on one side and a turnpike-gate on the
other. Mr. Wopsle, in a comprehensive black cloak, being
descried entering at the turnpike, the grave-digger was
admonished in a friendly way, " Look out 1 Here's the under
taker a coming to see how you're a getting on with your
work 1" I believe it is well known in a constitutional country
that Mr. Wopsle could not possibly have returned the skull,
after moralizing over it, without dusting his fingers on a
white napkin taken from his breast ; but even that innocent and
indispensable action did not pass without the comment
"Wai-ter!" The arrival of the body for interment, in an
empty black box, with the lid tumbling open, was the signal
for a general joy, which was much enhanced by the discovery,
among the bearers, of an individual obnoxious to identification.
The joy attended Mr. Wopsle through his struggle with Laertes
on the brink of the orchestra and the grave, and slackened no
more until he had tumbled the king off the kitchen-table, and
died by inches from the ankles upward.
We had made some pale efforts in the beginning to applaud
Mr. Wopsle; but they were too hopeless to be persisted in.
Therefore we had sat, feeling keenly for him, but laughing,
nevertheless, from ear to ear. I laughed in spite of myself all
the time, the whole thing was so droll ; and yet I had a latent
impression that there was something decidedly fine in Mr.
Wopsle's elocution—not for old associations' sake, I am afraid,
but because it was very slow, very dreary, very up-hill and
down-hill, and very unlike any way in which any man in any
natural circumstances of life or death ever expressed himself
about any thing. When the tragedy was over, and he had
been called for and hooted, I said to Herbert, " Let us go at
once, or perhaps we shall meet him."
We made all the haste we could down stairs, but we were not
quick enough either. Standing at the door was a Jewish man
with an unnaturally heavy smear of eyebrow, who caught my
eye as we advanced, and said, when we came up with him:
" Mr. Pip and friend ?"
Identity of Mr. Pip and friend confessed.
286 GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
"Mr. Waldengarver," said the man, "would be glad to have
the honor."
"Waldengarver?" I repeated—when Herbert murmured in
iny ear, "Probably Wopsle."
" Oh 1" said I " Yes. Shall we follow you ?"
"A few steps, please." When we were in a side alley,
he turned and asked, " How did you think he looked ?—I
dressed him."
I don't know what he had looked like, except a funeral ;
with the addition of a large Danish order hanging round his
neck by a blue ribbon, that had given him the appearance of
being insured in some extraordinary Fire Office. But I said he
had looked very nice.
" When he come to the grave," said our conductor, " he
showed his cloak beautiful. But, judging from the wing, it
looked to me that when he see the ghost in the queen's
apartment, he might have made more of his stockings."
I modestly assented, and we all fell through a little dirty
swing-door, into a sort of hot packing-case immediately behind
it. Here Mr. Wopsle was divesting himself of his Danish
garments, and here there was just room for us to look at him
over one another's shoulders, by keeping the packing-case door,
or lid, wide open.
"Gentlemen," said Mr. Wopsle, "lam proud to see you.
I hope, Mr. Pip, you will excuse my sending round. I had
the happiness to know you in former times, and the Drama
has ever had a claim which has ever been acknowledged, on
the noble and the affluent."
Meanwhile, Mr. Waldengarver, in a frightful perspiration,
was trying to get himself out of his princely sables.
" Skin the stockings off, Mr. Waldengarver," said the
owner of that property, " or you'll bust 'em, and you'll bust
five-and-thirty shillings. Shakspeare never was complimented
with a finer pair. Keep quiet in your chair now, and leave
'em to me."
With that he went upon his knees, and began to flay his
victim ; who, on the first stocking coming off, would certainly
have fallen over backward with his chair, but for there being
no room fall anyhow.
GREAT EXPECTATIONS. 887
I had been afraid until then to say a word about the play
But when Mr. Waldengarver looked up at us complacently,
and said, " Gentlemen, how did it seem to you, to go, in front ?"
Herbert said from behind (at the same time poking me),
capitally." " So I said "capitally."
" How did you like my reading of the character, gentlemen ?"
said Mr. Waldengarver, almost, if not quite, with patronage.
Herbert said from behind (again poking me), " massive and
excellent." So I said boldly, as if I had originated it, and
must insist upon it, " massive and excellent."
" I am glad to have your approbation, gentlemen," said Mr.
Waldengarver, with an air of dignity, in spite of his being ground
against the wall at the time, and holding on by the seat of the
chair. "But I'll tell you one thing, Mr. Waldengarver," said the
man who was on his knees, "in which you're out in your read
ing. Now mind 1 don't care who says contrairy ; I tell you so.
You're out in your reading of Hamlet when you get your legs
in profile. The last Hamlet as I dressed, made the same mis
takes in his reading at rehearsal, till I got him to put a large
red wafer on each of his shins, and then at that rehearsal (which
was the last) I was in front, Sir, to the back of the pit, and
whenever his reading brought him into profile, I called out ' I
don't see no wafers !' And at night his reading was lovely."
Mr. Waldengarver smiled at me, as much as to say " A faith
ful dependent—I overlook his folly;" and then said aloud, " My
view is a little classic and thoughtful for them here ; but they
will improve, they will improve."
Herbert and I said together, Oh, no doubt they would im
prove. " Did you observe, gentlemen," said Mr. Waldengarver,
"that there was a man in the gallery who endeavored to cast
derision on the service—I mean, the representation ?"
We basely replied that we rather thought we had noticed
such a man. I added, " He was drunk, no doubt "
" Oh dear no, Sir," said Mr. Wopsle, "not drunk. His em
ployer would see to that, Sir. His employer would not allow
him to be drunk."
GREAT EXPECTATIONS.
"You know his employer?" said I.
Mr. Wopsle shut his eyes, and opened them again ; perform
ing both ceremonies very slowly. " You must have observed,
gentlemen," said he, " an ignorant and a blatant ass, with a
rasping throat, and a countenance expressive of low malignity,
who went through—I will not say sustained—the rôle (if I
may use a French expression) of Clandius King of Denmark.
That is his employer, gentlemen. Such is the profession 1"
Without distinctly knowing whether I should have been more
sorry for Mr. Wopsle if he had been in despair, I was so sorry
for him as it was, that I took the opportunity of his turning
round to have his braces put on—which jostled us out at the
door-way—to ask Herbert what he thought of having him home
to supper ? Herbert said he thought it would be kind to do
so ; therefore I invited him, and he went to Barnard's with us,
wrapped up to the eyes, and we did our best for him, and he
sat until two o'clock in the morning, reviewing his success and
developing his plans. I forget in detail what they were, but I
have a general recollection that he was to begin with reviving
the Drama, and to end with crushing it; inasmuch as his de
cease would leave it utterly bereft and without a chance or
hope.
Miserably I went to bed after all, and miserably thought of
Estella, and miserably dreamed that my expectations were all
canceled, and that I had to give my band in marriage to Her
bert's Clara, or play Hamlet to Miss Havisham's Ghost before
twenty thousand people without knowing twenty words of it.
